

THE litigation had seemed interminable, 
and had in fact been complicated ; but, 
by the decision on the appeal, the judgment 
of the divorce-court was confirmed as to the 
assignment of the child. The father, who, 
though bespattered from head to foot, had 
made good his case, was, in pursuance of 
this triumph, appointed to keep her : it was 
not so much that the mother's character had 
been more absolutely damaged as that the 
brilliancy of a lady's complexion (and this 
lady's, in court, was immensely remarked), 
might be more regarded as showing the 
spots. Attached, however, to the second 
announcement was a condition that detracted, 
for Beale Farange, from its sweetness, — an 
order that he should refund to his late wife 
the twenty-six hundred pounds put down by 
her, as it was called, some three years before, 
in the interest of her child's maintenance, 
and precisely on a proved understanding that 



k 






/ 



2 

he would take no proceedings; a sum of 
which he had had the administration, and of 
which he could render not the least account ! 
The obligation thus attributed to her adver- 
sary was no small balm to Ida's resentment. 
It drew a part of the sting from her defeat, 
and compelled Mr. Farange perceptibly to 
lower his crest. He was unable to produce 
the money or to raise it in any way; so 
that after a squabble scarcely less public 
and scarcely more decent than the original 
shock of battle, his only issue from his pre- 
dicament was a compromise proposed by his 
legal advisers, and finally accepted by hers. 

His debt was by this arrangement remitted 
to him, and the little girl disposed of in a 

• 

manner worthy of the judgment-seat of 
Solomon. She was cut in twain, and the 
portions tossed impartially to the disputants. 
They would take her in rotation for six 
months at a time ; she would spend half the 
year with each. This was odd justice in 
the eyes of those who still blinked in the 
fierce light projected from the divorce-court, 
— a light in which neither parent figured in 
the least as a happy example to youth and ■ 
innocence. What was to have been expected , 
on the evidence was the nomination in loco < 



\ 



J/ 



 3 

parentis, of some proper third person, some 
respectable or at least some presentable 
friend. Apparently, however, the circle of 
the Faranges had been scanned in vain for 
any such ornament; so that the only solu- 
tion finally meeting all the difficulties was — 
save that of sending Maisie to a home — the 
diversion of the tutelary office in the manner 
I have mentioned. There were more reasons 
for her parents to agree to it than there had 
ever been 'for them to agree to anything; 
and they now prepared, with her help, to 
enjoy the distinction that waits upon vulgar- 
ity sufficiently attested. Their rupture had 
resounded, and after being perfectly insig- 
nificant together, they would be decidedly 
striking apart. Had they not produced an 
impression that warranted people in looking 
for appeals in the newspapers for the rescue 
of the little one, — reverberation, amid a 
vociferous public, of the idea that some 
movement should be started or some benevo- 
lent person should come forward i A good 
lady came indeed a step or two. She was 
distantly related to Mrs. Farange, to whom 
she proposed that, having children and 
nurseries wound up and going, she should 
be allowed to take home the bone of con- 



"1 



4 

tention, and, by working it into her system, 
relieve at least one of her parents. This 
would make every time, for Maisie,. after 
her inevitable six months with Beale, much 
more of a change. 

" More of a change > " Ida cried. " Won't 
it be enough of a change for her to come 
from that low brute to the person in the 
world who detests him most." 

"No, because you detest him so much that 
you *11 always talk to her about him. You '11 
keep him before her by perpetually abusing 
him. " 

Mrs. Farange stared. "Pray, then, am I 
to do nothing to counteract his villainous 
abuse of mef" 

The good lady, for a moment, made no 
reply. Her silence was a grim judgment 
of the whole point of view. "Poor little 
monkey!" she at last exclaimed, and the 
words were an epitaph for the tomb of 
Maisie's childhood. She was abandoned to 
her fate. What was clear to any spectator 
was that the only link binding her to either i 
parent was this lamentable fact of her being t 
a ready vessel for bitterness, a deep little \ 
porcelain cup in which biting acids could be j 
mixed. They had wanted her, not for any < 



\. 



 5 

good they could do her, but for the harm 
they could, with her unconscious aid, do 
each other. She should serve their anger 
and seal their revenge, for husband and wife 
had been alike crippled by the heavy hand 
of justice, which, in the last resort, met on 
neither side their indignant claim to get, as 
they called it, everything. If each was only 
to get half, this seemed to concede that 
neither was so base as the other pretended ; 
or, to put it differently, offered them as both 
bad indeed, since they were only as good 
as each other. The mother had wished to 
prevent the father from, as she said, "so 
much as looking" at the child; the father's 
plea was that the mother's lightest touch 
was "simply contamination." These were 
the opposed principles in which Maisie was 
to be educated ; she was to fit them together 
as she might. Nothing could have been 
more touching at first than her failure to 
suspect the ordeal that awaited her little 
unspotted soul. There were persons horri- 
fied to think what those who had charge of 
it would combine to try to make of it ; no 
one could conceive in advance that they 
would be able to make nothing ill. 

This was a society in which, for the most 



6 

part, people were occupied only with chat- 
ter, but the disunited couple had at last 
grounds for expecting a period of high activ- 
ity. They girded their loins ; they felt as if 
the quarrel had only begun. They felt 
indeed more married than ever, inasmuch as 
what marriage had mainly suggested to them 
was the high opportunity to quarrel. There 
had been "sides" before, and there were 
sides as much as ever; for the sider, too, 
the prospect opened out, taking the pleasant 
form of a superabundance of matter for 
desultory conversation. The many friends 
of the Faranges drew together to differ 
about them — contradiction grew young 
again over teacups and cigars. Everybody 
was always assuring everybody of something 
very shocking, and nobody would have been 
jolly if nobody had been outrageous. The 
pair appeared to have a social attraction 
which failed merely as regards each other. 
It was indeed a great deal to be able to say 
for Ida that no one but Beale desired her 
blood ; and for Beale that if he should ever 
have his eyes scratched out it would be only 
by his wife. It was generally felt, to begin 
with, that they were awfully good-looking; 
they had really not been analyzed to a deeper 






 7 

residuum. They made up together, for in- 
stance, some twelve feet of stature; and 
nothing was more discussed than the appor- 
tionment of this quantity. The sole flaw in 
Ida's beauty was a length and reach of arm 
conducive perhaps to her having so often 
beaten her ex-husband at billiards — a game 
in which she showed a superiority largely 
accountable, as she maintained, for the re- 
sentment finding expression in his physical 
violence. Billiards were her great accom- 
plishment and the distinction her name 
always first produced the mention of. Not- 
withstanding some very long lines, every- 
thing about her that might have been large, 
and that in many women profited by the 
license, was, with a single exception, admired 
and cited for its smallness. The exception 
was her eyes, which might have been of 
mere regulation size, but which overstepped 
the modesty of nature. Her mouth, on the 
other hand, was barely perceptible, and odds 
were freely taken as to the measurement of 
her waist. She was a person who, when she 
was out — and she was always out — produced 
everywhere a sense of having been often 
seen, the sense indeed of a kind of abuse of 
visibility, so that it would have been, in the 



8 

usual places, rather vulgar to wonder at her. 
Strangers only did that; but they, to the 
amusement of the familiar, did it very much ; 
it was an inevitable way of betraying an 
alien habit. Like her husband, she carried 
clothes, carried them as a train carries pas- 
sengers. People had been known to compare 
their taste and dispute about the accommo- 
dation they gave these articles, though 
inclining on the whole to the commendation 
of Ida as less overcrowded, especially with 
jewelry and flowers. Beale Farange had 
natural decorations, a kind of costume in 
his vast fair beard, burnished like a gold 
breastplate, and in the eternal glitter of the 
teeth that his long mustache had been 
trained not to hide and that gave him, in 
every possible situation, the look of the joy 
of life. He had been destined in his youth 
to diplomacy and momentarily attached, 
without a salary, to a legation which enabled 
him often to say "In my time, in the 
East ; " but contemporary history had some- 
how had no use for him, had hurried past 
him and left him in perpetual Piccadilly. 
Every one knew what he had — only twenty- 
five hundred. Poor Ida, who had run through 
everything, had now nothing but her car- 



i 

1 



 9 

riage and her paralyzed uncle. This old 
brute, as he was called, was supposed to 
have a lot put away. The child was pro- 
vided for, thanks to a crafty godmother, a 
defunct aunt of Beale's, who had left her 
something in such a manner that the parents 
could appropriate only the income. 



The child was provided for; but the new 
arrangement was inevitably confounding to 
a young intelligence, intensely aware that 
something had happened which must matter 
a good deal and looking anxiously for the 
great effects of so great a cause. It was to 
be the fate of this patient little girl to see 
much more than, at first, she understood, 
but also, even at first, to understand much 
more than any little girl, however patient, 
had perhaps ever understood before. Only 
a drummer-boy in a ballad or a story could 
have been so in the thick of the fight. She 
was taken into the confidence of passions on 
which she fixed just the stare she might 
have had for images bounding across the 
wall in the slide of a magic-lantern. Her 






10 

little world was phantasmagoric — strange 
shadows dancing on a sheet. It was as if 
the whole performance had been given for 
her — a mite of a half-scared infant in a 
great dim theatre. She was in short intro- 
duced to life with a liberality in which the 
selfishness of others found its account, and 
there was nothing to avert the sacrifice but 
the modesty of her youth. 

Her first term was with her father, who 
spared her only in not letting her have the 
wild letters addressed to her by her mother. 
He confined himself to holding them up at 
her and shaking them, while he showed his 
teeth, and then amusing her by the way he 
chucked them, across the room, bang into 
the fire. Even at that moment, however, 
she had a scared anticipation of fatigue, a 
guilty sense of not rising to the occasion, 
feeling the charm of the violence with which 
the stiff unopened envelopes, whose big 
monograms — Ida bristled with monograms 
— she would have liked to see, were made 
to whiz, like dangerous missiles, through 
the air. The greatest effect of the great 
cause was her own greater importance, 
chiefly revealed to her in the larger freedom 
with which she was handled, pulled hither 



) 



 ii 

and thither and kissed, and the proportion- 
ately greater niceness she was obliged to 
show. Her features had somehow become 
prominent ; they were so perpetually nipped 
by the gentlemen who came to see her 
father and the smoke of whose cigarettes 
went into her face. Some of these gentle- 
men made her strike matches and light their 
cigarettes; others, holding her on knees 
violently jolted, pinched the calves of her 
legs until she shrieked — her shriek was 
much admired — and reproached them with 
being toothpicks. The word stuck in her 
mind and contributed to her feeling from 
this time that she was deficient in something 
that would meet the general desire. She 
found out what it was: that a congenital 
tendency to the production of a substance to 
which Moddle, her nurse, gave a short, ugly 
name, a name painfully associated with the 
part of the joint, at dinner, that she didn't 
like. She had left behind her the time 
when she had no desires to meet, none at 
least save Moddle' s, who, in Kensington 
Gardens, was always on the bench when she 
came back to see if she had been playing too 
far. Moddle' s desire was merely that she 
shouldn't do that; and she met it so easily 



i_^ 



12 

that the only spots in this long brightness 
were the moments of her wondering what 
woald become of her if, on her coming back, 
there should be no Moddle on the bench. 
They still went to the Gardens, but there 
was a difference even there. She was im- 
pelled perpetually to look at the legs of 
other children and ask her nurse if they 
were toothpicks. Moddle was terribly truth- 
ful — she always said : " Oh, my dear, you '11 
not find such another pair as your own ! *' It 
seemed to have to do with something else 
that Moddle often said: "You feel the 
strain — that 's where it is; and you *11 feel 
it still worse, you know. " 

Thus, from the first, Maisie not only felt 
it, but knew that she felt it. A part of it 
was the consequence of her father's telling 
her that he felt it too, and telling Moddle, 
in her presence, that she must make a point 
of driving that home. She was familiar, at 
the age of six, with the fact that ever3rthing 
had been changed on her account, everything 
ordered to enable him to give himself up to 
her. She was to remember always the words 
in which Moddle impressed upon her that 
he did so give himself : " Your papa wishes 
you never to forget, you know, that he has 



> 



 13 

been dreadfully put about." If the skin on 
Moddle's face had, to Maisie, the air of 
being unduly, almost painfully stretched, it 
never presented that appearance so much as 
when she uttered, as she often had occasion 
to utter, such words. The child wondered if 
they didn't make it hurt more than usual; 
but it was only after some time that she was 
able to attach to the picture of her father's 
sufferings, and more particularly to her 
nurse's manner about them, the meaning for 
which these things had waited. By the 
time she had grown sharper, as the gentle- 
men who criticised her calves used to say, 
she found in her mind a collection of images 
and echoes to which meanings were attach- 
able — images and echoes kept for her in the 
childish dusk, the dim closet, the- high 
drawers, like games she was not yet big 
enough to play. The great strain meanwhile 
was that of carrying, by the right end, the 
things her father said about her mother — 
things mostly, indeed, that Moddle, on a 
glimpse of them, as if they had been compli- 
cated toys or difficult books, took out of her 
hands and put away in the closet. It was a 
wonderful assortment of objects of this kind 
that she discovered there later, all tumbled 



1b( 



14 

up too with the things, shuffled into the 
same receptacle, that her mother had said 
about her father. 

She had the knowledge that on a certain 
occasion which every day brought nearer, 
her mother would be at the door to take her 
away; and this would have darkened all the 
days if the ingenious Moddle had not written 
on a paper, in very big, easy words, ever so 
many pleasures that she would enjoy at the 
other house. These promises ranged from " a 
mother's fond love" to "a nice poached egg 
to your tea ; " and took by the way the pros- 
pect of sitting up ever so late to see the lady 
in question dressed in silks and velvets and 
diamonds and pearls to go out. So that it 
was a real support to Maisie, at the supreme 
hour, to feel that, by Moddle's direction, 
the paper was thrust aWay in her pocket 
and there clenched in her fist. The supreme 
hour was to furnish her with a vivid reminis- 
cence, that of a strange outbreak, in the 
drawing-room, on the part of Moddle, who, 
in reply to something her father had just 
said, cried aloud : " You ought to be per- 
fectly ashamed of yourself; you ought to 
blush, sir, for the way you go on!" The 
carriage, with her mother in it, was at the 



 15 

door. A gentleman who was there, who 
was always there, laughed out very loud. 
Her father, who had her in his arms, said to 
Moddle: "My dear woman, 1*11 settle you 
presently ! " after which he repeated, show- 
ing his teeth more than ever at Maisie while 
he hugged her, the words for which her 
nurse had taken him up. Maisie was not at 
the moment so fully conscious of them as of 
the wonder of Moddle's sudden disrespect 
and crimson face ; but she was able to pro- 
duce them, in the course of five minutes, 
when, in the carriage, her mother, all 
kisses, ribbons, eyes, arms, strange sounds 
and sweet smells, said to her: "And did 
your beastly papa, my precious angel, send 
any message to your own loving mamma ? " 
Then it was that she found the words spoken 
by her beastly papa to be, after all, in her 
little bewildered ears, from which, at her 
mother's appeal, they passed, in her clear, 
shrill voice, straight to her little innocent 
lips. "He said I was to tell you from 
him," she faithfully reported, "that you're 
a nasty horrid pig ! " 



i6 



II 



In that lively sense of the immediate 
which is the very air of a child's mind, the 
past, on each occasion, became, for her, as 
indistinct as the future: she surrendered 
herself to the actual with a good faith that 
might have been touching to either parent. 
Crudely as they had calculated they were 
at first justified by the event; she was the 
little feathered shuttlecock that they fiercely 
kept flying between them. The evil they 
had the gift of thinking or pretending to 
think of each other they poured into her 
little gravely-gazing soul as into a boundless 
receptacle; and each of them had doubtless 
the best conscience in the world as to the 
duty of teaching her the stern truth that 
should be her safeguard against the other. 
She was at the age when all stories are true 
and all conceptions are stories. The actual 
was the absolute; the present alone was 
vivid. The objurgation, for instance, 
launched in the carriage by her mother after 
she had, at her father's bidding, punctually 
performed, was a missive that dropped into 
her memory with the dry rattle of a letter 






 17 

falling into a pillar-box. Like the letter, 
it was, as part of the contents of a well- 
stuffed post-bag, delivered in due course at 
the right address. In the presence of these 
overflowings, after they had continued for a 
couple of years, the associates of either 
party sometimes felt that something should 
be done for what they called " the real good, 
don't you know? " of the child. The only 
thing done, however, in general, took place 
when it was sighingly remarked that she 
fortunately wasn't all the year round where 
she happened to be at the awkward moment; 
and that, furthermore, either from extreme 
cunning or from extreme stupidity, she 
appeared not to take things in. 

The theory of her stupidity, eventually 
embraced by her parents, corresponded with 
a great date in her small, still life, the com- 
plete vision, private but final, of the strange 
office she filled. It was literally a moral 
revolution, and it was accomplished in the 
depth of her nature. The stiff dolls on the 
dusky shelves began to move their arms and 
legs ; old forms and phrases began to have a 
sense that frightened her. She had a new 
feeling, the feeling of danger — on which a 
new remedy rose to meet it, the idea of an 






i8 

inner self or, in other words, of conceal- 
ment, ^bepuzzled out with imperfect signs, 
but with a^ .prodigious spirit, that she had 
been a centre of hatred ind a messenger of 
insult, and that everything was .bad because 
sKeTiaH been"^ employed to make it so. Her 
parted lips locked themselves with the deter- 
mination to be employed no longer. She 
would forget ever3rthing; she would repeat 
nothing ; and when, as a tribute to the suc- 
cessful application of her system, she began 
to be called a little idiot, she tasted a 
pleasure altogether new. If, accordingly, 
as she grew older, her parents in turn, in 
her presence, announced that she had grown 
shockingly dull, it was not from any real 
contraction of her little stream of life. She 
s poiled their fun, but she practically added 
to her own. She saw more and more; she 
saw too much. It was l^iss JDvermqrj?, her 
first governess, who, on a momentous occa- 
sion, had sown the seeds of secrecy, sown 
them not by anything she said, but by a 
mere roll of those fine eyes which Maisie 
already admired. Jtfoddle had become, at 
this time, after alteratiotis of residence of 
which the child had no clear record, an 
image faintly embalmed in the remembrance 



 19 

of hungry disappearances from the nursery 
and distressful lapses in the alphabet, sad 
embarrassments, in particular, when invited 
to recognize something that her nurse called 
" the important letter haitch. ** Miss Over- 
more, however hungry, never disappeared; 
this marked her somehow as a being more 
exalted, and the character was confirmed by 
a prettiness that Maisie supposed to be 
extraordinary. Mrs. Farange had said that 
she was almost too pretty, and some one had 
asked what that mattered so long as Beale 
wasn't there. "Beale or no Beale," Maisie 
had heard her mother say in reply, " I take 
her because she *s a lady and yet awfully poor. 
Rather nice people, but there are seven sis- 
ters at home. What do people mean ? " 

Maisie didn't know what people meant, 
but she knew very soon all the names of all 
the sisters. She could say them off better 
than she could say the multiplication-table. 
She privately wondered, moreover, though 
she never asked, about the awful poverty, of 
which her companion also never spoke. 
Food, at any rate, came up by mysterious 
laws. Miss Overmore never, like Moddle, 
had on an apron, and when she ate she held 
her fork with her little finger curled out. 



^ 
f 



20 

The child, who watched her at many mo- 
ments, watched her particularly at that one. 
"I think you're lovely,** she often said to 
her. Even mamma, who was lovely too, 
had not such a pretty way with the fork. 
Maisie associated this showier presence with 
her now being "big," knowing of course 
that nursery-governesses were only for little 
girls who were not, as she said, " really " 
little. She vaguely knew, further, some- 
how, that the future was still bigger than 
she, a,nd that a part of what made it so was 
the number of governesses lurking in it and 
ready to dart out. Everything that had hap- 
pened when she was really little was dormant, 
everything but the positive certitude, be- 
queathed from afar by Moddle, that the 
natural way for a child to have her parents 
was separate and successive, like her mutton 
and her pudding or her bath and her nap. 

*^ Does he know that he lies?" that was 
what she had vivaciously asked Miss Over- 
more on the occasion which was so suddenly 
to lead to a change in her life. 

" Does who know — } " Miss Overmore 
stared: she had a stocking pulled over her 
hand and was pricking at it with a needle 
which she poised in the act. Her task was 



\ 



 21 

homely, but her movement, like all her 
movements, graceful. 

"Why, papa." 

"That he 'lies'—.?" 

"That's what mamma says I am to tell 
him — that he lies and he knows he lies." 
Miss Overmore turned very red, though she 
laughed out till her head fell back ; then she 
pricked again at her muffled hand so hard 
that Maisie wondered how she could bear it. 
''Am I to tell him .? " the child went on. It 
was then that her companion addressed her 
in the unmistakable language of a pair of 
eyes of deep dark gray. "I can't say no," 
they replied as distinctly as possible. "I 
can't say no, because I 'm afraid of your 
mamma, don't you see.? Yet how can I say 
yes after your papa has been so kind to me, 
talking to me so long the other day, smiling 
and flashing his beautiful teeth at me the 
time we met him in the Park, the time when, 
rejoicing at the sight of us, he left the 
gentleman he was with and turned and 
walked with us, stayed with us for half an 
hour } " Somehow, in the light of Miss Over- 
more's lovely eyes, that incident came back 
to Maisie with a charm it had not had at the 
time, and this in spite of the fact that after 



/ 



22 

it was over her governess had never but once 
alluded to it. On their way home, when 
papa had quitted them, she had expressed 
the hope that the child would n't mention it 
to mamma. Maisie liked her so, and had 
so the charmed sense of being liked by 
her, that she accepted this remark as settling 
the matter and wonderingly conformed to it. 
The wonder now lived again, lived in the 
recollection of what papa had said to Miss 
Overmore. " I 've only to look at you to 
see that you 're a person to whom I can 
appeal to help me to save my daughter." 
Maisie's ignorance of what she was to be 
saved from didn't diminish the pleasure of 
the thought that Miss Overmore was saving 
her. It seemed to make them cling together. 



Ill 



She was therefore all the more startled 
when her mother said to her in connection 
with something to be done before her next 
migration: "You understand, of course, 
that she's not going with you." 

Maisie turned quite faint. " Oh, I thought 
she was ! " 



\ 



 23 

"It doesn't matter in the least, you know, 
what you think!" Mrs. Farange loudly 
replied; "and you had better, indeed, for 
the future, miss, learn to keep your thoughts 
to yourself ! " 

This was exactly what Maisie had already 
learned, and the accomplishment was just the 
source of her mother's irritation. It was of 
a horrid little critical system, a tendency, 
in her silence, to judge her elders that this 
hdy suspected her, liking, as she did, for 
her own part, a child to be simple and con- 
fiding. She liked also to hear the report of 
the whacks she administered to Mr. Farange* s 
character, to his pretensions to peace of 
mind; the satisfaction of dealing them dimin- 
ished when nothing came back. The day 
was at hand, and she felt it, when she should 
feel more delight in hurling Maisie at him 
than in snatching her away ; so much so that 
her conscience winced under the acuteness 
of a candid friend who had remarked that the 
real end of all their tugging would be that 
each parent would try to make the little girl 
a burden to the other — a sort of game in 
which a fond mother clearly would n't show 
to advantage. The prospect of not showing 
to advantage, a distinction in which she held 



'/ 



24 

that she had never failed, begot in Ida 
Farange an ill-humor of which several 
persons felt the effect. She determined that 
Beale, at any rate, should feel it. She 
reflected afresh that in the study of how to 
be odious to him she must never give way, 
Nothing could incommode him more thai 
not to get the good, for the child, of a nice 
female appendage who had clearly taken a 
fancy to her. One of the things Ida said ts) 
the appendage was that Beale' s was a house 
in which no decent woman could consent to 
be seen. It was Miss Overmore herself who 
explained to Maisie that she had a hope of 
being allowed to accompany her to her 
father's and that this hope had been dashed 
by the way her mother took it. " She says 
if I ever do such a thing as enter his service 
I must never, in this house, expect to show 
my face again. So I Ve promised not to 
attempt to go with you. If I wait patiently 
till you come back here we shall certainly 
be together again." 

Waiting patiently, and above all waiting 
till she should come back there, seemed to 
Maisie a long way round. It reminded her 
of all the things she had been told, first and 
last, that she should have if she would be 






 25 

good and that in spite of her goodness she 
had never had at all. " Then who will take 
care of me at papa's ? " 

" Heaven only knows, my own precious ! " 
Miss Overmore replied, tenderly embracing 
her. There was indeed no doubt that she 
was dear to this beautiful friend. What 
could have proved it better than the fact that 
before a week was out, notwithstanding their 
sharp separation and her mother's prohi- 
bition and Miss Overmore 's scruples and 
Miss Overmore's promise, the beautiful 
friend had turned up at her father's? The 
little lady already engaged to come there by 
the hour, a fat, dark little lady with a 
foreign name and dirty fingers, who wore, 
throughout, a bonnet that had at first given 
her a deceptive air of not staying long, besides 
asking her pupil questions that had nothing 
to do with lessons, questions that Beale 
Farange himself, when two or three were 
repeated to him, admitted to be awfully 
vulgar — this strange apparition faded before 
the bright creature who had braved every- 
thing for Maisie's sake. The bright creature 
told her little charge frankly what had hap- 
pened — that she had really been unable to 
hold out. She had broken her vow to Mrs. 



26 

Farange. She had struggled for three days, 
then she had come straight to Maisie's papa 
and told him the simple truth. She adored 
his daughter; she couldn't give her up; she 
would make any sacrifice for her. On this 
basis it had been arranged that she should 
stay; her courage had been rewarded; she 
left Maisie in no doubt as to the amount of 
courage she had required. Some of the 
things she said made a particular impression 
on the child — her declaration, for instance, 
that when her pupil should get older she 
would understand better just how "dread- 
fully bold " a young lady, to do exactly what 
she had done, had to be. 

"Fortunately your papa appreciates it; 
he appreciates it immensely " — that was one 
of the things Miss Overmore also said, with 
a striking insistence on the adverb. Maisie 
herself was no less impressed with what her 
friend had gone through, especially after 
hearing of the terrible letter that had come 
from Mrs. Farange. Mamma had been so 
angry that, in Miss Overmore' s own words, 
she had loaded her with insult — proof 
enough indeed that they must never look 
forward to being together again under 
mamma's roof. Mamma's roof, however. 



 27 

had its turn, this time, for the child, of 
appearing but remotely contingent ; so that, 
to reassure her, there was scarce a need of 
her companion's secret, solemnly confided 
— the idea that there should be no going 
back to mamma at all. It was Miss Over- 
more' s private conviction, and a part of the 
same communication, that if Mr. Farange's 
daughter would only show a really marked 
preference she would be backed up by 
"public opinion" in holding on to him. 
Poor Maisie could scarcely grasp that incen- 
tive, but she could surrender herself to the 
day. She had conceived her first passion, 
and the object of it was her governess. It 
had not been put to her, and she couldn't 
or at any rate she didn't put it to herself, 
that she liked Miss Overmore better than 
she liked papa; but it would have sustained 
her under such an imputation to feel herself 
able to reply that papa too liked Miss Over- 
more exactly as much. He had particularly 
told her so. Besides she could easily see it. 



# 



28 



IV 



All this led her on ; but it brought on her 
fate as well, the day when her mother would 
be at the door in the carriage in which 
Maisie now rode on no occasions but these. 
There was no question at present of Miss 
Overmore's going back with her; it was 
universally recognized that the quarrel with 
Mrs. Farange was much too acute. The 
child felt it from the first. There was no 
hugging or exclaiming as that lady drove 
her away; there was only a frightening 
silence, unenlivened even by the invidious 
inquiries of former years, which culminated, 
according to its stern nature, in a still more 
frightening old woman, a figure awaiting her 
on the very doorstep. "You 're to be under 
this lady's care," said her mother. "Take 
her, Mrs. Wix!" she added, addressing the 
figure impatiently and giving the child a 
push in which Maisie felt that she wished 
to set Mrs. Wix an example of energy. 
Mrs. Wix took her, and Maisie felt the next 
day that she would never let her go. She 
had struck her at first, just after Miss Over- 
more, as terrible; but something in her 



 29 

voice, at the end of an hour, touched the 
little girl in a spot that had never even been 
reached. Maisie knew later what it was, 
though doubtless she could n't have made a 
statement of it. These were things that a 
few days' conversation with Mrs. Wix lighted 
up. The principal one was a matter that 
Mrs. Wix herself always immediately men- 
tioned; she had had a little girl quite of 
her own, and the little girl had been killed 
on the spot. She had had absolutely nothing 
else in all the world, and her affliction had 
broken her heart It was comfortably estab- 
lished between them that Mrs. Wix's heart 
was broken. What Maisie felt was that she 
had been, with passion and anguish, a 
mother; and that this was something Miss 
Overmore wasn't; something strangely, con- 
fusingly, that mamma was even less. 

So it was that, in the course of an extra- 
ordinarily short time, she found herself more 
deeply absorbed in the image of the little 
dead Clara Matilda, who, on a crossing in 
the Harrow Road, had been knocked down 
and crushed by the cruellest of hansoms, 
than she had ever found herself in the family 
group made vivid by one of seven. " She *s 
your little dead sister," Mrs. Wix ended by 




\ 



30 

saying, and Maisie, all in a tremor of curios- 
ity and compassion, addressed from that 
moment a particular piety to the small in- 
fectious sentiment. Somehow she wasn't a 
real sister, but that only made her the more 
romantic. It contributed to this view of her 
that she was never to be spoken of in that 
character to any one else — least of all to 
Mrs. Farange, who wouldn't care for her 
nor recognize the relationship. It was to 
be just an unutterable and inexhaustible 
little secret with Mrs. Wix. Maisie knew 
everything about her that could be known, 
everything she had said or done in her little 
mutilated life, exactly how lovely she was, 
exactly how her hair was curled and her 
frocks were trimmed. Her hair came down 
far below her waist; it was of the most won- 
derful gold brightness, just as Mrs. Wix's 
own had been a long time before. Mrs. 
Wix's own was indeed very remarkable still, 
and Maisie had felt at first that she should 
never get on with it. It played a large part 
in the sad and strange appearance, the air 
as of a greasy grayness, which Mrs. Wix 
had presented on the child's arrival. It had 
originally been yellow, but time had turned 
its glow to ashes, to a turbid, sallow, unven- 



* /. 




 31 

• 

erable white. Still excessively abundant, 
it was dressed in a manner of which the 
poor lady appeared not yet to have recognized 
the supersession, with a glossy braid, like a 
large diadem, on the top of her head, and 
behind, at the nape of the neck, a dingy 
rosette like a large button. She wore 
glasses which, in humble reference to a 
divergent obliquity of vision, she called her 
straighteners, and a little ugly snuff-colored 
dress, trimmed with satin bands in the f<!frm 
of scallops and glazed with antiquity. The 
straighteners, she explained to Maisie, were 
put on for the sake of others, whom, as she 
believed, they helped to recognize the direc- 
tion, otherwise misleading, of her glance. 
The rest of the melancholy attire could only 
have been put on for herself. With the 
added suggestion of her goggles it reminded 
her pupil of the polished shell or corselet of 
a horrid beetle. At first she had looked 
cross and almost cruel ; but this impression 
passed away with the child's increased per- 
ception of her being, in the eyes of the 
world, a figure mainly for laughter. She 
was passively comical — a person whom 
people, to make talk lively, described to 
each other and imitated. Every one knew 



32 

the straighteners ; every one knew the dia- 
dem and the button, the scallops and satin 
bands; everyone, though Maisie had never 
betrayed her, knew even Clara Matilda. 

It was on account of these things that 
mamma got her for so little money, really 
for nothing. So much, one day when Mrs. 
Wix had accompanied her into the drawing- 
room and left her, the child heard one of the 
ladies she found there — a lady with eye- 
brows arched like skipping-ropes and thick 
black stitching, like ruled "lines," on beau- 
tiful white gloves — announce to another. 
She knew governesses were poor; Miss Over- 
more was unmentionably and Mrs. Wix fa- 
miliarly so. Neither this, however, nor the 
old brown frock, nor the diadem, nor the 
button, made a difference for Maisie in 
the charm put forth through everything, the 
charm of Mrs. Wix's conveying that some- 
how, in her ugliness and her poverty, she was 
peculiarly and soothingly safe, safer than 
any one in the world — than papa, than 
mamma, than the lady with the arched 
eyebrows, safer even, though much less 
beautiful, than Miss Overmore, on whose 
loveliness, as she supposed it, the little girl 
was faintly conscious that one couldn't rest 



 33 

with quite the same tucked-in and kissed- 
for-good-night feeling. Mrs. Wix was as 
safe as Clara Matilda, who was in heaven, 
and yet, embarrassingly, also in Kensal 
Green, where they had been together to see 
her little huddled grave. It was from some- 
thing in Mrs. Wix's tone, which, in spite of 
caricature, remained indescribable and inimi- 
table, that Maisie, before her term with her 
mother was over, drew this, sense of a tender- 
ness that would never fail her. If she knew 
her instructress was poor and queer she also 
knew that she was not nearly so "qualified " 
as Miss Overmore, who could say lots of 
dates straight off (letting you hold the book 
yourself), state the position of Malabar, play 
six pieces without notes, and, in a sketch, 
put in beautifully the trees and houses and 
difficult parts. Maisie herself could play 
more pieces than Mrs. Wix, who was more- 
over visibly ashamed of her houses and trees 
and could only, with the help of a smutty 
forefinger, of doubtful legitimacy in the 
field of art, do the smoke coming out of the 
chimneys. 

They dealt, the governess and her pupil, 
in "subjects;" but there were many the 
governess put off from week to week and 

3 



34 

that they never got to at all ; she only used 
to say "We '11 take that in its proper order." 
Her order was a circle as vast as the untrav- 
elled globe. She had not the spirit of 
adventure, and the child could perfectly see 
how many subjects she was afraid of. She 
took refuge on the firm ground of fiction, 
through which, indeed, there flowed the blue 
river of truth. She knew swarms of stories, 
mostly those of the novels she had read, 
relating them with a memory that never 
faltered and a wealth of detail that was 
Maisie's delight. They were all about love 
and beauty and countesses and wickedness. 
Her conversation was practically an end- 
less narrative, a great garden of romance, 
with sudden vistas into her own life and 
gushing fountains of fact. These were the 
parts where they most lingered. She made 
the child take with her again every step of 
her long, lame course and think it a journey 
in an enchanted land. Her pupil acquired 
a vivid vision of every one who had ever, in 
her phrase, knocked against her — some of 
them oh so hard ! — every one literally but 
Mr. Wix, her husband, as to whom nothing 
was mentioned save that he had been dead 
for ages. He had been rather remarkably 






. J 



 35 

absent from his wife's existence, and Maisie 
was never taken to see his grave. 



The second parting from Miss Overmore 
had been bad enough, but this first parting 
from Mrs. Wix was much worse. The child 
had lately been to the dentist's; she had a 
term of comparison for the screwed-up 
intensity of the scene. It was dreadfully 
silent, as it had been when her tooth was 
taken out. Mrs. Wix had on that occasion 
grabbed her hand, and they had clung to 
each other with the frenzy of their determi- 
nation not to scream. Maisie, at the 
dentist's, had been heroically still, but just 
when she felt most anguish had become 
aware, on the part of her companion, of an 
audible shriek, a spasm of stifled sympathy. 
This was reproduced by the only sound that 
broke their supreme embrace when, a month 
later, the "arrangement," as her periodical 
up-rootings were called, played the part of 
the horrible forceps. Embedded in Mrs. 
Wix's clasp as her tooth had been sunk in 
her gum, the operation of extracting her 



36 

would really have been a case for chloroform. 
It was a hug that fortunately left nothing to 
say, for the poor woman's want of words, at 
such an hour, seemed to fall in with her 
want of everything. Maisie's alternate 
parent, in the outermost vestibule — he liked 
the impertinence of crossing as much as that 
of his late wife's threshold — stood over 
them with his open watch and his still more 
open grin, while from the only comer of an 
eye on which something of Mrs. Wix's did n't 
impinge the child saw at the door a brougham 
in which Miss Overmore also waited. She 
remembered the difference when, six months 
before, she had been torn from the breast of 
that more spirited protectress. Miss Over- 
more, then also in the vestibule, but of 
course in the other one, had been thoroughly 
audible and voluble. Her protest had rung 
out bravely, and she had declared that some- 
thing — her pupil didn't know exactly what 

— was a regular wicked shame. That had 
at the time dimly recalled to Maisie the 
far-away moment of Moddle's great outbreak 

— there seemed always to be " shame " con- 
nected in one way or another with her migra- 
tions. At present, while Mrs. Wix's arms 
tightened and the smell of her hair was 



» 



\ 



\ 



 37 

strong, she further remembered how, in 
pacifying Miss Overmore, papa had made 
use of the words, " you dear old duck " — an 
expression which, by its oddity, had stuck 
fast in her young mind, having moreover a 
place well prepared for it there by what she 
knew of the governess whom she now always 
mentally characterized as the pretty one. 
She wondered whether this affection would 
be as great as before; that would at all 
events be the case with the prettiness. 
Maisie could see it in the face which showed 
brightly at the window of the brougham. 

The brougham was a token of harmony, 
of the fine conditions papa this time would 
offer. He had usually come for her in a 
hansom with a four-wheeler behind for the 
boxes. The four-wheeler with the boxes on 
it was actually there; but mamma was the 
only lady with whom she had ever been in a 
conveyance of the kind always, of old, 
spoken of by Moddle as a private carriage. 
Papa's carriage was, now that he had one, 
still more private somehow than mamma's; 
and when at last she found herself quite on 
top, as she felt, of its inmates and gloriously 
rolling away she put to Miss Overmore, 
after another immense and more talkative 



V 
> 



^ 

i 



\ 



38 

squeeze, a question of which the motive was 
a desire for information as to the continuity 
of a certain sentiment. " Did papa like you 
just the same while I was gone?" she 
inquired, full of the sense of how markedly 
his favor had been established in her pres- 
ence. She had bethought herself that this 
favor might, like her presence, and as if 
depending on it, be only intermittent and 
for the season. Papa, on whose knee she 
sat, burst into one of those loud laughs of 
his that, however prepared she was, seemed 
always, like some trick in a frightening 
game, to leap forth to make her jump; 
then, before Miss Overmore could speak, he 
replied: "Why, you little donkey, when 
you *re away what have I left to do but just 
to love her.?" Miss Overmore hereupon 
immediately took her from him, and they 
had, over her, an hilarious little scrimmage 
of which Maisie caught the surprised obser- 
vation in the white stare of an old lady who 
passed in a victoria. Then her beautiful 
friend remarked to her very gfravely: "I 
shall make him understand that if he ever 
again says anything as horrid as that to you 
I shall carry you straight off and we'll go 
and live somewhere together and be good 



/ 



 39 

quiet little girls. " The child could n't quite 
make out why her father's speech had been 
horrid, since it only expressed that apprecia- 
tion which their companion herself, of old, 
described as "immense." To enter more 
into the truth of the matter she appealed to 
him again directly, asked if in all these 
months Miss Overmore had n*t been with 
him just as she had been before and just as 
she would be now. " Of course she has, old 
girl, where else could the poor dear be } " 
cried Beale Farange, to the still greater 
scandal of their companion, who protested 
that unless he straightway "took back" his 
nasty, wicked fib, it would be, this time, not 
only him she would leave, but his child, too, 
and his house and his tiresome troubles — 
all the impossible things he had succeeded 
in putting on her. Beale, under this frolic 
menace, took nothing back at all. He was 
indeed apparently on the point of repeating 
his assertion, but Miss Overmore instructed 
her little charge that she was not to listen 
to his bad jokes. She was to understand 
that a lady couldn't stay with a gentleman 
that way without some awfully proper reason. 
Maisie looked from one of her companions 
to the other; this was the freshest, mer- 



r 



40 

riest start she had yet enjoyed, but she had 
a shy fear of not exactly believing them. 
" Well, what reason is proper ? " she thought- 
fully demanded. 

"Oh, a long-legged stick of a tomboy; 
there 's none so good as that ! " Her father 
enjoyed both her drollery and his own, and 
tried again to get possession of her — an 
effort resisted by the third person and lead- 
ing again to something of a public scuffle. 
Miss Overmore declared to the child that 
she had been all the while with good friends, 
on which Beale Farange went on: "She 
means good friends of mine, you know — 
tremendous friends of mine. There has been 
no end of them about — that I will say for 
her!" The child felt bewildered and was 
afterwards for some time conscious of a 
vagueness, just slightly embarrassing, as to 
the subject of so much amusement and as 
to where her governess had really been. She 
did n't feel at all as if she had been seriously 
told, and no such feeling was supplied by 
an)rthing that occurred later. Her embar- 
rassment, of a precocious, instinctive order, 
attached itself to the idea that this was 
another of the matters that it was not for 
her, as her mother used to say, to go into. 



V\ 



^ 



<l 



\ 



 41 y 

Therefore, under her father's roof, during 
the time that followed, she made no attempt 
to clear up her ambiguity by a sociable inter- 
rogation of housemaids ; and it was an odd 
truth that the ambiguity itself took nothing 
from the fresh pleasure promised her by 
renewed contact with Miss Overmore. The 
confidence looked for by that young lady was 
of the fine sort that explanation cannot 
improve, and she herself, at any rate, was 
a person superior to all confusion. For 
Maisie, moreover, concealment had never 
necessarily seemed deception, and she had 
grown up among things as to which her 
former knowledge was that she was not to 
ask about them. It was far from new to her 
that the questions of the small are the pecu- 
liar diversion of the great. Except the affairs 
of her doll Lisette, there had scarcely ever 
been anything at her mother's that was 
explicable with a grave face. Nothing was 
so easy to her as to send the. ladies who 
gathered there off into shrieks, and she 
might have practised upon them largely if 
she had been of a more calculating turn. 
Everything had something behind it. Life 
was like a long, long corridor with rows of 
closed doors. She had learned that at these 



V 



42 

doors it was wise not to knock — that seemed 
to produce, from within, such sounds of 
derision. Little by little, however, she 
understood more, for it befell that she was 
enlightened by Lisette's questions, which 
reproduced the effect of her own upon those 
for whom she sat in the very darkness of 
Lisette. Was she not herself convulsed by 
such innocence ? In the presence of it she 
often imitated the shrieking ladies. There 
were at any rate things she really couldn't 
tell even a French doll. She could only 
pass on her lessons and study to produce on 
Lisette the impression of having mysteries 
in her life, wondering the while whether she 
succeeded in the air of shading off, like her 
mother, into the unknowable. When the 
reign of Miss Overmore followed that of 
Mrs. Wix she took a fresh cue, emulating 
her governess and bridging over the interval 
with the simple expectation of trust. Yes, 
there were matters one could n*t go into with 
a pupil. There were, for instance, days 
when, after prolonged absence, Lisette, 
while she took off her things, tried hard to 
discover where she had been. Well, she 
discovered a little, but she never discovered 
all. There was an occasion when, on her 



 43 

being particularly indiscreet, Maisie replied 
to her — and precisely about the motive of a 
disappearance — as she, Maisie, had once 
been replied to by Mrs. Farange, " Find out 
for yourself!" She mimicked her mother's 
sharpness, but she was rather ashamed after- 
wards, though as to whether of the sharpness 
or of the mimicry was not quite clear. 



VI 



She became aware in time that this would 
be a period not remarkable for lessons, 
the care of her education being now only 
one of the many duties devolving on Miss 
Overmore; a circumstance as to which she 
was present at various passages between that 
lady and her father — passages significant, 
on either side, of dissent and even of dis- 
pleasure. It was gathered by the child on 
these occasions that there was something in 
the situation for which her mother might 
"come down" on them all, though indeed 
the suggestion, always thrown out by her 
father, was greeted on his companion's part 
with particular derision. Such scenes were 
usually brought to a climax by Miss Over- 



/ 



f 

i 



\ 

■ 

i 



V 



44 

more's demanding, in a harsher manner than 
she applied to any other subject, in what 
position under the sun such a person as Mrs. 
Farange would find herself for coming down. 
As the months went on the little girl's 
interpretations thickened, and the more 
effectually that this period was the longest 
she had yet known without a break. She 
became familiar with the idea that ' her 
mother, for some reason, was in no hurry to 
reinstate her. That idea was forcibly ex- 
pressed by her father whenever Miss Over- 
more, differing and decided, took him up on 
the question, which he was always putting 
forward, of the urgency of sending her to 
school. For a governess Miss Overmore 
differed surprisingly; far more, for instance, 
than would ever have entered into the head 
of poor Mrs. Wix. She remarked to Maisie 
many times that she was quite conscious of 
not doing her justice and that Mr. Farange 
equally measured and equally lamented this 
deficiency. The reason of it was that she 
had mysterious responsibilities that inter- 
fered — responsibilities, Miss Overmore in- 
timated, to Mr. Farange himself and to 
the friendly, noisy little house and those 
who came there. Mr. Farange' s remedy for 






"V 



 45 

every inconvenience was that the child 
should be put to school — there were such 
lots of splendid schools, as everybody knew, 
at Brighton and all over the place. That, 
however, Maisie learned, was just what would 
bring her mother down; from the moment 
he should delegate to others the housing of 
his little charge he had n*t a leg to stand on 
before the law. Did n't he keep her away 
from her mother * precisely because Mrs. 
Farange was one of those others? 

There was also the solution of a second 
governess, a young person to come in by 
the day and jeally do the work ; but to this 
Miss Overmore would n*t for a moment lis- 
ten, arguing against it with great public rel- 
ish and wanting to know from all comers 
— she put it to Maisie herself — if they 
did n't see how frightfully it would give her 
away. " What am I supposed to be at all, 
don't you see, if I 'm not here to look after 
her?" She was in a false position, and so 
freely and loudly called attention to it that 
it seemed to become almost a source of 
glory. The way out of it, of course, was 
just to do her plain duty; but that was un- 
fortunately what, with his excessive, his 
exorbitant demands on her, which every one 



46 

indeed appeared quite to understand, he 
practically, he selfishly prevented. Beale 
Farange, for Miss Overmore, was now never 
anything but "he;" and the house was as 
full as ever of lively gentlemen with whom, 
under that designation, she chafBngly talked 
about him. Maisie meanwhile, as a subject 
of familiar gossip on what was to be done 
with her, was left so much to herself that 
she had hours of wistful thought of the large, 
loose discipline of Mrs. Wix. Yet she none 
the less held it, under her father's roof, a 
point of superiority that none of his visitors 
were ladies. It added to this odd security 
that she had once heard a gentleman say to 
him as if it were a gfreat joke, and in obvious 
reference to Miss Overmore: "Hanged if 
she *11 let another woman come near you — 
hanged if she ever will. She'd let fly a 
stick at her as they do at a strange cat ! " 
Maisie greatly preferred gentlemen as inti- 
mates in spite of their also having their way 
— louder, but sooner over — of laughing out 
at her. They pulled and pinched, they 
teased and tickled her; some of them even, 
as they termed it, shied things at her, and 
all of them thought it funny to call her 
by names having no resemblance to her 






 47 

own. The ladies, on the other hand, ad- 
dressed her as " You poor pet " and scarcely 
touched her even to kiss her ; but it was of 
the ladies she was most afraid. 

She was old enough now to understand 
how disproportionate a stay she had already 
made with her father; and also old enough 
to enter a little into the ambiguity that sur- 
rounded this circumstance and that oppressed 
her particularly whenever the question had 
been touched upon in talk with her gover- 
ness. " Oh, you need n*t worry ; she does n't 
care!" Miss Overmore had often said to her 
in reference to any fear that her mother 
might resent her prolonged detention. " She 
has other people than poor little j/ou to think 
about, and she has gone abroad with them, 
and you needn't be in the least afraid that 
she'll stickle this time for her rights." 
Maisie knew Mrs. Farange had gone abroad, 
for she had had, many weeks before, a letter 
from her, that began "My precious pet" 
and that took leave for an indeterminate 
time ; but she had not seen in it a renuncia- 
tion of hatred or of the writer's policy of 
asserting herself, for the sharpest of all her 
impressions had been that there was nothing 
her mother would ever care so much about 



/i 



48 

as to torment Mr. Farange. What at last, 
however, in this connection, was bewilder- 
ing and a little frightening was the dawn of 
a suspicion that a better way had been found 
to torment Mr. Farange than to deprive him 
of his periodical burden. This was the 
question that worried our young lady and 
that Miss Overmore's confidences and the 
frequent observations of her employer only 
rendered more mystifying. It was a contra- 
diction that if Ida had now a fancy for shirk- 
ing the devotion she had originally been so 
hot about her late husband shouldn't jump 
at the monopoly for which he had also in the 
first instance so fiercely fought; but when 
Maisie, with a subtlety beyond her years, 
sounded this new ground her main success 
was in hearing her mother more freshly 
abused. Miss Overmore, up to now, had 
rarely deviated from a decent reserve; but 
the day came when she expressed herself 
with a vividness not inferior to Beale's own 
on the subject of the lady who had fled to 
the continent to wriggle out of her job. It 
would serve this lady right, Maisie gathered, 
if that contract, in the shape of an over- 
grown and underdressed daughter, should 
be shipped straight out to her and landed 






\ 



 49 

at her feet in the midst of scandalous pas- 
times. 

The picture of these pursuits was what 
Miss Overmore took refuge in when the 
child tried timidly to ascertain if her father 
were in danger of feelirfg that he had too 
much of her. She evaded the point and 
only kicked up all around it the dust of 
Ida's heartlessness and folly, of which the 
supreme proof, it appeared, was the fact that 
she was accompanied on her journey by a 
gentleman whom, to be painfully plain 
about it, she had — well, "picked up." 
The only terms on which, unless they were 
married, ladies and gentlemen might, as 
Miss Overmore expressed it, knock about 
together, were the terms on which she and 
Mr. Farange had exposed themselves to 
possible misconception. She had indeed, 
as I have intimated, often explained this 
before, often said to Maisie: "I don't know 
what in the world, darling, your father and 
I should do without you ; for you just make 
the difference, as I *ve told you, of making 
us perfectly proper. " The child took, in the 
office it was so endearingly presented to her 
that she performed, a comfort that helped 
her to a sense of security even in the event 

4 



7 

/ 
1 



so 

of being abandoned by her mother. Familiar 
as she had become with the idea of the great 
alternative to the proper, she felt that her 
governess and her father would have a sub- 
stantial reason for not emulating that detach- 
ment. At the same time she had heard 
somehow of little girls — of exalted rank, it 
was true — whose education was carried on 
by instructors of the other sex; and she 
knew that if she were at school at Brighton 
it would be thought an advantage to her to 
be more or less in the hands of masters. 
She meditated on these mysteries and she 
at last remarked to Miss Overmore that if 
she should go to her mother perhaps the 
gentleman might become her tutor. 

" The gentleman — i " The proposition 
was complicated enough to make Miss Over- 
more stare. 

" The one who 's with mamma. Might n't 
that make it right — as right as your being my 
governess makes it for you to be with papa.^ " 

Miss Overmore considered. She colored 
a little; then she embraced her ingenious 
disciple. "You're too sweet! I 'm a real 
governess. " 

"And couldn't he be a real tutor.? " 

" Of course not. He 's ignorant and bad. " 



\ 



\ 



 51 

" Bad — ? " Maisie echoed with wonder. 

Her companion gave a queer little laugh at 
her tone. " He 's ever so much younger — " 
But here she paused. 

" Younger than you } " 

Miss Overmore laughed again. It was 
the first time Maisie had seen her approach 
so nearly to a giggle. " Younger than — no 
matter whom ! I don't know anything about 
him, and I don't want to ! " she rather incon- 
sequently added. "He's not my sort, and 
I 'm sure, my own darling, he 's not yours." 
And she repeated the embrace with which 
her colloquies with Maisj^g^ almost alway s 
terminated and w hich made the. child feel 

that ES" affprtinn Qf ]p>QQf wpQ a g^gfi jvf^ 

safetyr """Tarents had come to seem preca- 
rious, but governesses were evidently to be 
trusted. Maisie's faith in Mrs. Wix, for 
instance, had suffered no lapse from the fact 
that all communication with her was tempo- 
rarily at an end. During the first weeks of 
their separation Clara Matilda's mamma had 
repeatedly and dolefully written to her, and 
Maisie had answered with an excitement 
qualified only by orthographical delays ; but 
this correspondence had been duly submitted 
to Miss Overmore, with the final conse- 



X 



52 

quence of incurring a lively disapproval. It 
was this lady's view that Mr. Farange 
would n't care for it at all ; and she ended by 
confessing — since her pupil pushed her — 
that she didn't care for it herself. She was 
furiously jealous, she said; and that circum- 
stance was only a new proof of her disinter- 
ested affection. She pronounced Mrs. Wix's 
effusions moreover illiterate and unprofit- 
able, and made no scruple of declaring it 
extraordinary that a woman in her senses 
should have placed the formation of her 
daughter's mind in such ridiculous hands. 
Maisie was well aware that the proprietress 
of the old brown dress and the old odd head- 
gear was a very different class of person from 
Miss Overmore; but it was now brought 
home to her with pain that she was educa- 
tionally quite out of the question. She was 
buried for the time beneath a conclusive 
remark of Miss Overmore' s — " She 's really 
beyond a joke ! " This remark was made as 
that charttiing woman held in her hand the 
last letter that Maisie was to receive from 
Mrs. Wix; it was fortified by a decree 
abolishing the preposterous tie. "Must I 
then write and tell her — ? " the child 
bewilderedly inquired. She grew pale at 












\ 



\ 






 53 

the image of the dreadful things it appeared 
to be prescribed to her to say. " Don't dream 
of it, my dear — /'// write; you may trust 
me!" cried Miss Overmore, who indeed 
wrote to such purpose that a hush in which 
you could have heard a pin drop descended 
upon poor Mrs. Wix. She gave for weeks 
and weeks no sign whatever of life. It was 
as if she had been as effectually disposed of 
by Miss Overmore's communication as her 
little girl, in the Harrow Road, had been dis- 
posed of by the terrible hansom. Her very 
silence became, after this, one of the largest 
elements of Maisie*s consciousness ; it proved 
a warm and habitable air, into which the 
child penetrated further than she dared ever 
to mention to her companions. Somewhere 
in the depths of it the dim straighteners 
were fixed upon her ; somewhere out of the 
troubled little current Mrs. Wix was in- 
tensely waiting. 



VII 



It quite fell in with this intensity that 
one day, on returning from a walk with the 
housemaid, Maisie should have found her 



\ 






\ 



54 

in the hall, seated on the stool usually 
occupied by the telegraph-boys who haunted 
Beale Farange's. door and kicked their heels 
while, in his room, answers were concocted 
with the aid of smoke-puffs and growls. It 
had seemed to her on their parting that 
Mrs. Wix had reached the last limits of the 
squeeze; but she now felt those limits to be 
transcended and that the duration of her 
visitor's hug was a direct reply to Miss 
Overmore's act of abolition. She under- 
stood in a flash how the visit had come to be 
possible — that Mrs. Wix, watching her 
chance, must have slipped in under protec- 
tion of the fact that papa, always tormented, 
in spite of her arguments, with the idea of a 
school, had for a three days* excursion to 
Brighton absolutely insisted on the attend- 
ance of her adversary. It was true that when 
Maisie explained their absence and their 
important motive Mrs. Wix wore an expres- 
sion so peculiar that it could only have had 
its origin in surprise. This contradiction, 
however, peeped out only to vanish, for at 
the very moment that, in the spirit of it, 
she threw herself afresh upon her young 
friend a hansom crested with neat luggage 
rattled up to the door and Miss Overmore 



 55 

bounded out. The shock of her encounter 

with Mrs. Wix was less violent than Maisie 

had feared on seeing her and didn't at all 

interfere with the sociable tone in which, 

in the presence of her rival, she explained to 

her little charge that she had returned, for a 

particular reason, a day sooner than she first 

intended. She had left papa — in such nice 

lodgings — at Brighton ; but he would come 

back to his dear little home on the morrow. 

As for Mrs. Wix, papa's companion supplied 

Maisie in later converse with the right word 

for the attitude of this personage : Mrs. Wix 

" stood up " to her in a manner that the child 

herself felt at the time to be astonishing. 

This occurred indeed after Miss Overmore 

had so far waived her interdict as to make 

a move to the dining-room, where, in the 

absence of any suggestion of sitting down, it 

was scarcely more than natural that even 

poor Mrs. Wix should stand up. Maisie 

immediately inquired if at Brighton, this 

time, anything had come of the possibility 

of a school ; to which, much to her surprise. 

Miss Overmore, who had always grandly 

repudiated it, replied, after an instant, but 

quite as if Mrs. Wix were not there — 

"It may be, darling, that something will 



S6 

come. The objection, I must tell you, has 
been quite removed." 

At this it was still more startling to hear 
Mrs. Wix speak out with great firmness. 
"I don't think, if you'll allow me to say 
so, that there 's any arrangement by which 
the objection can be ' removed. ' What has 
brought me here to-day is that I 've a mes- 
sage for Maisie from de^r Mrs. Farange." 

The child's heart gave a great thump. 
" Oh, mamma 's come back } " 

"Not yet, sweet love, but she's coming," 
said Mrs. Wix ; " and she has — most thought- 
fully, you know — sent me on to prepare you. " 

"To prepare her for what, pray.?" asked 
Miss Overmore, whose primitive mildness 
had evidently, with this news, taken a turn 
for the worse. 

Mrs. Wix quietly applied her straighteners 
to Miss Overmore's florid loveliness. "Well, 
miss, for a very important communication." 

" Can't dear Mrs. Farange, as you so oddly 
call her, make her communications directly.? 
Can't she take the trouble to write to her 
only daughter 1 " the younger lady demanded. 
" Maisie herself will tell you that it 's months 
and months since she has had so much as a 
word from her." 






. 57 

" Oh, but I 've written to mamma ! " cried 
the child, as if this would do quite as well. 

" That makes her treatment of you all the 
greater scandal ! " the governess in posses- 
sion promptly declared. 

"Mrs. Farange is too well aware," said 
Mrs. Wix, with sustained spirit, "of what 
becomes of her letters in this house." 

Maisie's sense of fairness hereupon inter- 
posed for her visitor. "You know. Miss 
Overmore, that papa does n't like everything 
of mamma's." 

"No one likes, my dear, to be made the 
subject of such language as your mother's 
letters contain. They were not fit for the 
innocent child to see," Miss Overmore 
observed to Mrs. Wix. 

"Then I don't know what you complain 
of, and she 's better without them. It serves 
every purpose that I 'm in Mrs. Farange's 
confidence. " 

Miss Overmore gave a scornful laugh. 
"Then you must be mixed up with some 
extraordinary proceedings." 

"None so extraordinary," cried Mrs. Wix, 
turning very pale, "as to say horrible things 
about the mother to the face of the helpless 
daughter." 



S8 

" Things not a bit more horrible, I think, " 
Miss Overmore rejoined, "than those you, 
madam, appear to have come here to say 
about the father." 

Mrs. Wix looked for a moment hard at 
Maisie; then, turning again to her other 
interlocutress, she spoke with a trembling 
voice. " I came to say nothing about him, 
and you must excuse Mrs. Farange and me 
if we are not as irreproachable as the com- 
panion of his travels. " 

The young woman thus described stared an 
instant at the audacity of the description — 
she apparently needed time to take it in. 
Maisie, however, gazing solemnly from one 
of the disputants to the other, observed that 
her answer, when it came, perched upon 
smiling lips. " It will do quite as well, no 
doubt, if you come up to the requirements 
of the companion of Mrs. Farange." 

Mrs. Wix broke into a queer laugh — it 
sounded to'^Maisie like an unsuccessful imi- 
tation of a neigh. "That's just what I'm 
here to make known — how perfectly the 
poor lady comes up to them herself ! " She 
straightened herself before the child. " You 
must take your mamma's message, Maisie, 
and you must feel that her wishing me to 



•^ 



(\ 



 59 

come to you with it this way is a great proof 
of interest and affection. She sends you 
her particular love and announces to you 
that she 's engaged to be married to Sir 
Claude." 

" Sir Claude ? '* Maisie wonderingly echoed. 
But while Mrs. Wix explained that this 
gentleman was a dear friend of Mrs. 
Farange's, who had been of great assistance 
to her in getting to Florence and in making 
herself comfortable there for the winter, she 
was not too violently shaken to perceive her 
old friend's enjoyment of the effect of this 
news on Miss Overmore. The young lady 
opened her eyes and flushed. She imme- 
diately remarked that Mrs. Farange's mar- 
riage would of course put an end to any 
further pretensions to take her daughter 
back. Mrs. Wix inquired with astonishment 
why it should do anything of the sort, and 
Miss Overmore promptly gave as a reason 
that it was clearly but another dodge in a 
system of dodging. She wanted to get out 
of the bargain: why else had she now left 
Maisie on her father's hands weeks and 
weeks beyond the time about which she had 
originally made such a fuss.^ It was vain 
for Mrs. Wix to represent — as she speedily 



f 



6o 

proceeded to do — that all this time would be 
made up as soon as Mrs. Farange returned. 
She, Miss Overmore, knew nothing, thank 
heaven, about her confederate; but she was 
very sure that any person capable of forming 
that sort of relation with the lady in Florence 
was a person who could easily be put for- 
ward as objecting^- to the presence in his 
house of the fruit of a union that his dignity 
must ignore. It was a game like another, 
and Mrs. Wix's visit was clearly the first 
move in it. Maisie found in this exchange 
of asperities a fresh incitement to the un- 
formulated fatalism in which her observation 
of her own career had long since taken 
refuge ; and it was the beginning, for her, of 
a deeper prevision that, in spite of Miss 
Overmore's brilliancy and Mrs. Wix's pas- 
sion, she should live to see a change in the 
nature of the struggle she appeared to have 
come into the world to produce. It would 
still be essentially a struggle, but its object 
would now be not to receive her. 

Mrs. Wix, after Miss Overmore's last 
demonstration, addressed herself wholly to 
the little girl, and, drawing from the pocket 
of her dingy old pelisse a small flat parcel, 
removed its envelope and wished to know if 



^pr 



 6i 

that looked like a gentleman who would n't 
be nice to everybody — let alone to a person 
he would be so sure to find so nice. Mrs. 
Farange, in the geniality of new-found hap- 
piness, had enclosed a " cabinet " photograph 
of Sir Claude, and Maisie lost herself in 
admiration of the fair, smooth face, the 
regular features, the kind eyes, the amiable 
air, the general glossiness and smartness of 
her prospective step-father — only vaguely 
puzzled to think that she should now have 
two fathers at once. Her researches had 
hitherto indicated that to incur a second 
parent of the same sex you had usually to 
lose the first. "Isn't he sympathetic.^" 
asked Mrs. Wix, who had clearly, on the 
strength of his charming portrait, made 
up her mind that Sir Claude promised her a 
future. "You can see, I hope," she added 
with much expression, " that he *s a perfect 
gentleman ! " Maisie had never before heard 
the word "sympathetic" applied to any- 
body's face; it struck her very much, and 
from that moment it agreeably remained 
with her. She testified, moreover, to the 
force of her own perceptions in a long, soft 
little sigh of response to the pleasant eyes 
that seemed to seek her acquaintance, to 



62 

speak to her directly. "He's quite lovely ! " 
she declared to Mrs. Wix. Then eagerly, 
irrepressibly, as she still held the photo- 
graph and Sir Claude continued to frater- 
nize, "Oh, can't I keep it?" she broke out. 
No sooner had she done so than she looked 
up from it at Miss Overmore — this was 
with the sudden impulse to put the case to 
the authority that had long ago impressed on 
her that she mustn't ask for things. Miss 
Overmore, to her surprise, looked distant 
and rather odd, hesitating and giving her 
time to turn again to Mrs. Wix. Then 
Maisie saw that lady's long face lengthen. 
It was stricken and almost scared, as if her 
young friend really expected more of her 
than she had to give. The photograph was 
a possession that, direly denuded, she clung 
to, and there was a momentary struggle 
between her fond clutch of it and her capa- 
bility of every sacrifice for her precarious 
pupil. With the acuteness of her years, 
however, Maisie was of the opinion that her 
own avidity would triumph, and she held 
out the picture to Miss Overmore as if she 
were quite proud of her mother. " Is n't he 
just lovely ? " she demanded, while poor Mrs. 
Wix hungrily wavered, her straighteners 



 63 

largely covering it and her pelisse gathered 
about her with an intensity that strained 
its ancient seams. 

"It was to ine\ darling," the visitor said, 
"that your mamma so generously sent it; 
but of course, if it would give you particular 
pleasure — !" She faltered, only gasping 
her surrender. 

Miss Overmore continued extremely re- 
mote. "If the photograph's your property, 
my dear, I shall be happy to oblige you by 
looking at it on some future occasion. But 
you must excuse me if I decline to touch any 
object belonging to Mrs. Wix." 

Mrs. Wix, by this time, had grown very 
red. " You might as well see him this way, 
miss," she retorted, "as you certainly never 
will, I believe, in any other! Keep the 
pretty picture, by all means, my precious," 
she went on. "Sir Claude will be happy 
himself, I dare say, to give me one with a 
kind inscription." The pathetic quaver of 
this brave little boast was not lost upon 
Maisie, who threw herself so gratefully upon 
Mrs. Wix's neck' that, on the termination of 
their embrace, the public tenderness of 
which, she felt, made up for the sacrifice she 
imposed, their companion had had time to 



/ 



64 

put a quick hand to Sir Claude and, with a 
glance at him or not, whisk him effectually 
out of sight. Released from the child's 
arms Mrs. Wix looked about for the picture. 
Then she fixed Miss Overmore with a hard, 
dumb stare ; and finally, with her eyes on the 
little girl again, achieved the grimmest of 
smiles. "Well, nothing matters, Maisie, 
because there 's another thing your mamma 
wrote about. She has made sure of me." 
Even after her loyal hug Maisie felt like a 
small sneak as she glanced at Miss Overmore 
for permission to understand this. But 
Mrs. Wix left them in no doubt of what it 
meant. "She has definitely engaged me — 
for her return and for yours. Then you'll 
see for yourself." Maisie, on the spot, 
quite believed she should; but the pros- 
pect was suddenly thrown into confusion by 
an extraordinary demonstration from Miss 
Overmore. 

"Mrs. Wix," said that young lady, "has 
some undiscoverable reason for regarding 
your mother's hold on you as strengthened 
by the fact that she's about to marry. I 
wonder then — on that system — what Mrs. 
Wix will say to your father's." 

Miss Overmore's words were directed to 



-< 



 65 

her pupil, but her face, lighted with the 
irony that made it prettier even than ever 
before, was presented to the dingy figure 
that had stiffened itself for departure. The 
child*s discipline had been bewildering: it 
had ranged freely between the prescription 
that she was to answer when spoken to and 
the experience of lively penalties on obeying 
that prescription. This time, nevertheless, 
she felt emboldened for risks ; above all as 
something still more bewildering seemed to 
have leaped into her sense of the relations 
of things. She raised to Miss Overmore's 
face all the timidity of her eyes. " Do you 
mean papa's hold on me.^ Do you mean 
he's about to marry.?" 

"Papa is not about to marry; papa is 
married, my dear. Papa was married the 
day before yesterday at Brighton." Miss 
Overmore glittered more gayly. On the 
spot it came over Maisie, and quite daz- 
zlingly, that her pretty governess was a 
bride. "He's my husband, if you please, 
and I 'm his little wife. So now we '11 see 
who 's your little mother ! ** She caught her 
pupil to her bosom in a manner that was not 
to have been outdone by the emissary of her 
predecessor, and a few minutes later, when 

S 



66 

things had lurched back into their places, 
that poor lady, quite defeated of the last 
word, had soundlessly taken flight. 



VIII 

After Mrs. Wix's retreat. Miss Overmore 
appeared to recognize that she was not 
exactly in a position to denounce Ida 
Farange's second union; but she drew from 
a table-drawer the photograph of Sir Claude 
and, standing there before Maisie, bent her 
eyes on it for some moments. 

"Isn't he beautiful?" the child ingenu- 
ously asked. 

Her companion hesitated. "No; he's 
horrid!" she, to Maisie's surprise, sharply 
returned. But she looked for another minute ; 
after which she handed back the picture. It 
appeared to Maisie herself to exhibit a fresh 
attraction, and she was embarrassed, for she 
had never before had occasion to differ from 
her lovely friend. So she only could ask 
what, such being the case, she should do 
with it: should she put it quite away — 
where it would n't be there to offend ? On 
this Miss Overmore again deliberated; 



] 



 67 

then she said unexpectedly : " Put it on the 
schoolroom mantelpiece. " 

Maisie had apprehensions. "Won't papa 
dislike to see it there ? " 

"Very much indeed ; but that won't matter 
now.'' Miss Overmore spoke with peculiar 
significance and to her pupil's mystifi- 
cation. 

" On account of the marriage } *' Maisie 
inquired. 

Miss Overmore laughed, and Maisie could 
see that in spite of the irritation produced 
by Mrs. Wix she was in high spirits. 
"Which marriage do you mean.^" 

With the question put to her it suddenly 
seemed to the child that she didn't know, 
and she felt that she looked foolish. So 
she took refuge in saying "Shall j^ou be 
different — ? " This was a full implication 
that the bride of Sir Claude would be. 

" As your father' s wedded wife ? Utterly ! " 
Miss Overmore replied. And the difference 
began, of course, in her being addressed, 
even by Maisie, from that day and by her 
particular request, as Mrs. Beale. It was 
there indeed also that it almost ended, for 
except that the child could reflect that she 
should presently have four parents in all, 



68 

and also that at the end of three months the 
staircase, for a little girl hanging over banis- 
ters, sent up the deepening rustle of more 
delicate advances, everything made the same 
impression as before. Mrs. Beale had very 
pretty frocks, but Miss Overmore's had been 
quite as good ; and if papa was much fonder 
of his second wife than he had been of his 
first, Maisie had foreseen that Jqndness and 
followed" its development, almost as^cjosel 
a&lEe^Tct irn jpf i t_ There was little indeed 
in the relations of her companions that her 
precocious experience could n't explain ; for 
if they struck her as, after all, rather defi- 
cient in that air of the honeymoon of which 
she had so often heard — in much detail, for 
instance, from Mrs. Wix — it was natural to 
judge this circumstance in the light of papa's 
proved disposition to contest the empire of 
the matrimonial tie. His honeymoon, when 
he came back from Brighton — not on the 
morrow of Mrs. Wix's visit and not, oddly, 
till several days later — his honeymoon was 
perhaps perceptibly tinged with the dawn of 
a later stage of wedlock. There were things 
as to which, for Mrs. Beale, as the child had 
learnt, his dislike wouldn't matter now, and 
their number increased so that such a trifle 



 69 

as his hostility to the photograph of Sir 
Claude quite dropped out of view. This 
pleasing object found a conspicuous place in 
the schoolroom, which, in truth, Mr. Farange 
seldom entered and in which silent admira- 
tion formed, during the time I speak of, 
almost the sole scholastic exercise of Mrs. 
Beale's pupil. 

Maisie was not long in seeing just what 
her stepmother had meant by the difference 
she should show as Mrs. Beale. If she was 
her father's wife she wasn't her own gover- 
ness ; and if her presence had had formerly 
to be made regular by the theory of a 
humble function she was now on a footing 
that dispensed with all theories and was 
inconsistent with all servitude. That was 
what she had meant by the removal of the 
obstacle to a school: her small companion 
was no longer required at home as — it was 
Mrs. Beale's own amusing word — a little 
duenna. The objection to a successor to 
Miss Overmore remained; it was composed 
frankly of the fact, of which Mrs. Beale 
granted the full absurdity, that she was too 
awfully fond of her stepdaughter to bring 
herself to see her in vulgar and mercenary 
hands. The note of this particular danger 



70 

emboldened Maisie to put in a word for Mrs. 
Wix, the modest measure of whose avidity 
she had taken from the first; but Mrs. Beale 
disposed afresh and effectually of a candidate 
who would be sure to act in some horrible 
and insidious way in Ida's interest and who 
moreover was personally loathsome and as 
ignorant as a fish. She made also no less of 
a secret of the awkward fact that a good 
school would be hideously expensive, and of 
the further circumstance, which seemed to 
put an end to everything, that when it came 
to the point papa, in spite of his previous 
clamor, was really most nasty about paying. 
"Would you believe," Mrs. Beale confi- 
dentially asked of her little charge, "that he 
says I 'm a worse expense than ever and 
that a daughter and a wife together are really 
more than he can afford } " It was thus that 
the splendid school at Brighton lost itself in 
the haze of larger questions, though the fear 
that it would provoke Ida to leap into 
the breach subsided with her prolonged, 
her quite shameless non-appearance. Her 
daughter and her successor were therefore 
left to gaze in united but helpless blankness 
at all that Maisie was not learning. 

This quantity was so great as to fill the 



\ 



 71 

child's days with a sense of intermission to 
which even French Lisette gave no accent 
— with finished games and unanswered ques- 
tions and dreaded tests; with the habit, 
above all, in her watch for a change, of 
hanging over banisters when the door-bell 
sounded. This was the great refuge of her 
impatience, but what she heard at such times 
was a clatter of gayety downstairs; the 
impression of which, from her earliest child- 
hood, had built up in her the belief that the 
grown-up time was the time of real amuse- 
ment and, above all, of real intimacy. Even 
Lisette, even Mrs. Wix had never, she felt, 
in spite of hugs and tears, been so intimate 
with her as so many persons at present were 
with Mrs. Beale and as so many others of 
old had been with Mrs. Farange. The note 
of hilarity brought people together still 
more than the note of melancholy, which 
was the one exclusively sounded, for in- 
stance, by poor Mrs. Wix. Maisie, in these 
days, preferred none the less that domestic 
revels should be wafted to her from a dis- 
tance; she felt sadly unsupported for facing 
the interrogatory of the drawing-room. That 
was a reason the more for making the most 
of Susan Ash, who, in her quality of under- 






72 

housemaid^ moved at a very diflferent level 
and who^ none the less, was much depended 
upon out of doors. She was a guide to 
peregrinations that had little in common 
with those intensely definite airings that 
had left with the child a vivid memory of 
the regulated mind of Moddle. There were 
under Moddle 's system no dawdles at shop- 
windows and no nudges, in Oxford Street, 
of " I say^ look at 'er! " There was an inex- 
orable treatment of crossings and a serene 
exemption from the fear that — especially at 
corners, of which she was yet weakly fond — 
haunted the housemaid, the fear of being, 
as she ominously said, "spoken to." The 
dangers of the town, equally with its diver- 
sions, added to Maisie's sense of being 
untutored and unclaimed. 

The situation, however, had taken a twist 
when, on another of her returns, at Susan's 
side, extremely tired, from the pursuit of 
exercise qualified by much hovering, she 
encountered another emotion. She on this 
occasion learnt at the door that her instant 
attendance was requested in the drawing- 
room. Crossing the threshold in a cloud of 
shame she discerned through the blur Mrs. 
Beale seated there witlPHk, gentleman who 






 73 

immediately drew the pain from her predica- 
ment by rising before her as the original 
of the photograph of Sir Claude. She felt 
the moment she looked at him that he was 
by far the most radiant person with whom 
she had yet been concerned ; and her pleasure 
in seeing him, in knowing that he took hold 
of her and kissed her, as quickly throbbed 
into a strange, shy pride in him, a percep- 
tion of his making up for her fallen state, 
for Susan's public nudges, which quite 
bruised her, and for all the lessons that, in 
the dead schoolroom, where at times she was 
almost afraid to stay alone, she was bored 
with not having. It was as if he had told 
her on the spot that he belonged to her, so 
that she could already show him off and see 
the effect he produced. No, nothing else 
that was most beautiful that had ever 
belonged to her could kindle that particular 
joy — not Mrs. Beale at that very moment, 
not papa when he was gay, nor mamma when 
she was dressed, nor Lisette when she was 
new. The joy almost overflowed in tears 
when he laid his hand on her and drew her 
to him, telling her, with a smile of which 
the promise was as bright as that of a 
Christmas-tree, that he knew her ever so 



/ 



74 

well by her mother, but had come to see her 
now so that he might kno^y her really. She 
could see that his view of the way "really" 
to know her was to make her come away 
with him, and, further, that this was what 
he was there for, and had already been some 
time, arranging it with Mrs. Beale, and 
getting on with that lady in a manner evi- 
dently not at all affected by her having, on 
the arrival of his portrait, thought of him so 
ill. They had grown almost intimate — or 
had the air of it — over their discussion ; and 
it was still further conveyed to Maisie that 
Mrs. Beale had made no secret, and would 
make yet less of one, of all that it cost to let 
her go. " You seem so tremendously eager, *' 
she said to the child, "that I hope you 're at 
least clear about Sir Claude's relation to 
you. It does n't appear to occur to him to 
give you the necessary reassurance. " 

Maisie, a trifle mystified, turned quickly 
to her new friend. "Why; it's of course 
that you 're married to her, is n't it } " 

Her anxious emphasis started them off, as 
she had learned to call it; this was the echo 
she infallibly and now quite resignedly pro- 
duced. Moreover Sir Claude's laughter was 
an indistinguishable part of the sweetness of 



\ 



 75 

his being there. " We 've been married, my 
dear child, three months, and my interest in 
you is a consequence, don't you know? of my 
great affection for your mother. In coming 
here it 's of course for your mother I 'm 
acting. *' 

"Oh, I know,** Maisie said, with all the 
candor of her competence. " She can't come 
herself — except just to the door.'* Then as 
she thought afresh: "Can*t she come even 
to the door now.?" 

"There you are!" Mrs. Beale explained 
to Sir Claude. She spoke as if his dilemma 
were ludicrous. 

His kind face, in a hesitation, seemed 
to recognize it; but he answered the child 
with a frank smile. " No — not very well. " 

" Because she has married you > " 

He promptly accepted this reason. " Well, 
that has a good deal to do with it. " 

He was so delightful to talk to that 
Maisie pursued the subject. " But papa — 
he has married Miss Overmore." 

"Yes, and you '11 see that he won't come 
for you at your mother's," that lady inter- 
posed. 

"Ah, but that won't be for a long time," 
Maisie hastened to respond. 



76 

"We won't talk about it now; you've 
months and months to put in first." And 
Sir Claude drew her closer. 

" Oh, that 's what makes it so hard to give 
her up!" Mrs. Beale sighed, holding out 
her arms to her stepdaughter. Maisie, 
quitting Sir Claude, went over to them, and, 
clasped in a still tenderer embrace, felt 
entrancingly the expansion of the field of 
happiness. "77/ come for you," said her 
stepmother, "if Sir Claude keeps you too 
long; we must make him quite understand 
that! Don't talk to me about her lady- 
ship!" she went on, to their visitor, so 
familiarly that it was almost as if they must 
have met before. " I know her ladyship as 
if I had made her. They 're a pretty pair of 
parents ! " Mrs. Beale exclaimed. 

Maisie had so often heard them called so 
that the remark diverted her but an instant 
from the agreeable wonder of this grand new 
form of allusion to her mother ; and that, in 
its turn, presently left her free to catch at 
the pleasant possibility, in connection with 
herself, of a relation much happier, as be- 
tween Mrs. Beale and Sir Claude than as 
between mamma and papa. Still the next 
thing that happened was that her interest 



 77 

in such a relation brougnt to her lips a fresh 
question. " Have you seen papa ? *' she 
asked of Sir Claude. 

It was the signal for their going off again, 
as her small stoicism had perfectly taken for 
granted that it would be. All that Mrs. 
Beale had, nevertheless, to add was the 
vague apparent sarcasm: "Oh, papa!*' 

"I'm assured he's not at home," Sir 
Claude replied to the child; "but if he had 
been I should have hoped for the pleasure 
of seeing him." 

"Won't he mind your coming?" Maisie 
went on. 

"Oh, you bad little girl!" Mrs. Beale 
humorously protested. 

The child could see that at this Sir 
Claude, though still moved to mirth, colored 
a little; but he spoke to her very kindly. 
"That's just what I came to see, you know 
— whether your father would mind. But 
Mrs. Beale appears strongly of the opinion 
that he won't." 

This lady promptly justified her opinion 
to her stepdaughter. " It will be very inter- 
esting, my dear, you know, to find out what 
it is, to-day, that your father does mind. 
I 'm sure / don't know ! " And she repeated, 



78 

though with perceptible resignation, her 
sigh of a moment before. "Your father, 
darling, is a very odd person indeed." She 
turned with this, smiling, to Sir Claude. 
"But perhaps it 's hardly civil for me to say 
that of his not objecting to have you in the 
house. If you knew some of the people he 
does have ! " 

Maisie knew them all, and none indeed 
were to be compared to Sir Claude. He 
laughed back at Mrs. Beale: he looked at 
such moments quite as Mrs. Wix, in the 
long stories she told her pupil, always de- 
scribed the lovers of her distressed beauties 
— " the perfect gentleman and strikingly 
handsome." He got up, to the child's 
regret, as if he were going. "Oh, I dare 
say we should be all right!" 

Mrs. Beale once more gathered in her 
little charge, holding her close and looking 
thoughtfully over her head at their visitor. 
"It 's so charming — for a man of your type 
— to have wanted her so much ! " 

" What do you know about my type.? " Sir 
Claude inquired. "Whatever it may be, I 
dare say it deceives you. The truth about 
me is simply that I 'm the most unappreciated 
of — what do you call the fellows.? 'family 



 79 

men.' Yes, I 'm a family man; upon my 
honor I am!" 

"Then why on earth/' cried Mrs. Beale, 
"didn't you marry a family woman?" 

Sir Claude looked at her hard. " You 
know whom one marries, I think. Besides, 
there are no family women — hanged if there 
are! None of them want any children — 
hanged if they do!" 

His account of the matter was most inter- 
esting, and Maisie, as if it were of bad omen 
for her, stared at the picture in some dismay. 
At the same time she felt, through encircling 
arms, her protectress hesitate. "You do 
come out with things! But you mean her 
ladyship doesn't want any — really.^" 

"Won't hear of them — simply. But she 
can't help the one she has got." And with 
this Sir Claude's eyes rested on the little 
girl in a way that seemed to her to mask her 
mother's attitude with the consciousness of 
her own. " She must make the best of her, 
don't you see.^ If only for the look of the 
thing, don't you know, one wants one's wife 
to take the proper line about her child. " 

"Oh, i know what one wants!" Mrs. 
Beale declared with a competence that evi- 
dently impressed her interlocutor. 



8o 

"Well, if you keep him up — and I dare 
say you've had worry enough — why should n't 
I keep Ida? What 's sauce for the goose is 
sauce for the gander — or the other way 
round, don't you know ? I mean to see the 
thing through." 

Mrs. Beale, for a minute, still with her 
eyes on him as he leaned upon the chimney- 
piece, appeared to turn this over. "You 're 
just a wonder of kindness — that 's what you 
are!" she said at last. "A lady's expected 
to have natural feelings. ^yi\.your horrible 
sex — isn't it a horrible sex, little love?" 
she demanded with her cheek upon her 
step-daughter's. 

"Oh, I like gentlemen best," Maisie 
lucidly replied. 

The words were taken up merrily. " That 's 
a good one ior you I " Sir Claude exclaimed 
to Mrs. Beale. 

"No," said that lady; "I 've only to re- 
member the women she sees at her mother's. " 

"Ah, they 're very nice now," Sir Claude 
returned. 

"What do you call nice? " 

"Well, they're all right." 

"That doesn't answer me," said Mrs. 
Beale ; " but I dare say you do take care of 



 8i 

I them. That makes you more of an angel to 
j want this job too. " She pla3^ully whacked 
her smaller companion. 

"I'm not an angel — I'm an old grand- 
mother, " Sir Claude declared ; " I like babies ; 
I always did. If we go to smash I shall 
look for a place as a ' responsible nurse. ' " 

Maisie, in her charmed mood, drank in an 
imputation on her years which at another 
moment might have been bitter; but the 
charm was sensibly interrupted by Mrs. 
Beale's screwing her round and gazing 
fondly into her eyes. "You're willing to 
leave me, you wretch?" 

The little girl deliberated; even her 

attachment to this bright presence had 

^ become as a cord she must suddenly snap. 

But she snapped it very gently. "Isn't it 

my turn for mamma ? " 

" You 're a horrible little hypocrite ! The 
less, I think, now said about ' turns ' the 
better," Mrs. Beale made answer, "/know 
whose turn it is. You 've not such a passion 
for your mother ! " 

"I say, I say: do look out!" Sir Claude 
quite amiably protested. 

"There 's nothing she has n't heard. But 
it does n't matter — it has n't spoiled her. If 

6 



82 

you knew what it costs me to part with 
you!" she went on to Maisie. 

Sir Claude watched her as she charmingly 
clung to the child. "I'm so glad you really 
care for her. That 's so much to the good." 

Mrs. Beale slowly got up, still with her 
hands on Maisie, but emitting a little soft 
exhalation. "Well, if you 're glad, that may 
help us ; for I assure you I shall never give 
up any rights in her I may consider that, 
by my own sacrifices, I 've acquired. I 
shall hold very fast to my interest in her. 
What seems to have happened is that she 
has brought you and me together," 

"She has brought you and me together," 
said Sir Claude. 

The cheerfulness of his assent to this 
proposition was contagious, and Maisie 
broke out almost with enthusiasm: "I've 
brought you and her together!" 

Her companions, of course, laughed anew, 
and Mrs. Beale gave her an affectionate 
shake. "You little monster — take care 
what you do! But that's what she does 
do," she continued to Sir Claude. " She did 
it to me and Beale." 

"Well, then," he said to Maisie, "you 
must try the trick at our place." He held 



1 



 83 

out his hand to her again. " Will you come 
now?" 

" Now — just as I am ? '* She turned with 
an immense appeal to her stepmother, tak- 
ing a leap over the mountain of " mending, " 
the abyss of packing, that had loomed and 
yawned before her. " Oh, may I ? '* 

Mrs. Beale addressed her assent to Sir 
Claude. "As well so as any other way. 
I'll send on her things to-morrow." Then 
she gave a tug to the child's coat, glancing 
at her up and down with some ruefulness. 
"She's not turned out as I should like; 
her mother will pull her to pieces. But 
what 's one to do — with nothing to do it on ? 
And she *s better than when she came — you 
can tell her mother that. I 'm sorry to have 
to say it to you — but the poor child was a 
sight ! " 

" Oh, I *11 turn her out myself ! " the vis- 
itor cordially announced. 

" I shall like to see how ! " — Mrs. Beale 
appeared much amused. "You must bring 
her to show me — we can manage that. 
Good-bye, little fright." And her last word 
to Sir Claude was that she would keep him 
up to the mark. 



84 



IX 



The idea of what she was to make up and 
the prodigious total to come were kept well 
before Maisie at her mother's. These things 
were the constant occupation of Mrs. Wix, 
who arrived there by the back-stairs, but in 
tears of joy, the day after her own arrival. 
The process of making up, as to which the 
good lady had an immense deal to say, took, 
through its successive phases, so long that it 
promised to be a period at least equal to the 
child's last period with her father. But this 
was a fuller and richer time; it bounded 
along to the tune of Mrs. Wix's constant 
insistence on the energy they must both put 
forth. There was a fine intensity in the 
way the child agreed with her that under 
Mrs. Beale and Susan Ash she had learned 
nothing whatever — the wildness of the 
rescued castaway was one of the forces 
that would henceforth make for her a career 
of conquest. The year therefore rounded 
itself as a receptacle of retarded knowledge, 
a cup brimming over with the sense that 
now, at least, she was learning. Mrs. Wix 
fed this sense from the stores of her conver- 



 85 

sation and with the immense bustle of her 
reminder that they must cull the fleeting 
hour. They were surrounded with subjects 
they must take at a rush and, were perpetu- 
ally getting into the attitude of triumphant 
attack. They had certainly no idle hours, 
and the child went to bed each night as from 
a long day's play. This had begun from 
the moment of their reunion — begun with 
all Mrs. Wix had to tell her young friend of 
the reasons of her ladyship's extraordinary 
behavior at the very first. . 

It took the form of her ladyship's refusal 
for three days to see her child — three days, 
during which Sir Claude made hasty, merry 
dashes into the schoolroom to smooth down 
the odd situation, to say, "She'll come 
round, you know; I assure you, she '11 come 
round," and a little even to make up to 
Maisie for the indignity he had caused her 
to suffer. There had never, in the child's 
life, been, in all ways, such a delightful 
amount of reparation. It came out by his 
sociable admission that her ladyship had not 
known of his visit to her late husband's 
house and of his having made that person's 
daughter a pretext for striking up an ac- 
quaintance with the dreadful creature in- 



86 

stalled there. Heaven knew she wanted 
her child back and had made every plan 
of her own for removing her — what she 
could n't, for the present at least, forgive any 
one concerned was the meddling, underhand 
way in which Sir Claude had brought about 
the transfer. Maisie carried more of the 
weight of this resentment than even Mrs. 
Wix's confidential ingenuity could lighten 
for her; especially as Sir Claude himself 
was not at all ingenious, though indeed, on 
the other hand, he was not at all crushed. 
He was amused and intermittent and at 
moments most startling; he brought out to 
his young companion, with a frankness that 
agitated her much more than he seemed to 
guess, that he depended on her not letting 
her mother, when she should see her, get 
anything out of her about anything Mrs. 
Beale might have said to him. He came in 
and out; he professed, in joke, to take tre- 
mendous precautions; he showed a positive 
disposition to romp. He chaffed Mrs. Wix 
till she was purple with the pleasure of it, 
and reminded Maisie of the reticence he 
expected of her till she set her teeth like 
an Indian captive. Her lessons, these first 
days and indeed for long after, seemed to be 



 87 

all about Sir Claude; and yet she never 
really mentioned to Mrs. Wix that she was 
prepared, under his inspiring injunction, to 
be vainly tortured. This lady, however, had 
formulated the position of things with an 
acuteness that showed how little she needed 
to be coached. Her explanations of every- 
thing that seemed not quite pleasant — and 
if her own footing was perilous it met that 
danger as well — was that her ladyship was 
passionately in love. Maisie accepted this 
hint with infinite awe and pressed upon it 
much when she was at last summoned into 
the presence of her mother. 

There she encountered matters in which it 
seemed really to help to give her a clew — 
an almost terrifying strangeness, full, none 
the less, after a little, of reverberations of 
Ida's old fierce, demonstrative recoveries of 
possession. They had been some time in 
the house together, and this demonstration 
came late; preoccupied, however, as Maisie 
was with the idea of the sentiment Sir 
Claude had inspired, and familiar, in addi- 
tion, by Mrs. Wix's anecdotes, with the 
ravages that, in general, such a sentiment 
could produce, she was able to make allow- 
ances for her ladyship's remarkable appear- 



88 

ance, her violent splendor, the wonderful 
color of her lips, and even the hard stare, 
like that of some gorgeous idol described in 
a story-book, that had come into her eyes in 
consequence of a curious thickening of their 
already rich circumference. Her professions 
and explanations were mixed with eager 
challenges and sudden drops, in the midst 
of which Maisie recognized, as a memory of 
other years, the rattle of her trinkets and 
the scratch of her endearments, the odor of 
her clothes and the jumps of her conversa- 
tion. She had all her old, clever way — 
Mrs. Wix said it was " aristocratic " — of 
changing the subject as she might have 
slammed the door in your face. The prin- 
cipal thing that was different was the tint 
of her golden hair, which had changed to a 
coppery red and, with the head it profusely 
covered, struck the child as now lifted still 
further aloft. This picturesque parent showed 
literally a grander stature and an ampler 
presence; things which, with some others 
that might , have been bewildering, were 
handsomely accounted for by the romantic 
state of her affections. It was her affections, 
Maisie could easily see, that led Ida to break 
out into questions as to what had passed, 



J' 



 89 

at the other house, between that horrible 
woman and Sir Claude ; but it was also just 
here that the little girl was able to recall the 
eflfect with which, in earlier days, she had 
practised the pacific art of stupidity. This 
art again came to her aid ; her mother, in 
getting rid of her after an interview in which 
she had achieved a vacancy beyond her years, 
allowed her fully to understand that she had 
not grown a bit more amusing. 

She could bear that — she could bear any- 
thing that helped her to feel that she had 
done something for Sir Claude. If she had n't 
told Mrs. Wix how Mrs. Beale seemed to 
like him she certainly could n't tell her lady- 
ship. In the way the past revived for her 
there was a queer confusion : it was because 
mamma hated papa that she used to want 
to know bad things of him, and if at present 
she wanted to know the same of Sir Claude 
it was quite from the opposite motive. She 
was awestruck at the manner in which a lady 
might be affected through the passion men- 
tioned by Mrs. Wix: she held her breath 
with the sense of picking her steps among 
the tremendous things of life. What she 
did, however, now, after the interview with 
her mother, impart to Mrs. Wix was that 



90 

in spite of her having had her " good " 
effect, as she called it, her ladyship's last 
words had been that her ladyship's duty by 
her would be thoroughly done. Over this 
announcement governess and pupil looked 
at each other in silent profundity; but, as 
the weeks went by, it had no consequences 
that interfered gravely with the breezy gallop 
of making up. Her ladyship's duty took 
at times the form of not seeing her child 
for days together, and Maisie led her life 
in great prosperity between Mrs. Wix and 
kind Sir Claude. Mrs. Wix had a new dress 
and, as she was the first to proclaim, a better 
position ; so it all struck Maisie as a crowded, 
brilliant life, with, for the time, Mrs. Beale 
and Susan Ash simply "left out" like chil- 
dren not invited to a Christmas party. Mrs. 
Wix had a secret terror, which, like most 
of her secret feelings, she discussed with 
her little companion, in great solemnity, by 
the hour — the possibility of her ladyship's 
coming down on them, in her sudden high- 
bred way, with a school. But she had also 
a balm to this fear in a conviction of the 
strength of Sir Claude's grasp of the situ- 
ation. He was too pleased — did n't he 
constantly say as much? — with the good 



t 

J 

* 
I 



 91 

impression made, in a wide circle, by Ida's 
sacrifices ; and he came into the schoolroom 
repeatedly to let them know how beautifully 
he felt everything had gone off and every- 
thing would go on. 

He disappeared at times for days, when 
his patient friends understood that her lady- 
ship would naturally absorb him; but he* 
always came back with the drollest stories 
of where he had been — a wonderful picture 
of society, and even with pretty presents 
that showed how, in absence, he thought of 
his home. Besides giving Mrs. Wix, by his 
conversation, a sense that they almost them- 
selves " went out/' he gave her a five-pound 
note, and the history of France, and an 
umbrella with a malachite knob; and to 
Maisie both chocolate-creams and story- 
books and a lovely great-coat (which he 
took her out all alone to buy), besides ever 
so many games, in boxes, with printed direc- 
tions, and a bright red frame for the protec- 
tion of his famous photograph. The games 
were, as he said, to while away the evening 
hour, and the evening hour indeed often 
passed in futile attempts on Mrs. Wix's part 
to master what " it said " on the papers. 
When he asked the pair how they liked 



92 

the games they always replied " Oh, im- 
mensely ! " but they had earnest discussions 
as to whether they had n't better appeal to 
him frankly for aid to understand them. 
This was a course their delicacy shrank 
from ; they could n*t have told exactly why, 
but it was a part of their tenderness for him 
not to let him think they had trouble. 
What dazzled most was his kindness to 
Mrs. Wix — not only the five-pound note 
and the " not forgetting her," but the perfect 
consideration, as she called it with an air to 
which her sounding of the words gave the 
only grandeur Maisie was to have seen her 
wear save on a certain occasion hereafter 
to be described — an occasion when the poor 
lady was grander than all of them put to- 
gether. He shook hands with her, he rec- 
ognized her, as she said, and, above all, 
more than once, he took her, with his step- 
daughter, to the pantomime and, in the 
crowd, coming out, publicly gave her his 
arm. When he met them in sunny Picca- 
dilly he made merry and turned and walked 
with them, heroically suppressing his con- 
sciousness of the stamp of his company ; a 
gallantry that — needless for Mrs. Wix to 
sound those words — her ladyship, though 



 93 

a blood-relation, was little enough the woman 
to be capable of. Even to the hard heart 
of childhood there was something tragic in 
such elation at such humanities : it brought 
home to Maisie the way her humble com- 
panion had sidled and ducked through life. 
But it settled the question of the degree to 
which Sir Claude was a gentleman : he was 
more of one than anybody else in the 
world — " I don't care," Mrs. Wix repeatedly 
remarked, "whom you may meet in grand 
society, nor even to whom you may be 
contracted in marriage." There were ques- 
tions that Maisie never asked, so her gover- 
ness was spared the embarrassment of telling 
her if he were more of a gentleman than papa ; 
that was not moreover from the want of oppor- 
tunity, for there were no moments between 
them at which the topic could be irrelevant 
— no subject they were going into, not even 
the principal dates or the auxiliary verbs, in 
which it was further off than the turn of the 
page. The answer, on the winter nights, to 
the puzzle of cards and counters and little be- 
wildering pamphlets was just to draw up to the 
fire and talk about him ; and if the truth must 
be told this edifying interchange constituted 
for the time the little girl's chief education. 



94 

It must also be admitted that he took 
them far — further perhaps than was always 
warranted by the old-fashioned conscience, 
the dingy decencies of Maisie's simple in- 
structress. There were hours when Mrs. 
Wix sighingly testified to the scruples she 
surmounted — seemed to ask what other line 
one could take with a young person whose 
experience had been, as it were, so peculiar. 
" It is n't as if you did n*t already know 
everything, is it, love?" and "I can't make 
you any worse than you are, can I, darling? " 
— these were the terms in which the good 
lady justified to herself and her pupil her 
pleasant conversational ease. What the pupil 
already knew was indeed rather taken for 
granted than expressed, but it performed 
the useful function of transcending all text- 
books, and supplanting all studies. If the 
child couldn't be worse it was a comfort 
even to herself that she was bad — a comfort 
offering a broad, firm support to the funda- 
mental fact of the present crisis, the fact 
that mamma was fearfully jealous. This 
was another side of the circumstance of 
mamma's passion, and the deep couple in 
the schoolroom were not long in working 
round to it. It brought them face to face 



 95 

with the idea of the inconvenience sufTered 
by any lady who marries a gentleman pro- 
ducing on other ladies the charming effect of 
Sir Claude. That such ladies would freely 
fall in love with him was a reflection naturally 
irritating to his wife. One day when some 
accident — some report of a banged door 
or some scurry of a scared maid — had 
rendered this truth particularly vivid Maisie, 
receptive and profound, suddenly said to her 
companion: "And you, my dear, are you 
in love with him too?" 

Even her profundity had left a margin 
for a laugh; so she was a trifle startled by. 
the solemn promptitude with which Mrs, 
Wix plumped out : " Over head and ears. 
I've never — since you ask me — been so 
far gone." 

This boldness had none the less no eflect 
of deterrence for her when, a few days later 
— it was because several had elapsed with- 
out a visit from Sir Claude — her governess 
turned the tables. " May I ask you, miss, 
\{ you are?" Mrs. Wix brought it out, she 
could see, with hesitation, but clearly intend- 
ing a joke. " Why, yes ! " the child made 
answer, as if in surprise at not having long 
ago seemed sufficiently to commit herself; 



96 

on which her friend gave a sigh of appar- 
ent satisfaction. It might in fact have ex- 
pressed positive relief. Everything was as it 
should be. 

Yet it was not with them, they were very 
sure, that her ladyship was furious, nor be- 
cause she had forbidden it that there befell at 
last a period — six months brought it round 
— when for days together he scarcely came 
near them. He was " off" and Ida was "off," 
and they were sometimes " off" together and 
sometimes apart. There were seasons when 
the simple students had the house to them- 
selves, when the very servants seemed also to 
be " off " and dinner became a reckless forage 
in pantries and sideboards. Mrs. Wix re- 
minded her disciple on such occasions — 
hungry moments, often, when all the support 
of the reminder was required — that the "real 
life*" of their companions, the brilliant society 
in which it was inevitable they should move 
and the complicated pleasures in which it 
was almost presumptuous of the mind to fol- 
low them, must offer features literally not to 
be imagined without being seen. At one of 
these times Maisie found her opening it out 
that, though the difficulties were many, it was 
Mrs. Beale who had now become the chief. 



/ 



 97 

Then, somehow, it was brought fully to the 
child's knowledge that her stepmother had 
been making attempts to see her; that her 
mother had deeply resented it; that her 
stepfather had backed her stepmother up; 
that the latter had pretended to be acting as 
the representative of her father ; and that her 
mother took the whole thing, in plain terms, 
very hard. The situation was, as Mrs. Wix 
declared, an extraordinary muddle to be 
sure. Her account of it brought back to 
Maisie the happy vision of the way Sir 
Claude and Mrs. Beale had made acquain- 
tance — an incident to which, with her step- 
father, though she had had little to say about 
it to Mrs. Wix, she had during the first 
weeks of her stay at her mother's found 
more than one opportunity to revert. As to 
what had taken place the day Sir Claude 
came for her, she had been vaguely grateful 
to Mrs. Wix for not attempting, as her mother 
had attempted, to put her through. This was 
what Sir Claude had called the process when 
he warned her of it and again, afterwards, 
when he told her she was an awfully good 
chap for having foiled it. Then it was that, 
well aware Mrs. Beale had n't in the least 
really given her up, she had asked him if he 

7 






98 

remained in communication with her and if, 
for the time, everything must really be held 
to be at an end between her stepmother and 
herself. This conversation had occurred in 
consequence of his one day popping into the 
schoolroom and finding Maisie alone. 



X 



He was smoking a cigarette and he stood 
before the fire and looked at the meagre 
appointments of the room in a way that 
made her rather ashamed of them. Then 
before, on the subject of Mrs. Beale, he let 
her " draw " him — that was another of his 
words ; it was astonishing how many she gath- 
ered in — he remarked that really mamma 
kept them rather low on the question of 
decorations. Mrs. Wix had put up a Japa- 
nese fan and two rather grim Texts — she 
had wished they were gayer, but they were 
all she happened to have. Without Sir 
Claude's photograph, however, the place 
would have been, as he said, as dull as a cold 
dinner. He had said as well that there were 
all sorts of things they ought to have ; yet 
governess and pupil, it had to be admitted, 



 99 

were still divided between discussing the 
places where any sort of thing would look 
best if any sort of thing should ever come, 
and acknowledging that mutability in the 
little girl's career which was naturally un- 
favorable to accumulation. She stayed long 
enough only to miss things — not half long 
enough to deserve them. The way Sir 
Claude looked about the schoolroom had 
made her feel with humility as if it were not 
very different from the shabby attic in which 
she had visited Susan Ash. Then he had 
said in abrupt reference to Mrs. Beale : " Do 
you think she really cares for you ? " 

" Oh, awfully ! " Maisie had replied. 

" But I mean does she love you for your- 
self, as they call it, don't you know? Is she 
as fond of you, now, as Mrs. Wix?" 

The child turned it over. *' Oh, I 'm not 
every bit Mrs. Beale has ! " 

Sir Claude seemed much amused at this. 
" No, you 're not every bit she has ! " 

He laughed for some moments; but that 
was an old story to Maisie, and she was not 
too much disconcerted to go on : " But she '11 
never give me up." 

" Well, I won't either, old boy ; so that 's 
not so wonderful, and she 's not the only one | 



100 

But if she 's so fond of you, why does n't she 
write to you?" 

" Oh, on account of mamma." This was 
rudimentary, and she was almost surprised at 
the simplicity of Sir Claude's question. 

" I see — that 's quite right," he answered. 
" She might get at you — there are all sorts 
of ways ; but, of course, there *s Mrs. Wix." 

" There 's Mrs. Wix," Maisie lucidly con- 
curred. " Mrs. Wix can't endure her." 

Sir Claude seemed interested. " Oh, she 
can't endure her? Then what does she say 
about her?" 

" Nothing at all, because she knows I 
should n't like it. Is n't it sweet of her? " the 
child asked. 

" Certainly, rather nice. Mrs. Beale would n't 
hold her tongue for any such thing as that, 
would she?" 

Maisie remembered how little she had done 
so; but she desired to protect Mrs. Beale 
too. The only protection she could think of, 
however, was the plea : " Oh, at papa's, you 
know, they don't mind." 

At this Sir Claude only smiled. " No ; I 
dare say not. But here we mind, don't we ? 
— we take care what we say. I don't sup- 
pose it 's the sort of thing I ought to say," 



 loi 

he went on; "but I think we must, on the 
whole, be rather nicer here than at your 
father's. However, I don't press that; for 
it 's a sort of question on which it *s awfully 
awkward for you to speak. Don't worry, at 
any rate; I assure you I'll back you up." 
Then, after a moment, while he smoked, he 
reverted to Mrs. Beale and the child's first 
inquiry. " I 'm afraid we can't do much for 
her just now. I have n't seen her since that 
day — upon my word I have n't seen her." 
The next instant, with a laugh the least bit 
foolish, the young man slightly colored ; he 
felt this profession of innocence to be exces- 
sive as addressed to Maisie. It was inevi- 
table to say to her, however, that of course 
her mother loathed the lady of the other 
house. He could n't go there again with his 
wife's consent, and he was n't the man — he 
begged her to believe, falling once more, in 
spite of himself, into the scruple of showing 
the child he did n't trip — to go there without 
it. He was liable in talking with her to 
take the tone of her being also a man of the 
world. He had gone to Mrs. Beale's to get 
possession of her ; but that was entirely dif- 
ferent. Now that she was in her mother's 
house, what pretext had he to give her 



102 

mother for paying calls on her father's wife? 
And of course Mrs. Beale could n't come to 
Ida's — Ida would tear her limb from limb. 
Maisie, with this' talk of pretexts, remembered 
how much Mrs. Beale had made of her being 
a good one, and how, for such a function, 
it was her fate to be either much depended 
on or much missed. Sir Claude moreover 
recognized on this occasion that perhaps 
things would take a turn later on, and he 
wound up by saying: "I'm sure she does 
sincerely care for you — how can she possi- 
bly help it? She 's very young and very 
pretty and very clever ; I think she 's charm- 
ing. But we must walk very straight. If 
you '11 help me, you know, I '11 help youl' he 
concluded in the pleasant fraternizing, equal- 
izing, not a bit patronizing way which made 
the child ready to go through anything for 
him, and the beauty of which, as she dimly 
felt, was that it was not a deceitful descent to 
her years, but a real indifference to them. 

It gave her moments of secret rapture — 
moments of believing she might help him in- 
deed. The only mystification in this was the 
imposing time of life that her elders spoke of 
as youth. For Sir Claude then Mrs. Beale 
was " young," just as for Mrs. Wix Sir Claude 



WHAT MAIS'IE KNEW 103 

was: that was one of the merits for which 
Mrs. Wix most commended him. What 
therefore was Maisie herself? and, in another 
relation to the matter, what therefore was 
mamma? It took her some time to puzzle 
out, with the aid of an experiment or two, 
that it would n't do to talk about mamma's 
youth. She even went so far one day, in 
the presence of that lady's thick color and 
marked lines, as to wonder if it would occur 
to any one but herself to do so. Yet if she 
was n't young, then she was old, and this threw 
an odd light on her having a husband of a dif- 
ferent generation. Mr. Farange was still older 
— that Maisie perfectly knew ; and it brought 
her in due course to the perception of how 
much more, since Mrs. Beale was younger 
than Sir Claude, papa must be older than 
Mrs. Beale. Such discoveries were discon- 
certing and even a trifle confounding: these 
persons, it appeared, were not of the age they 
ought to be. This was somehow particularly 
the case with mamma, and the fact made her 
reflect with some relief on her not having 
gone with Mrs. Wix into the question of Sir 
Claude's attachment to his wife. She was 
conscious that in confining their attention to 
the state of her ladyship's own affections they 



104 

had been controlled — Mrs. Wix perhaps in 
especial — by delicacy and even by embar- 
rassment. The end of her colloquy with 
her stepfather in the schoolroom was her 
saying, — 

" Then if we *re not to see Mrs. Beale at 
all, it is n't what she seemed to think when 
you came for me." 

He looked rather blank. " What did she 
seem to think?" 

" Why, that I Ve brought you together." 

" She thought that?" Sir Claude inquired. 

Maisie was surprised at his already for- 
getting it. " Just as I brought papa and her. 
Don't you remember she said so ? " 

It came back to Sir Claude in a peal of 
laughter. ** Oh, yes — she said so ! " 

" And^^« said so," Maisie lucidly pursued. 

He recovered with increasing mirth the 
whole occasion. " And you said so ! " he 
retorted as if they were playing a game. 

"Then were we all mistaken?" the child 
asked. 

He considered a little. "No; on the 
whole not. I dare say it's just what you 
have done. We are together — in an extra- 
ordinary sort of way. She 's thinking of us, 
of you and me, though we don't meet And 



 105 

I Ve no doubt you '11 find it will be all right 
when you go back to her." 

"Am I going back to her?" Maisie 
brought out with a little gasp which was 
like a sudden clutch of the happy present. 

It appeared to make Sir Claude grave a 
moment; it might have made him feel the 
weight of the pledge his action had given. 
** Oh, some day, I suppose 1 We Ve lots of 
time." 

" I Ve such a tremendous lot to make up," 
Maisie said with a sense of great boldness. 

" Certainly ; and you must make up every 
hour of it. Oh, I *11 see that you do ! " 

This was encouraging, and to show cheer- 
fully that she was reassured she replied: 
" That 's what Mrs. Wix sees too." 

"Oh, yes," said Sir Claude; "Mrs. Wix 
and I are shoulder to shoulder." 

Maisie took in a little this strong image; 
after which she exclaimed : " Then I Ve done 
it also to you and her — I Ve brought you 
together." 

"Blest if you haven't!" Sir Claude 
laughed ; " and more, upon my word, than any 
of the lot. Oh, you Ve done for us ! Now, 
if you could — as I suggested, you know, that 
day — only manage me and your mother! " 



io6 

The child wondered. " Bring you and her 
together?" 

" You see we 're not together — not a bit ! 
But I oughtn't to tell you such things, all 
the more that you won't really do it — not 
you! No, old chap," the young man con- 
tinued; "there you'll break down. But it 
won't matter — we'll rub along. The great 
thing is that you and I are all right." 

** We *re all right ! " Maisie echoed de- 
voutly. But the next moment, in the light 
of what he had just said, she asked : " How 
shall I ever leave you?" It was just as if 
she must somehow take care of him. 

His look did justice to her anxiety. " Oh, 
well, you need n't. It won't come to that." 

" Do you mean that when I go you '11 go 
with me?" 

Sir Claude hesitated. " Not exactly ' with ' 
you, perhaps ; but I shall never be far off." 

*' But how do you know where mamma 
may take you?" 

He laughed again. " I don't, I confess ! " 
Then he had an idea, but it seemed a little 
too jocose. *' That will be for you to see, 
that she sha'n't take me too far." 

"How can I help it?" Maisie inquired in 
surprise. " Mamma does n't care for me," 



 107 

she said very simply; "not really ^^ Child 
as she was, her little long history was in the 
words, and it was as impossible to contradict 
her as if she had been venerable. 

Sir Claude's silence was an admission of 
this, and still more the tone in which he 
presently replied : " That won't prevent her 
from — some time or other — leaving me 
with you." 

"Then we'll live together?" she eagerly 
demanded. 

" I 'm afraid," said Sir Claude, smiling, 
"that that will be Mrs. Beale's real chance." 

Her eagerness just slightly dropped at this ; 
she remembered Mrs. Wix's pronouncement 
that it was all an extraordinary muddle. " To 
take me again? Well, can't you come to see 
me there ? " 

" Oh, I dare say." 

Though there were parts of childhood 
Maisie had lost, she had all childhood's pref- 
erence for the particular promise. " Then you 
will come — you '11 come often, won't you ? " 
she insisted, while at the moment she spoke 
the door opened for the return of Mrs. Wix. 

Sir Claude, hereupon, instead of replying, 
gave her a look which left her silent and 
embarrassed. 



io8 

When he again found privacy consistenti 
however — and it happened to be long in 
coming — he took up their conversation 
very much where it had dropped. "You 
see, my dear, if I shall be able to go to you 
at your father's, it is n*t at all the same thing 
for Mrs. Beale to come to you here." Maisie 
gave a thoughtful assent to this proposition, 
though conscious that she could scarcely 
herself say just where the difference would 
lie. She felt how much her stepfather saved 
her, as he said with his habitual amusement, 
the trouble of that. " I shall probably be 
able to go to Mrs. Beale's without your 
mother's knowing it." 

Maisie stared with a certain thrill at the 
dramatic element in this. ** And she could n't 
come here without mamma's — ? " She was 
unable to articulate the word for what mamma 
would do. 

" My dear child, Mrs. Wix would tell of it." 

"But I thought," Maisie objected, '*that 
Mrs. Wix and you — " 

"Are such brothers in arms?" Sir Claude 
caught her up. " Oh, yes, about everything 
but Mrs. Beale. And if you should suggest," 
he went on, "that we might somehow hide 
her presence here from Mrs. Wix — " 



 109 

" Oh, I don't suggest that ! " Maisie in 
turn cut him short. 

Sir Claude looked as if he could indeed 
quite see why. "No; it would really be 
impossible." There came to her from this 
glance at what they might hide the first 
small glimpse of something in him that she 
wouldn't have expected. There had been 
times when she had had to make the best 
of the impression that she herself was deceit- 
ful; yet she had never concealed anything 
bigger than a thought. Of course she now 
concealed this thought of how strange it 
would be to see him hide; and while she 
was so actively engaged he continued : " Be- 
sides, you know, I'm not afraid of your 
father." 

** And you are of my mother? " 

" Rather, old man ! " Sir Claude replied. 



XI 



It must not be supposed that her lady- 
ship's intermissions were not qualified by 
demonstrations of another order — triumphal 
entries and breathless pauses, during which 
she seemed to take of everything in the 



no 

room, from the state of the ceiling to that 
of her daughter's boot-toes, a survey that was 
rich in intentions. Sometimes she sat down 
and sometimes she surged about, but her 
attitude wore equally in either case the 
grand air of the practical. She found so 
much to deplore that she left a great deal 
to expect, and bristled so with calculations 
that she seemed to scatter remedies and 
pledges. Her visits were as good as an 
outfit — her manner, as Mrs. Wix once said, 
as good as a pair of curtains ; but she was 
a person addicted to extremes, sometimes 
barely speaking to her child and sometimes 
pressing this tender shoot to a bosom cut, 
as Mrs. Wix had also observed, remarkably 
low. She was always in a fearful hurry, and 
the lower the bosom was cut the more it 
was to be gathered she was wanted else- 
where. She usually broke in alone, but 
sometimes Sir Claude was with her, and dur- 
ing all the early period there was nothing 
on which these appearances had had so de* 
lightful a bearing as on the way her ladyship 
was, as Mrs. Wix expressed it, under the 
spell. "But isn't she under it?" Maisie 
used in thoughtful but familiar reference to 
exclaim after Sir Claude had swept mamma 



 iii 

away in peals of natural laughter. Not even 
in the old days of the convulsed ladies had 
she heard mamma laugh so freely as in these 
moments of conjugal surrender, to the gayety 
of which even a little girl could see she had 
at last a right — a little girl whose thought- 
fulness was now all happy, selfish meditation 
on good omens and future fun. 

Unaccompanied, in subsequent hours, and 
with an effect of changing to meet a change, 
Ida took a tone superficially disconcerting 
and abrupt — the tone of having, at an im- 
mense cost, made over everything to Sir 
Claude and wishing others to know that if 
everything wasn't right it was because Sir 
Claude was so dreadfully vague. " He has 
made from the first such a row about you," 
she said on one occasion to Maisie, "that 
I 've told him to do for you himself and try 
how he likes it — see? I've washed my 
hands of you, I *ve made you over to him ; 
and if you 're discontented it 's on him, please, 
you '11 come down. So don't haul poor me 
up — I assure you I 've worries enough." 
One of these, visibly, was that the spell re- 
joiced in by the schoolroom fire was already 
in danger of breaking ; another was that she 
was finally forced to make no secret of her 



112 

husband's unfitness for real responsibilities. 
The day came indeed when her breathless 
auditors learned from her in bewilderment 
that what ailed him was that he was, alas ! 
simply not serious. Maisie wept on Mrs. 
Wix's bosom after hearing that Sir Claude 
was a butterfly; considering moreover that 
her governess patched it up but ill in coming 
out at various moments the next few days 
with the opinion that it was proper to his 
station to be light and gay. That had been 
proper to every one's station that she had 
yet encountered save poor Mrs. Wix's own ; 
and the particular merit of Sir Claude had 
seemed precisely that he was different from 
every one. She talked with him, how- 
ever, as time went on, very freely about her 
mother; being with him, in this relation, 
wholly without the fear that had kept her 
silent before her father — the fear of bearing 
tales and making bad things worse. He 
appeared to accept the idea that he had 
taken her over and made her, as he said, his 
particular lark; he quite agreed also that 
he was an awful humbug and an idle beast 
and a sorry dunce. And he never said a 
word to her against her mother — he only 
remained dumb and discouraged in the face 



 113 

of her ladyship's own overtopping earnest- 
ness. There were occasions when he even 
spoke as if he had wrenched his little charge 
from the arms of a parent who had fought 
for her tooth and nail. 

This was the very moral of a scene that 
flashed into vividness one day when the 
four happened to meet, without company, in 
the drawing-room, and Maisie found herself 
clutched to her mother's breast and passion- 
ately sobbed and shrieked over, made the 
subject of a demonstration that evidently 
formed the sequel to a sharp passage en- 
acted just before. The connection required 
that, while she almost cradled the child in 
her arms, Ida should speak of her as hid- 
eously, as fatally estranged, and should rail 
at Sir Claude as the cruel author of the 
outrage. "He has taken you from me," 
she cried ; " he has set you against me, 
and you Ve been won away, and your hor- 
rid little mind has been poisoned ! You 've 
gone over to him, you 've given yourself 
up, to side against me and hate me. You 
never open your mouth to me — you know 
you don't; and you chatter to him like a 
dozen magpies. Don't lie about it — I hear 

you all over the place. You hang about him 

8 



114 

in a way that *s barely decent, and he can do 
what he likes with you. Well then, let him 
to his heart's content ; he has been in such a 
hurry to take you that we '11 see if it suits 
him to keep you ! I 'm very good to break 
my heart about it when you Ve no more 
feeling for me than a clammy little fish ! " 
She suddenly thrust the child away and^ as 
a disgusted admission of failure, sent her 
flying across the room into the arms of Mrs. 
Wix, whom, at this moment and even in 
the whirl of her transit, Maisie saw, very 
red, exchange a quick queer look with Sir 
Claude. 

The impression of the look remained with 
her, confronting her with such a critical little 
view of her mother's explosion that she felt 
the less ashamed of herself for incurring the 
reproach with which she had been cast off. 
Her father had once called her a heartless 
little beast, and now, though decidedly scared, 
she was as stiff and cold as if the description 
had been just. She was not even frightened 
enough to cry, which would have been a 
tribute to her mother's wrongs; she was 
only, more than anything else, curious about 
the opinion mutely expressed by their com- 
panions. Taking the earliest opportunity to 



 115 

question Mrs. Wix on this subject, she elicited 
the remarkable reply : '* Well, my dear, it 's 
her ladyship's game ; and we must just hold 
on like grim death." Maisie, at her leisure, 
could interpret these ominous words. Her 
reflections indeed at this moment thickened 
apace, and one of them made her sure that 
her governess had conversations, private, ear- 
nest and not infrequent, with her frivolous 
stepfather. She perceived in the light of a 
second episode that something beyond her 
knowledge had taken place in the house. 
The things beyond her knowledge — numer- 
ous enough in truth — had not hitherto, she 
believed, been the things that were nearest to 
her; she had even had in the past a small, 
snug conviction that in the domestic laby- 
rinth she always kept the clew. This time 
too, however, she at last found out ; with the 
discreet aid, it had to be confessed, of Mrs. 
Wix. Sir Claude's own assistance was ab- 
ruptly taken from her for his comment on 
her ladyship's game was to start on the spot, 
quite alone, for Paris; evidently because he 
wished to show a spirit when accused of posi- 
tive wickedness. He might be fond of his 
stepdaughter, Maisie felt, without wishing her 
to be, after all, thrust on him in such a way. 



ii6 

His absence therefore, it was clear, was a 
protest against the thrusting. It was while 
this absence lasted that our young lady 
finally discovered what had happened in 
the house to be that her mother was no 
longer in love. 

The limit of a passion for Sir Claude had 
certainly been reached, she judged, some 
time before the day on which her ladyship 
burst suddenly into the schoolroom to in- 
troduce Mr. Perriam, who, as she announced 
from the doorway to Maisie, wouldn't be- 
lieve his ears that one had a great hoiden 
of a daughter. Mr. Perriam was short and 
massive — Mrs. Wix remarked afterwards 
that he was distinctly fat ; and it would have 
been difficult to say of him whether his head 
were more bald or his black moustache more 
bushy. He seemed also to have moustaches 
over his eyes, which, however, by no means 
prevented these polished little globes from 
rolling round the room as if they had been 
billiard-balls impelled by Ida's celebrated 
stroke. Mr. Perriam wore on the hand that 
pulled his moustache a diamond of dazzling 
lustre, in consequence of which and of his 
general weight and mystery our young lady 
observed on his departure that if he had 



/ 



 117 

only had a turban he would have been quite 
her idea of a heathen Turk. 

" He 's quite my idea," Mrs. Wix replied, 
" of a heathen Jew." 

** Well, I mean," said Maisie, " of a person 
who comes from the East" 

"That's where he must come from" her 
governess opined. " He comes from the 
City." In a moment she added as if she 
knew all about him : " He 's one of those 
people who have lately broken out. He'll 
be immensely rich." 

"On the death of his papa?" the child 
interestedly inquired. 

"Dear, no — nothing hereditary. I mean' 
he has made a lot of money." 

"How much, do you think?" Maisie de- 
manded. 

Mrs. Wix reflected and sketched it. " Oh, 
many millions." 

" A hundred?" said her questioner. 

Mrs. Wix was n't sure of the number, but 
there were enough of them to have seemed 
to warm up for the time the penury of the 
schoolroom, to linger there as an afterglow 
of the hot, heavy light Mr. Perriam sensibly 
shed. This was also, no doubt, on his part, 
an effect of that enjoyment of life with which, 



ii8 

among her elders, Maisie had been in contact 
from her earliest years — the sign of happy 
maturity, the old familiar note of overflowing 
cheer. *' How d' ye do, ma'am, how d' ye 
do, little miss?" — he laughed and nodded 
at the gaping figures. ' " She has brought me 
up for a peep — it's true I wouldn't take 
you on trust. She 's always talking about 
you, but she would never produce you: so 
to-day I challenged her on the spot. Well, 
you ain't a myth, my dear ; I back right down 
on that," the visitor went on to Maisie ; " nor 
you, either, miss, though you might be, to be 
ire ! " 

" I bored him with you, darling — I bore 
every one," Ida said; "and to prove that 
you are a sweet thing, as well as a fearfully 
old one, I told him he could judge for him- 
self. So now he sees that you *re a dreadful 
bouncing business and that your poor old 
mummy's at least sixty!" — and her lady- 
ship smiled at Mr. Perriam with the charm 
that her daughter had heard imputed to her 
at papa's by the merry gentleman who had 
so often wished to get from him what they 
called a *' rise." Her manner at that instant 
gave the child a glimpse more vivid than any 
yet enjoyed of the attraction that papa, in re- 



 119 

markable language, always denied she could 
put forth. 

Mr. Perriam, however, clearly recognized it 
in the grace with which he met her. " I 
never said you ain't wonderful. Did I ever 
say it, hey? " — and he appealed with pleas- 
ant confidence to the testimony of the school- 
room, about which itself also he evidently 
felt that he ought to have something to say. 
" So this is their little place, hey ? Charm- 
ing, charming, charming ! " he repeated as he 
vaguely looked round. The interrupted stu- 
dents clung together as if they had been 
personally exposed ; but Ida relieved their em- 
barrassment by a hunch of her high shoulders. 
This time the smile she addressed to Mr. 
Perriam had a beauty of sudden sadness. 
" What on earth 's a poor woman to do? " 

The visitor's grimace grew more marked 
as he continued to look, and the conscious 
little schoolroom felt still more like a cage at 
a menagerie. " Charming, charming, charm- 
ing ! " Mr. Perriam insisted ; but the paren- 
thesis closed with a prompt click. "There 
you are ! " said her ladyship. " Bye-bye ! " 
she sharply added. The next minute they 
were on the stairs, and Mrs. Wix and her 
companion, at the open door and looking 



120 

mutely at each other, were reached by the 
sound of the ample current that carried them 
back to their life. 

It was singular perhaps, after this, that 
Maisie never put a question about Mr. Per- 
riam, and it was still more singular that by 
the end of a week she knew all she did n't 
ask. What she most particularly knew — 
and the information came to her, unsought, 
straight from Mrs. Wix — was that Sir Claude 
would n't at all care for the visits of a million- 
naire who was in and out of the upper rooms. 
How little he would care was proved by the 
fact that under the sense of them Mrs. Wix's 
discretion broke down altogether; she was 
capable of a transfer of allegiance — capable, 
at the altar of propriety, of a desperate sacri- 
fice of her ladyship. As against Mrs. Beale, 
she more than once intimated, she had been 
willing to do the best for her, but as against 
Sir Claude she could do nothing for her at all. 
It was extraordinary the number of things 
that, still without a question, Maisie knew by 
the time her stepfather came back from Paris 
— came bringing her a splendid apparatus 
for painting in water-colors and bringing 
Mrs. Wix, by a lapse of memory that would 
have been droll if it had not been a trifle 



 121 

disconcerting, a second and even more ele- 
gant umbrella. He had forgotten all about 
the first, with which, buried in as many- 
wrappers as a mummy of the Pharaohs, she 
would n't for the world have done anything 
so profane as use it. Maisie knew, above all, 
that though she was now, by what she called 
an informal understanding, on Sir Claude's 
"side," she had not yet uttered a word to 
him about Mr. Perriam. That gentleman be- 
came therefore a kind of flourishing public 
secret, out of the depths of which governess 
and pupil looked at each other portentously 
from the time their friend was restored to 
them. He was restored in great abundance, 
and it was marked that though he appeared 
to have felt the need to take a stand against 
the risk of being too roughly saddled with 
the offspring of others, he at this period ex- 
posed himself more than ever before to the 
presumption of having created expectations. 
If it had become now, for that matter, a 
question of sides, there was at least a certain 
amount of evidence as to where they all were. 
Maisie, of course, in such a delicate position, 
was on nobody's ; but Sir Claude had all the 
air of being on hers. If therefore Mrs. 
Wix was on Sir Claude's, her ladyship on Mr. 



122 

Perriam's, and Mr. Perriam presumably o^a 
her ladyship's, this left only Mrs. Beale and 
Mr. Farange to account for. Mrs. Beale 
clearly was, like Sir Claude, on Maisie's, and 
papa, it was to be supposed, on Mrs. Beale's. 
Here indeed was a slight ambiguity, as papa's 
being on Mrs. Beale's did n't somehow seem 
to place him quite on his daughter's. It 
sounded, as this young lady thought it over, 
very much like puss-in-the-corner, and she 
could only wonder if the distribution of par- 
ties would lead to a rushing to and fro and a 
changing of places. She was in the presence, 
she felt, of restless change. Was n't it rest- 
less enough that her mother and her step- 
father should already be on different sides? 
That was the great thing that had domesti- 
cally happened. Mrs. Wix, besides, had 
turned another face; she had never been 
exactly gay, but her g^ravity was now an atti- 
tude as conspicuous as a poster. She seemed 
to sit there in her new dress and brood over 
her lost delicacy, which had become almost 
as doleful a memory as that of poor Clara 
Matilda. " It is hard for him," she often 
said to her companion ; and it was surprising 
how competent on this point Maisie was con- 
scious of being to agree with her. Hard as 



 123 

it was, however, Sir Claude had never shown 
to greater advantage than in the gallant, gene- 
rous, sociable way he carried it off — away 
that drew from Mrs. Wix a hundred expres- 
sions of relief at his not having suffered it to 
embitter him. It threw him more and more, 
at last, into the schoolroom, where he had 
plainly begun to recognize that if he was 
to have the credit of perverting the innocent 
child he might also at least have the 
amusement. He never came into the place 
without telling its occupants that they were 
the nicest people in the house — a remark 
which always led them to say to each other, 
** Mr. Perriam ! " as loud as ever compressed 
lips and enlarged eyes could make them 
articulate. He caused Maisie to remember 
what she had said to Mrs. Beale about his 
having the nature of a good nurse and — 
rather more than she intended before Mrs. 
Wix — to bring the whole thing out by once 
remarking to him that none of her good nurses 
had smoked quite so much in the nursery. 
This had no more effect than it was meant to 
on his cigarettes: he was always smoking, 
but always declaring that it was death to him 
not to lead a domestic life. 

He led one, after all, in the schoolroom, 



124 

and there were hours of late evening, when 
she had gone to bed, that Maisie knew he sat 
there talking with Mrs. Wix of how to meet 
his difficulties. His consideration for this 
unfortunate woman even in the midst of 
them continued to show him as the perfect 
gentleman and lifted the object of his cour- 
tesy into an upper air of beatitude in which 
her very pride had the hush of anxiety. 
'' He leans on me — he leans on me ! " she 
only announced from time to time ; and she 
was more surprised than amused when, later 
on, she accidentally found she had given her 
pupil the impression of a support literally 
supplied by her person. This glimpse of a 
misconception led her to be explicit — to 
put before the child, with an air of mourning 
indeed for such a stoop to the common, that 
what they talked about in the small hours, as 
they said, was the question of his taking right 
hold of life. The life she wanted him to take 
right hold of was the public ; " she," I hasten 
to add, was, in this connection, not the mistress 
of his fate, but only Mrs. Wix herself. She 
had phrases about him that were full of ten- 
derness, yet full of morality. " He's a won- 
derful nature, but he can't live like the lilies. 
He 's all rights you know, but he must have a 



1 



 125 

high interest." She had more than once re- 
marked that his affairs were sadly involved, 
but that they must get him — Maisie and she 
together apparently — into Parliament. The 
child took it from her with a flutter of impor- 
tance that Parliament was his natural sphere, 
and she was the less prepared to recognize a 
hindrance as she had never heard of any 
affairs whatever that were not involved. She 
had, in the old days, once been told by Mrs. 
Beale that her very own were, and, with the 
refreshment of knowing that she had affairs, 
the information had n't in the least over- 
whelmed her. It was true, and perhaps a little 
alarming, that she had never heard of any 
such matters since then. Full of charm, at 
any rate, was the prospect of some day get- 
ting Sir Claude in ; especially after Mrs. 
Wix, as the fruit of more midnight colloquies, 
once went so far as to observe that she really 
believed it was all that was wanted to save 
him. Mrs. Wix, with these words, struck her 
pupil as cropping up, after the manner of 
mamma when mamma talked, quite in a new 
place ; and the child stared as at the jump of 
a kangaroo. 

** Save him from what? " 

Mrs. Wix hesitated ; then she covered a 



126 

still greater distance. *' Why, my dear, just 
from awful misery." 



XII 

She had at the moment not explained her 
ominous speech, but the light of remarkable 
events soon enabled her companion to read 
it. It may indeed be said that these days 
brought on a high quickening of Maisie's 
direct perceptions, of her gratified sense of 
arriving by herself at conclusions. This was 
helped by an emotion intrinsically far from 
sweet — the increase of the alarm that had 
most haunted her meditations. She had no 
need to be told, as on the morrow of the 
revelation of Sir Claude's danger she was told 
by Mrs. Wix, that her mother wanted more 
and more to know why the devil her father 
did n't send for her. She had too long ex- 
pected that mamma's curiosity on this point 
would break out with violence. Maisie could 
meet such pressure so far as meeting it was 
to be in a position to reply, in words directly 
inspired, that papa would be hanged before 
he 'd again be saddled with her. She there- 
fore recognized the hour that in troubled 



 127 

glimpses she had long foreseen, the hour 
when — the phrase for it came back to her 
from Mrs. Beale — with two fathers, two 
mothers and two homes, six protections in 
all, she shouldn't know "wherever" to go. 
Such apprehension as she felt on this score 
was not diminished by the fact that Mrs. Wix 
herself was suddenly white with terror — a 
circumstance leading Maisie to the further 
knowledge that this lady was still more 
scared on her own behalf than on that of her 
pupil. A governess who had only one frock 
was not likely to have either two fathers or 
two mothers ; accordingly, if even with these 
resources Maisie was to be in the streets, 
where in the name of all that was dreadful 
was poor Mrs. Wix to be? She had had, 
it appeared, a tremendous brush with Ida, 
which had begun and ended with the request 
that she would be pleased, on the spot, to 
" bundle." It had come suddenly, but com- 
pletely, this signal of which she had gone in 
fear. The companions confessed to each 
other their long foreboding, but Mrs. Wix 
was better off than Maisie in having a plan 
of defence. She declined indeed to commu- 
nicate it till it was quite mature ; but mean- 
while, she hastened to declare, her feet were 



128 

firm in the schoolroom. They could only be 
loosened by force ; she would " leave " for the 
police, perhaps, but she wouldn't "leave" 
for mere outrage. That would be to play 
her ladyship's game, and it would take 
another turn of the screw to make her desert 
her darling. Her ladyship had come down 
with extraordinary ferocity : it had been one 
of many symptoms of a situation strained — 
"between them all," as Mrs. Wix said, " but 
especially between the two " — to the point 
of God only knew what ! 

Her description of the crisis made the child 
reflect. "Between which two? — papa and 
mamma?" 

" Dear, no. I mean between your mother 
and himy 

Maisie, in this, recognized an opportunity 
to be really deep. " Him? — Mr. Perriam? " 

She fairly brought a blush to the scared 
face. "Well, my dear, I must say that what 
you dofit know ain't worth mentioning. 
That it won't go on forever with Mr. Perriam 
— since I must meet you — who can sup- 
pose? But I meant dear Sir Claude." 

Maisie stood corrected rather than abashed. 
"I see. But it's about Mr. Perriam he's 
angry?" 



 129 

Mrs. Wix hesitated. " He says he 's 
not" 

" Not angry? He has told you so? " 

Mrs. Wix looked at her hard. " Not about 
him." 

" Then about some one else ? " 

Mrs. Wix looked at her harder. " About 
some one else." 

" Lord Eric?" the child promptly brought 
forth. 

At this, of a sudden, her governess was 
more agitated. " Oh, why, little unfortunate, 
should we discuss their dreadful names?" — 
and she threw herself for the millionth time 
on Maisie's neck. It took her pupil but a 
moment to feel that she quivered with insecu- 
rity, and, the contact of her terror aiding, the 
pair, in another instant, were sobbing in each 
other's arms. Then it was that, completely 
relaxed, demoralized as she had never been, 
Mrs. Wix suffered her wound to bleed and 
her resentment to gush. Her great bitter- 
ness was that Ida had called her false, de- 
nounced her hypocrisy and duplicity, reviled 
her spying and tattling, her lying and grovel- 
ling to Sir Claude. " Me, me I " the poor 
woman wailed, " who Ve seen what I Ve seen 
and gone through everything only to cover 

9 



130 

her up and ease her off and smooth her 
down ! If I Ve been an 'ipocrite it 's the 
other way round : I Ve pretended to him and 
to her, to myself and to you and to every 
one, not to see ! It serves me right to have 
held my tongue before such horrors ! " What 
horrors they were her companion forbore 
too closely to inquire, showing even signs 
not a few of an ability to take them for 
granted. That put the couple more than 
ever, in this troubled sea, in the same boat, 
so that with the consciousness of ideas on 
the part of her fellow-mariner Maisie could 
sit close and wait. Sir Claude on the morrow 
came in to tea, and then the ideas were pro^ 
duced. It was extraordinary how the child's 
presence drew out their full richness. The 
principal one was startling, b\it Maisie appre- 
ciated the courage with which her governess 
handled it. It simply consisted of the pro- 
posal that whenever and wherever they 
should take refuge Sir Claude should consent 
to share their asylum. On his protesting 
with all the warmth in nature against this 
note of secession she asked what else in the 
world was left to them if her ladyship should 
stop supplies. 

** Supplies be hanged, my dear woman ! " 



 131 

said their delightful friend. " Leave supplies 
to me — I '11 take care of supplies." 

Mrs. Wix hesitated. " Well, it *s exactly 
because I knew you 'd be so glad to do so 
that I put the question before you. There 's 
a way to look after us better than any other. 
That way is just to come with us." 

It hung before Maisie, Mrs. Wix's way, 
like a glittering picture, and she clasped her 
hands in ecstasy. "Come with us — come 
with us ! " she echoed. 

Sir Claude looked from his stepdaughter 
back to her governess. " Do you mean 
leave this house and take up my abode with 
you?" 

"It will be the right thing — if you feel 
as you Ve told me you feel." Mrs. Wix, sus- 
tained and uplifted, was now as clear as a 
bell. 

Sir Claude had the air of trying to recall 
what he had told her; then the light broke 
that was always breaking to make his face 
more pleasant. " It 's your suggestion that 
I shall take a house for you?" 

" For the wretched homeless child. Any 
roof — owet our heads — will do for us; but 
of course for you it will have to be something 
really nice." 



132 

Sir Claude's eyes reverted to Maisie rather 
hard, as she thought ; and there was a shade 
in his very smile that seemed to show her — 
though she also felt it did n't show Mrs. Wix 
— that the accommodation prescribed must 
loom to him pretty large. The next mo- 
ment, however, he laughed gayly enough. 
" My dear lady, you exaggerate tremen- 
dously my poor little needs." Mrs. Wix had 
once mentioned to her young friend that 
when Sir Claude called her his dear lady 
he could do anything with her ; and Maisie 
felt a certain anxiety to see what he would 
do now. Well, he only addressed her a 
remark of which the child herself was aware 
of feeling the force. "Your plan appeals 
to me immensely ; but of course — don't 
you see } — I shall have to consider the posi- 
tion I put myself in by leaving my wife." 

"You'll also have to remember," Mrs. 
Wix replied, "that if you don't look out 
your wife won't give you time to consider. 
Her ladyship will leave ^(7«." 

"Ah, my good friend, I do look out," 
the young man returned while Maisie helped 
herself afresh to bread and butter. " Of 
course if that happens I shall have somehow 
to turn round ; but I hope with all my heart 



;/ 



 133 

it won't I beg your pardon," he continued 
to his stepdaughter, "for appearing to dis- 
cuss that sort of possibility under your sharp 
little nose. But the fact is that I forget half 
the time that Ida is your sainted mother." 

" So do I ! " said Maisie, to put him the 
more in the right. 

Her protectress, at this, was upon her 
again. " The little desolate, precious pet ! " 
For the rest of the conversation she was 

' enclosed in Mrs. Wix's arms, and as they 

sat there interlocked Sir Claude, before them 
with his teacup, looked down at them in 
deepening thought. Shrink together as they 
might they could n't help, Maisie felt, being 
a very massive image, a large, loose, ponder- 

' ous presentment of what Mrs. Wix required 

, of him. She knew moreover that this lady 

did n't make it better by adding in a moment : 
" Of course we should n't dream of a whole 
house. Any sort of little lodging, however 
humble, would be only too blessed." 

" But it would have to be something that 
would hold us all," said Sir Claude. 

" Oh, yes," Mrs. Wix concurred ; " the 
whole point is our being together. While 
you 're waiting, before you act, for her lady- 

^ ship to take some step, our position here 



134 

will come to an impossible pass. You don't 
know what I went through with her for you 
yesterday — and for our poor darling; but 
it's not a thing I can promise you often 
to face again. She has dismissed me in 
horrible language — she has instructed the 
servants not to wait on me." 

" Oh, the poor servants are all right ! " Sir 
Claude eagerly cried. 

*' They *re certainly better than their mis- 
tress! It's too dreadful that I should sit 
here and say of your wife, Sir Claude, and 
of Maisie's own mother, that she's lower 
than a domestic; but my being betrayed 
into such remarks is just a reason the more 
for our getting away. I shall stay till I'm 
taken by the shoulders, but that may happen 
any day. What also may perfectly happen, 
you must permit me to repeat, is that she '11 
go off to get rid of us." 

" Oh, if she '11 only do that ! " Sir Claude 
laughed. " That would be the very making 
of us ! " 

"Don't say it— don't say it!" Mrs. Wix 
pleaded. " Don't speak of anything so fatal ! 
You know what I mean. We must all cling 
to the right. You must n't be bad." 

Sir Claude set down his teacup ; he had 



 135 

become more grave and he pensively wiped 
his moustache. " Won't all the world say 
I'm awful if I leave the house before — 
before she has bolted? They'll say it was 
my doing that made her bolt." 

Maisie could grasp the force of this rea- 
soning, but it offered no check to Mrs. Wix. 
" Why need you mind that — if you 've done 
it for so high a motive? Think of the beauty 
of it," the good lady pressed. 

" Of bolting with you?'* Sir Claude ejacu- 
lated. 

She faintly smiled — she even faintly col- 
ored. " So far from doing you harm it will 
do you the highest good. Sir Claude, if 
you *11 listen to me, it will save you." 

" Save me from what? " 

Maisie, at this question, waited with re- 
newed suspense for an answer that would 
bring the thing to a finer point than their 
companion had brought it to before. But 
there was, on the contrary, only more mys- 
tification in Mrs. Wix's reply. "Ah, from 
you know what ! " 

" Do you mean from some other woman?" 

" Yes — from a real bad one." 

Sir Claude, at least, the child could see, 
was not mystified; so little, indeed, that a 



136 

smile of intelligence broke afresh in his 
eyes. He turned them in vague discomfort 
to Maisie, and then something in the way 
she met them caused him to chuck her 
playfully under the chin. It was not till 
after this that he good-naturedly met Mrs. 
Wix. " You think me worse than. I am." 

" If that were true," she returned, " I 
would n*t appeal to you. I do. Sir Claude, 
in the name of all that's good in you — 
and, oh, so earnestly! We can help each 
other. What you '11 do for our young friend 
here I need n*t say. That is n't even what I 
want to speak of now. What I want to speak 
of is what you'll get — don't you see? — 
from such an opportunity to take hold. 
Take hold of us — take hold of her. Make 
her your duty — make her your life: she'll 
repay you a thousand-fold ! " 

It was to Mrs. Wix, during this appeal, 
that Maisie's contemplation transferred it- 
self — partly because, though her heart was 
in her throat for trepidation, she felt a cer- 
tain delicacy about appearing herself to press 
the question; partly from the coercion of 
seeing Mrs. Wix come out as Mrs. Wix 
had never come before — not even on the 
day of her call at Mrs. Beale's with the news 



 137 

of her mamma's marriage. On that day 
Mrs. Beale had surpassed her in dignity; 
but nobody could have surpeissed her now. 
There was, in fact at this moment a fasci^ 
nation for her pupil in the hint she seemed 
to give that she had still more of that sur- 
prise behind. So the sharpened sense of 
spectatorship was the child's main support — 
the long habit, from the first, of seeing her- 
self in discussion, and finding in the fury 
of it — she had had a glimpse of the game 
of football — a sort of compensation for the 
doom of a peculiar passivity. It gave her 
often an odd air of being present at her his- 
tory in as separate a mode as if she could 
only get at experience by flattening her 
nose against a pane of glass. Such she felt 
to be the application of her nose while she 
waited for the efTect of Mrs. Wix's eloquence. 
Sir Claude, however, did n't keep her long in 
a position so ungraceful: he sat down and 
opened his arms to her as he had done the 
day he came for her at her father's, and while 
he held her there, looking at her kindly, but 
as if their companion had brought the blood 
a good deal to his face, he said : '' Dear Mrs. 
Wix is magnificent, but she's rather too 
grand about it. I mean the ' situation isn't 



138 

after all quite so desperate or quite so sim- 
ple. But I give you my word before her, 
and I give it to her before you, that I'll 
never, never forsake you. Do you hear that, 
old fellow? and do you take it in? I'll 
stick to you through everything." Maisie 
did take it in — took it with a long tremor 
of all her little being; and then, as, to 
emphasize it, he drew her closer, she buried 
her head on his shoulder and cried without 
sound and without pain. While she was 
so engaged she became aware that his own 
breast was agitated, and gathered from it 
with rapture that his tears were as silently 
flowing. Presently she heard a loud sob 
from Mrs. Wix — Mrs. Wix was the only 
one who made a noise. 

She was to have made, for some time, 
none other but this, though within a few 
days, in conversation with her pupil, she 
described her relations with Ida as posi- 
tively excruciating. There was as yet never- 
theless no attempt to eject her by force, and 
she recognized that Sir Claude, taking such 
a stand as never before, had intervened with 
passion and success. As Maisie remembered 
— and remembered wholly without disdain — 
that he had told her he was afraid of her 



 139 

ladyship, the little girl took this act of reso- 
lution as a proof of what, in the spirit of the 
engagement sealed by all their tears, he was 
really prepared to do. Mrs. Wix spoke to 
her of the pecuniary sacrifice by which she 
herself purchased the scant security she en- 
joyed and which, if it was a defence against 
the hand of violence, was far from making 
her safe from private aggression. Didn't 
her ladyship find every hour of the day 
some insidious means to humiliate and tram- 
ple upon her? There was a quarter's salary 
owing her — a great name, even Maisie could 
suspect, for a small matter : she should never 
see it as long as she lived, but keeping quiet 
about it put her ladyship, thank Heaven, a 
little in one's power. Now that he was do- 
ing so much else she could never have the 
grossness to apply for it to Sir Claude. He 
had sent home for schoolroom consumption 
a huge frosted cake, a wonderful delectable 
mountain with geological strata of jam, which 
might with economy see them through many 
days of their siege ; but it was none the less 
known to Mrs. Wix that his affairs were 
more and more involved, and her fellow-par- 
taker looked back tenderly, in the light of 
these involutions, at the expression of face 



140 

with which he had greeted the. proposal 
that he should set up another establishment. 
Maisie felt that if their maintenance should 
hang but by a thread they must still demean 
themselves with the highest delicacy. What 
he was doing was simply acting without 
delay, so far as his embarrassments per- 
mitted, on the inspiration of his elder friend. 
There was at this season a wonderful month 
of May — as soft as a drop of the wind 
in a gale that had kept one awake — when 
he took out his stepdaughter with a fresh 
alacrity and they rambled the great town in 
search, as Mrs. Wix called it, of combined 
amusement and instruction. 

They rode on the top of 'busses ; they vis- 
ited outlying parks; they went to cricket- 
matches where Maisie fell asleep ; they tried 
a hundred places for the best one to have 
tea: this was his direct way of rising to 
Mrs. Wix's admirable lesson — of making 
his little accepted charge his duty an^ his 
life. They dropped, under incontroll^ble im- 
pulses, into shops that they agreed were too 
big, to look at things that they agreed were 
too small, and it was during these hours that 
Mrs. Wix, alone at home, but a subject of 
regretful reference as they pulled off their 



 141 

gloves for refreshment, subsequently de- 
scribed herself as most exposed to the blows 
that her ladyship had achieved such inge- 
nuity in dealing. She again and again re- 
peated that she would not so much have 
minded having her "attainments" held up 
to scorn and her knowledge of every subject 
denied if she were not habitually denounced 
to her face as the basest of her sex. There 
was by this time no pretence on the part 
of any one of denying it to be fortunate 
that her ladyship habitually left London 
every Saturday and was more and more dis- 
posed to a return late in the week. It was 
almost equally public that she regarded as 
a preposterous " pose " and indeed as a 
direct insult to herself her husband's atti- 
tude of staying behind to look after a child 
for whom the most elaborate provision had 
been made. If there was a type Ida de- 
spised, Sir Claude communicated to Maisie, 
it was the man who pottered about town of 
a Sunday ; and he also mentioned how often 
she had declared to him that if he had a grain 
of spirit he would be ashamed to accept a 
menial position about Mr. Farange's daughter. 
It was her ladyship's contention that he was 
in craven fear of his predecessor — otherwise 



142 

he would recognize it as an obligation of 
plain decency to protect his wife against the 
outrage of that person's barefaced attempt 
to swindle her. The swindle was that Mr. 
Farange put upon her the whole intolerable 
burden ; " and even when I pay for you my- 
self," Sir Claude averred to his young friend, 
" she accuses me the more of truckling and 
grovelling." It was Mrs. Wix's conviction, 
they both knew, arrived at on independent 
grounds, that Ida's weekly excursions were 
feelers for a more considerable absence. If 
she came back later each week the week 
would be sure to arrive when she would n*t 
come back at all. This appearance had of 
course much to do with Mrs. Wix's actual 
valor. Could they but hold out long 
enough the snug little home with Sir Claude 
would find itself informally constituted. 



XIII 

This might moreover have been taken to be 
the sense of a remark made by her step- 
father as — one rainy day when the streets 
were all splash and two umbrellas unsociable 
and the wanderers had sought shelter in the 



f 

/ 



 143 

, National Gallery — Maisie sat beside him 
staring rather sightlessly at a roomful of 
pictures which he had mystified her much 
by speaking of with a bored sigh as a 
" silly superstition." They represented, with 
patches of gold and cataracts of purple, with 
stiff saints and angular angels, with ugly 
Madonnas and uglier babies, strange prayers 
and prostrations; so that she at first took 
his words for a protest against devotional 
idolatry — all the more that he had of late 
come often with her and with Mrs. Wix to 
morning church, a place of worship of Mrs. 
Wix's own choosing, where there was noth- 
ing of that sort, no halos on heads, but only, 
during long sermons, beguiling backs of bon- 
nets, and where, as her governess always 
afterwards observed, he gave the most ear- 
nest attention. It presently appeared, how- 
ever, that his reference was merely to the 
affectation of admiring such ridiculous works. 
— an admonition that she received from him 
as submissively as she received everything. 
What turn it gave to their talk need not here 
be recorded: the transition to the colorless 
schoolroom and lonely Mrs. Wix was doubt- 
less an effect of relaxed interest in what was 
before them. Maisie expressed in her own 



144 

way the truth that she never went home 
nowadays without expecting to find the 
temple of her studies empty and the poor 
priestess cast out. This conveyed a full 
appreciation of her peril, and it was in re- 
joinder that Sir Claude uttered, acknowledg- 
ing the source of that peril, the reassurance 
at which I have glanced. " Don't be afraid, 
my dear: I've squared her." It required 
indeed a supplement when he saw that it 
left the child momentarily blank, " I mean 
that your mother lets me do what I want so 
long as I let her do what she wants." 

**So you are doing what you want?" 
Maisie asked. 

** Rather, Miss Farange." 

Miss Farange turned it over. " And she 's 
doing the same ? " 

" Up to the hilt." 

Again she considered. " Then, please, 
what may it be?" 

" I would n't tell you for the whole world." 

She gazed at a gaunt Madonna ; after which 
she broke out into a slow smile. " Well, I 
don't care — so long as you do let her ! " 

" Oh, you monster ! " laughed Sir Claude, 
getting up. 

Another day, in another place, a place in 



^IC 



 145 

Baker Street, where at a hungry hour she 
had sat down with him to tea and buns, he 
brought out a question disconnected from 
previous talk. ** I say, you know — what do 
you suppose your father would do ? " 

Maisie had not long to cast about nor to 
question his pleasant eyes. *' If you were 
really to go with us? He would make a 
great complaint." 

He seemed amused at the term she 
employed. " Oh, I should n't mind a 
' complaint' " 

" He would talk to every one about it," 
said Maisie. 

" Well, I should n't mind that either." 

"Of course not," the child hastened to 
respond. " You 've told me you *re not afraid 
of him." 

" The question is, are you ? " said Sir 
Claude. 

Maisie candidly considered; then she 
spoke resolutely. " No — not of papa." 

" But of somebody else? " 

" Certainly, of lots of people." 

"Of your mother, first and foremost, of 
course." 

"Dear, yes; more of mamma than of — 

than of—" 

10 



146 

" Than of what?" Sir Claude asked as she 
hesitated for a comparison. 

She thought over all the objects of dread. 
" Than of a wild elephant ! " she at last sug- 
gested. " And you are too," she reminded 
him as he laughed. 

" Oh, yes ; I am too." 

Again she meditated. "Then why did 
you marry her? " 

" Just because I was afraid." 

" Even when she loved you? " 

" That made her the more alarming ! " 

For Maisie herself, though her companion 
seemed to find it droll, this opened up depths 
of gravity. " More alarming than she is 
now?" 

" Well, in a different way. Alarm, unfor- 
tunately, is a very big thing, and there's a 
great variety of kinds." 

She took this in with complete intelligence, 
" Then I think I Ve got them all." 

** You ? " her friend cried. " Nonsense ! 
You 're thoroughly game." 

" I *m awfully afraid of Mrs. Beale," Maisie 
insisted. 

He raised his smooth brows. " That 
charming woman?" 

" Well," she answered, *' you can't under- 



 147 

stand it, because you're not in the same 
state." 

She had been going on with a luminous 
" But," when, across the table, he laid his 
hand on her arm. '* I can understand it," he 
confessed. " I am in the same state." 

" Oh, but she likes you so ! " Maisie eagerly 
argued. 

Sir Claude literally colored, "That has 
something to do with it" 

Maisie wondered again. " Being liked 
with being afraid?" 

" Yes ; when it amounts to adoration." 

" Then why aren't you afraid oimef^^ 

" Because with you it amounts to that? " 
He had kept his hand on her arm. " Well, 
what prevents is simply that you 're the 
gentlest spirit on earth. Besides — " he 
pursued; but he came to a pause. 

"Besides—?" 

"I should be in fear if you were older — 
there! See? — you already make me talk 
nonsense," the young man added. "The 
question 's about your father. Is he likewise 
afraid of Mrs. Beale? " 

" I think not And yet he loves her," 
Maisie mused. 

" Oh, no — he does n't ; not a bit ! " After 



148 

which, as his companion stared, Sir Claude 
apparently felt that he must make his 
announcement fit with her recollections. 
" There 's nothing of that sort nowy 

But Maisie only stared the more. 
** They 've changed? " 

" Like your mother and me." 

She wondered how he knew. "Then 
you Ve seen Mrs. Beale again? " 

He hesitated. " Oh, no. She has written 
to me," he presently pursued. " She *s not 
afraid of your father either. No one at all is 
— really." Then he went on, while Maisie's 
little mind, with its filial spring too relaxed, 
from of old, for a pang at this want of 
parental majesty, speculated on the vague 
relation between Mrs. Beale's courage and the 
question, for Mrs. Wix and herself, of a neat 
lodging with their friend. ** She would n't 
care a bit if Mr. Farange should make a 



row." 



"Do you mean about you and me and 
Mrs. Wix? Why should she care? It 
would n't hurt her." 

Sir Claude, with his legs out and his hand 
diving into his trousers' pocket, threw back 
his head with a laugh just perceptibly tem- 
pered, as she thought, by a sigh. " My dear 



^ 



 149 

stepchild, you 're delightful ! Look here, 
we must pay. You 've had five buns? " 

" How can you ? " Maisie demanded, crim- 
son under the eye of the young woman who 
had stepped to their board. " I Ve had 
three." 

Shortly after this Mrs. Wix looked so ill 
that it was to be feared her ladyship had 
treated her to some unexampled passage. 
Maisie asked if anything worse than usual 
had occurred, whereupon the poor woman 
brought out with infinite gloom : " He has 
been seeing Mrs. Beale ! " 

"Sir Claude?" The child remembered 
what he had said. "Oh, no — not seeing 
her ! " 

" I beg your pardon. I absolutely know 
it." Mrs. Wix was as positive as she was 
dismal. 

Maisie nevertheless ventured to challenge 
her. "And how, please, do you know it?" 

She faltered a moment. " From herself. 
I've been to see her." Then, on Maisie's 
visible surprise, " I went yesterday while 
you were out with him. He has seen her 
repeatedly." 

It was not wholly clear to Maisie why Mrs. 
Wix should be prostrate at this discovery; 



ISO 

but her general consciousness of the way 
things would be both perpetrated and re- 
sented always eased off for her the strain 
of any particular mystery. " There may be 
some mistake. He says he hasn't." 

Mrs. Wix turned paler, as if this were a still 
deeper ground for alarm. "He says so? — 
he denies that he has seen her? " 

" He told me so three days ago. Perhaps 
she 's mistaken," Maisie suggested. 

"Do you mean perhaps she lies? She lies 
whenever it suits her, I 'm very sure. But I 
know when people lie. That's what I've 
loved in you: you never do. Mrs. Beale 
didn't yesterday at any rate. He has seen 
her." 

Maisie was silent a little. " He says not," 
she then repeated. " Perhaps — perhaps — " 
Once more she paused. 

" Do you mean perhaps he lies?" 

" Gracious goodness, no ! " Maisie shouted. 

Mrs. Wix's bitterness, however, again over- 
flowed. " He does, he does ! " she cried, 
"and it's that that's just the worst of it! 
They '11 take you, they '11 take you, and what 
in the world will then become of me? " She 
threw herself afresh upon her pupil and wept 
over her with the inevitable effect of causing 



X 



 151 

the child's own tears to flow. But Maisie 
could not have told you if she had been cry- 
ing at the image of their separation or at that 
of Sir Claude's untruth. As regards this 
deviation it was agreed between them that 
they were not in a position to bring it home 
to him. Mrs. Wix was in dread of doing 
anything to make him, as she said, " worse ; " 
and Maisie was sufficiently initiated to be 
able to reflect that in speaking to her as he 
had done he had only wished to be tender of 
Mrs. Beale. It fell in with all her inclinations 
to think of him as tender, and she forbore to 
let him know that the two ladies had, as she 
would never do, betrayed him. 

She had not long to keep her secret, for 
the next day, when she went out with him, 
he suddenly said in reference to some errand 
he had first proposed: "No, no; we won't 
do that — we '11 do something else ! " On 
this, a few steps from the door, he stopped a 
hansom and helped her in; then, following 
her, he gave the driver, over the top, an 
address that she lost. When he was seated 
beside her she asked him where they were 
going ; to which he replied : " My dear child, 
you'll see." She saw, while she watched 
and wondered, that they took the direction of 



152 

the Regent's Park ; but she did n*t know why 
he should make a mystery of that, and it was 
not till they passed under a pretty arch and 
drew up at a white house in a terrace, from 
which the view, she thought, must be lovely, 
that, mystified, she clutched him and broke 
out: ** I shall see papa?" 

He looked down at her with a kind smile. 
" No ; probably not I have n't brought you 
for that." 

"Then, whose house is it?" 

" It 's your father's. They 've moved here." 

She looked about; she had known Mr. 
Farange in four or five houses, and there was 
nothing astonishing in this except that it was 
the nicest place yet. " But I shall see Mrs. 
Beale?" 

" It 's to see her that I brought you." 

She stared, very white and with her hand 
on his arm; though they had stopped she 
kept him sitting in the cab. " To leave me, 
do you mean?" 

He hesitated. "It's not for me to say if 
you can stay. We must look into it." 

"But if I do I shall see papa? " 

" Oh, some time or other, no doubt" Then 
Sir Claude went on : " Have you really so 
very great a dread of that?" 



1« 



 153 

Maisie glanced away over the apron of the 
cab — gazed a minute at the green expanse 
of the Regent's Park; and at the moment, 
coloring to the roots of her hair, she felt the 
small rush of an emotion more mature than 
any she had yet known. It consisted of a 
sudden sense of shame at placing in an in- 
ferior light, to so perfect a gentleman and so 
charming a person as Sir Claude, so very 
near a relative as Mr. Farange. She remem- 
bered, however, her friend's telling her that 
no one was seriously afraid of her father, and 
she turned round with a brave toss of her 
head. "Oh, I dare say I can manage 
him ! " 

Sir Claude smiled, but she noticed that the 
violence with which she had just changed 
color had brought into his own face a slight 
compunctious and embarrassed flush. It was 
as if he had caught his first glimpse of her 
sense of responsibility. Neither of them 
made a movement to get out, and after an 
instant he said to her : " Look here, if you 
say so, we won't, after all, go in." 

" Ah, but I want to see Mrs. Beale ! " the 
child murmured. 

" But what if she does decide to take you? 
Then, you know, you '11 have to remain." 



154 

Maisie turned it over. "Straight on — 
and give you up?" 

" Well — I don't quite know about giving 
me up." 

" I mean as I gave up Mrs. Beale when I 
last went to mamma's. I could n't do with- 
out you here for anything like so long a time 
as that." It struck her as a hundred years 
since she had seen Mrs. Beale, who was on 
the other side of the door they were so near 
and whom she yet had not taken the jump to 
clasp in her arms. 

" Oh, I dare say you '11 see more of me 
than you 've seen of Mrs. Beale. It is n't in 
me to be so beautifully discreet," Sir Claude 
said. " But all the same," he continued, ** I 
leave the thing, now that we 're here, abso- 
lutely with you. You must settle it. We '11 
only go in if you say so. If you don't say 
so, we '11 turn right round and drive away." 

"So that in that case Mrs. Beale .won't 
take me? " 

" Well — not by any act of ours." 

" And I shall be able to go on with 
mamma?" Maisie asked. 

" Oh, r don't say that ! " 

She considered. ** But I thought you said 
you had squared her." 



 155 

Sir Claude made an odd sound which 
turned into a laugh. "Not, my dear child, 
to the point she now requires ! " 

"Then if she turns me out and I don't 
come here — ? " 

Sir Claude promptly took her up. " What 
do I offer you? you naturally inquire. My 
poor chick, that 's just what I ask myself. I 
don't see it, I confess, quite as straight as 
Mrs. Wix." 

His companion gazed a moment at what 
Mrs. Wix saw. " You mean we can't make a 
little family?" 

" It's very base of me, no doubt — but I 
can't wholly chuck your mother." 

Maisie, at this, emitted a low but length- 
ened sigh, a meagre note of reluctant assent, 
which would certainly have been amusing to 
an auditor; " Then there is n't anything 
else?" 

" I vow I don't quite see what there is." 

Maisie waited a moment. Her silence 
seemed to signify that she too had no al- 
ternative to suggest. But she made another 
appeal. " If I come here you '11 come and 
see me?" 

" I won't lose sight of you." 

" But how often will you come? " As he 



156 

hung fire she pressed him. " Often and 
often?" 

Still he faltered. " My dear old woman — ! " 
he began; then he paused again, going on 
the next moment with a change of tone. 
"You're too funny! Yes, then," he said, 
"often and often." 

"All right" — and Maisie jumped out of 
the cab. Mrs. Beale was at home, but not 
in the drawing-room, and when the butler 
had gone for her the child suddenly broke 
out : " But when I 'm here what will Mrs. 
Wix do?" 

"Ah, you should have thought of that 
sooner ! " said her companion with the first 
faint hint of asperity she had ever heard him 
produce. 



XIV 

Mrs. Beale fairly swooped upon her, and 
the effect of the whole hour was to put be- 
fore her how much, how quite formidably 
indeed after all, she was loved. This was 
the more the case as her stepmother, so 
changed — in the very manner of her mother 
— that she really struck her as a new ac- 



 157 

quaintance, somehow recalled more famil- 
iarity than Maisie could feel. A rich, strong, 
expressive affection, in short, pounced upon 
her in the shape of a handsomer, nobler, 
older Mrs. Beale. It was like making a fine 
friend, and they had n*t been a minute to- 
gether before she felt elated at the way she 
had met the choice imposed upon her in the 
cab. There was a whole future in the com- 
bination of Mrs. Beale's beauty and Mrs. 
Beale's hug. She seemed to Maisie charm- 
ing to behold, and also to have no connection 
at all with anybody who had once had meals 
in the nursery and mended underclothing. 
The child knew one of her father's wives 
was a woman of fashion, but she had always 
dimly made a distinction, not applying that 
epithet without reserve to the other. Mrs. 
Beale, since their separation, had acquired 
a conspicuous right to it, and Maisie's first 
flush of response to her present delight col- 
ored all her splendor with meanings that, 
this time, were sweet. She had told Sir 
Claude that she was afraid of the lady in 
the Regent's Park; but she was not too 
much afraid to rejoice aloud on the very 
spot. "Why, aren't you beautiful? Isn't 
she beautiful. Sir Claude — isn't she?" 



158 

"•n»e handsomest woman in London, 
simply," Sir Claude gallantly replied. " Just 
as you 're the best little girl ! " 

Well, the handsomest woman in London 
gave herself up with tender, lustrous looks 
and every demonstration of fondness to a 
happiness at last recovered. There was al- 
most as vivid a bloom in her maturity as in 
mamma's, and it took her but a short time 
to give her little friend an impression of 
positive power — an impression that opened 
up there like a new source of confidence. 
This was a perception on Maisie's part that 
neither mamma, nor Sir Claude, nor Mrs. 
Wix, with their immense and so varied re- 
spective attractions, had exactly kindled and 
that made an immediate difference when the 
talk, as it promptly did, began to turn to 
her father. Oh yes, Mr. Farange was a 
complication, but she saw now that he 
would not be one for his daughter. For 
Mrs. Beale certainly he was an immense 
one; she speedily made known as much: 
but Mrs. Beale from this moment presented 
herself to Maisie as a person to whom a 
great gift had come. The great gift was 
just for handling complications. Maisie ob- 
served how little she made of them when. 



 159 

4 

after she had dropped, to Sir Claude, some 
reference to a previous meeting he ex- 
claimed with an air of consternation and yet 
with something of a laugh that he had de- 
nied to their companion their having, since 
the day he came for her, seen each other till 
that moment. 

Mrs. Beale diffused surprise. "Why did 
you do anything so silly? " 

" To protect your reputation." 

"From Maisie?" Mrs. Beale was much 
amused " My reputation with Maisie is too 
good to suffer." 

" But you believed me, you rascal, did n't 
you ? " Sir Claude asked of the child. 

She looked at him — she smiled. "Her 
reputation did suffer. I discovered you had 
been here." 

He was not too chagrined to laugh. 
" The way, my dear, you talk of that sort of 
thing ! " 

"How should she talk," Mrs. Beale in- 
quired, "after all this ruinous time with 
her mother?" 

" It was not mamma who told me," Maisie 
explained. " It was only Mrs. Wix." She 
was hesitating whether to bring out before 
Sir Claude the source of Mrs. Wix's infor- 



i6o 

mation when Mrs. Beale, addressing the 
young man, showed her the vanity of her 
scruples. 

"Do you know that preposterous person 
came to see me a day or two ago ? — when 
I told her that I had seen you repeatedly." 

Sir Claude, this time, was disconcerted. 
" The old cat ! She never told me. Then you 
thought I lied?" he demanded of Maisie. 

She was flurried by the term with which 
he had qualified her patient friend, but she 
felt the occasion to be one to which she must 
in every way lend herself. " Oh, I did n't 
mind ! But Mrs. Wix did," she added with 
an intention benevolent to her governess. 

Her intention was not very effective as 
regards Mrs. Beale. " Mrs. Wix is too idi- 
otic ! " that lady declared. 

" But to you, of all people," Sir Claude 
asked, "what had she to say?" 

" Why, that, like Mrs. Micawber — whom 
she must, I think, rather resemble — she will 
never, never, never desert Miss Farange." 

" Oh, I *11 make that all right ! " Sir Claude 
cheerfully returned. 

" I 'm sure I hope so, my dear man," said 
Mrs. Beale, while Maisie wondered just how 
he would proceed. Before she had time to 



 i6i 

ask Mrs. Beale continued: "That's not all 
she came to do, if you please. But you'll 
never guess the rest." 

" Shall / guess it? " Maisie threw in. 

Mrs. Beale was again amused. ** Why, 
you 're just the person ! It must be quite 
the sort of thing you 've heard at your 
awful mother's. Have you never seen women 
there crying to her to * spare ' the men they 
love?" 

Maisie, wondering, tried to remember; 
but Sir Claude was freshly diverted. " Oh, 
they don't trouble about Ida! Mrs. Wix 
cried to you to spare mef^* 

" She regularly went down on her knees 
to me." 

"The darling old dear! " the young man 
exclaimed. 

These words were a joy to Maisie — they 
made up for his previous description of Mrs. 
Wix. ** And will you spare him ? " she 
asked of Mrs. Beale. 

Her stepmother, seizing her and kissing 
her again, seemed charmed with the tone 
of her question. " Not an inch of him ! 
I '11 pick him to the bone ! " 

** You mean then he '11 really come often? " 

Maisie pressed. 

II 



i62 

Mrs. Beale turned lovely eyes to Sir 
Claude. " That 's not for me to say — it *s 
for him." 

He said nothing for the time, however ; with 
his hands in his pockets and vaguely hum- 
ming a tune — even Maisie could see he was 
a little nervous — he only walked to the win- 
dow and looked out at the Regent's Park. 
" Well, he has promised," Maisie said. " But 
how will papa like it? " 

"His being in and out? Ah, that's a 
question that, to be frank with you, my dear, 
hardly matters. In point of fact, however, 
Beale greatly enjoys the idea that Sir Claude 
too, poor man, has been forced to quarrel 
with your mother." 

Sir Claude turned round and spoke gravely 
and kindly. " Don't be afraid, Maisie ; you 
won't lose sight of me." 

" Thank you so much ! " Maisie was ra- 
diant. " But what I meant — don't you 
know? — was what papa would say to 
me'* 

** Oh, I 've been having that out with him," 
said Mrs. Beale — " he *11 behave well enough. 
You see the great difficulty is that, though 
he changes every three days about every- 
thing else in the world, he has never changed 



^ 



 163 

about your mother. It 's a caution, the way 
he hates her." 

Sir Claude gave a short laugh. " It cer- 
tainly can't beat the way she still hates him ! " 

** Well," Mrs. Beale went on obligingly, 
" nothing can take the place of that feeling 
with either of them, and the best way they 
can think of to show it is for each to leave 
you as long as possible on the hands of the 
other. There 's nothing, as you Ve seen for 
yourself, that makes either so furious. It 
is n't, asking so little as you do, that you 're 
much of an expense or a trouble ; it 's only 
that you make each feel so well how nasty 
the other wants to be. Therefore Beale goes 
on loathing your mother too much to have 
any great fury left for any one else. Besides, 
you know, I've squared him." 

" Oh Lord ! " Sir Claude cried with a louder 
laugh and turning again to the window. 

" / know how ! " Maisie was prompt to 
return. " By letting him do what he wants 
on condition that he lets you also do it." 

" You 're too delicious, my own pet ! " — 
she was involved in another hug. " How in 
the world have I got on so long without you ? 
I 've not been happy, love," said Mrs. Beale 
with her cheek to the child's. 



i64 

" Be happy now ! '* Maisie throbbed with 
shy tenderness. 

" I think I shall be. You '11 save me." 

" As I 'm saving Sir Claude ? " the little girl 
precipitated. 

Mrs. Beale, a trifle surprised, appealed to 
her visitor. "Is she really?" 

He showed high amusement at Maisie's 
question. " It 's dear Mrs. Wix's idea. There 
may be something in it." 

"He makes me his duty — he makes me 
his life," Maisie continued to her stepmother. 

" Why, that 's what / want to do ! " And 
Mrs. Beale, so anticipated, turned pink with 
astonishment. 

" Well, you can do it together. Then he 41 
have to come ! " 

Mrs. Beale by this time had her young 
friend fairly in her lap ; she smiled up at Sir 
Claude. " Shall we do it together? " 

His laughter had dropped and for a mo- 
ment he turned his handsome, serious face 
not to his hostess, but to his stepdaughter. 
"Well, it's rather more decent than some 
things. Upon my soul, the way* things are 
going, it seems to me the only decency ! " 
He had the air of arguing it out to Maisie, 
of presenting it, through an impulse of con- 



 165 

science, as a connection in which they could 
honorably see her participate; though this 
plea of mere " decency " might well have 
appeared to fall below her rosy little vision. 
** If we 're not good for you," he exclaimed, 
** I '11 be hanged if I know who we shall be 
good for ! '* 

Mrs. Beale showed the child an intenser 
radiance. " I dare say you will save us — 
from one thing and another." 

" Oh, I know what she '11 save me from ! " 
Sir Claude roundly declared. "There'll be 
rows, of course," he went on. 

Mrs. Beale quickly took him up. " Yes, 
but they'll be nothing — for you, at least — 
to the rows your wife makes as it is. I can 
bear what / suffer — I can't bear what you 
do." 

" We 're doing a good deal for you, you 
know, young woman," Sir Claude went on to 
Maisie with the same gravity. 

His little charge glowed with a sense of 
obligation and the eagerness of her desire it 
should be known how little was lost on her. 
" Oh, I know ! " 

" Then you must keep us all right ! " This 
time he laughed. 

" How you talk to her ! " cried Mrs. Beale. 



i66 

" No worse than you ! " he gayly rejoined. 

" Handsome is that handsom^ does ! " she 
exclaimed in the same spirit. " You can 
take off your things," she went on, releasing 
Maisie. 

The child, on her feet, was all emotion. 
" Then I 'm just to stop — this way? " 

** It will do as well as any other. Sir 
Claude, to-morrow, will have your things 
brought." 

" I '11 bring them myself. Upon my word 
I *11 see them packed ! " Sir Claude promised. 
" Come here and unbutton." 

He had beckoned his young companion to 
where he sat and he helped to disengage her 
from her coverings while Mrs. Beale, from a 
little distance, smiled at the hand he dis- 
played. " Thei^ 's a stepfather for you ! I 'm 
bound to say, you know, that he makes up 
for the want of other people." 

"He makes up for the want of a good 
nurse ! " Sir Claude laughed. " Don't you re- 
member I told you so the very first time ? " 

"Remember? It was exactly what made 
me think so well of you ! " 

" Nothing would induce me," the young 
man said to Maisie, " to tell you what made 
me think so well of her!' Having divested 



 167 

the child he kissed her gently and gave her a 
little pat to make her stand off. The pat was 
accompanied with a vague sigh, in which his 
gravity of a moment before came back. " All 
the same, if you had n't had the fatal gift of 
beauty — " 

** Well, what?" Maisie asked, wondering 
why he paused. It was the first time she had 
heard of her beauty. 

** Why, we should n't all be thinking so 
well of each other ! " 

" He is n't speaking of personal loveli- 
ness — you 're not lovely in person, my dear, 
at all," Mrs. Beale explained. "He's just 
talking of plain, dull charm of character." 

" Her character 's the most extraordinary 
thing in all the world," Sir Claude com- 
municated to Mrs. Beale. 

" Oh, I know all about that sort of thing ! " 
— she fairly bridled with the knowledge. 

It gave Maisie somehow a sudden sense of 
responsibility, from which she sought refuge. 
" Well, you 've got it too, ' that sort of 
thing ' — you *ve got the fatal gift, you both 
really have ! " she broke out. 

" Beauty of character? My dear boy, we 
have n't a penn3nvorth ! " Sir Claude protested. 

" Speak for yourself, sir ! " leaped lightly 



i68 

from Mrs. Beale. " I 'm good and I 'm 
clever. What more do you want? For 
you, I'll spare your blushes and not be 
personal — I'll simply say that you're as 
handsome as you can stick together." 

" You 're both very lovely ; you can't get 
out of it ! " — Maisie felt the need of carrying 
her point " And it 's beautiful to see you 
together." 

Sir Claude had taken his hat and stick ; he 
stood looking at her a moment. " You 're a 
comfort in trouble! But I must go home 
and pack." 

"And when will you come back? — to- 
morrow, to-morrow?" 

" You see what we 're in for ! " he said to 
Mrs. Beale* 

" Well, / can bear it," she replied, " if you 
can." 

Their companion gazed from one of them 
to the other, thinking that though she had 
been happy indeed between Sit Claude and 
Mrs. Wix, she should evidently be happier 
still between Sir Claude and Mrs. Beale. 
But it was like being perched on a prancing 
horse, and she made a movement to hold on 
to something. " Then, you know, sha'n't I 
bid good-bye to Mrs. Wix?" 



 169 

" Oh, I '11 make it all right with her," said 
Sir Claude. 

Maisie considered. " And with mamma? " 

" Ah, mamma ! " he sadly laughed. 

Even for the child this was scarcely am- 
biguous ; but Mrs. Beale endeavored to con- 
tribute to its clearness. ** Your mother will 
crow, she '11 crow — " 

" Like the early bird ! " said Sir Claude as 
she looked about for a comparison. 

" She '11 need no consolation," Mrs. Beale 
went on, "for having made your father grandly 
blaspheme." 

Maisie stared. "Will he grandly blas- 
pheme?" It sounded picturesque, almost 
scriptural, and her question produced a 
fresh play of caresses, in which Sir Claude 
also engaged. She wondered meanwhile 
who, if Mrs. Wix was disposed of, would 
represent in her life the element of geog- 
raphy and anecdote; and she presently 
surmounted the delicacy she felt about ask- 
ing. " Won't there be any one to give me 
lessons?" 

Mrs. Beale was prepared with a reply that 
struck her as absolutely magnificent. " You 
shall have such lessons as you 've never had 
in all your life. You shall go to courses." 



170 

"Courses?" Maisie had never heard of 
such things. 

" At institutions — on subjects." 

Maisie continued to stare. " Subjects ? " 

Mrs. Beale was really splendid. " All the 
most important ones. French literature — 
and sacred history. You '11 take part in 
classes — with awfully smart children.' 

" I *m going to look thoroughly into the 
whole thing, you know ; " and Sir Claude, 
with characteristic kindness, gave her a nod 
of assurance accompanied by a friendly wink. 

But Mrs. Beale went much further. ** My 
dear child, you shall attend lectures." 

The horizon was suddenly vast, and Maisie 
herself felt the smaller for it " All alone? " 

" Oh, no ; I '11 attend them with you," said 
Sir Claude. " They '11 teach me a lot I don't 
know." 

" So they will me," Mrs. Beale gravely ad- 
mitted. "We'll go with her together — it 
will be charming. It 's ages," she confessed 
to Maisie, "since I've had any time for 
study. That's another sweet way in which 
you '11 be a motive to us. Oh, won't the 
good she '11 do us be immense ? " she broke 
out uncontrollably to Sir Claude. 

He weighed it ; then he replied : " That 's 



 171 

certainly our idea." Of this idea Maisie 
naturally had less of a grasp, but it inspired 
her with almost equal enthusiasm. If in so 
bright a prospect there would be nothing to 
long for, it followed that she would n't long 
for Mrs. Wix ; but her consciousness of her 
assent to the absence of that fond figure 
caused a pair of words that had often 
sounded in her ears to ring in them again. 
It showed her in short what her father had 
always meant by calling her mother a " low 
sneak " and her mother by calling her father 
one. She wondered if she herself should n't 
be a low sneak in learning to be so happy 
without Mrs. Wix. What would Mrs. Wix 
do? where would Mrs. Wix go? Before 
Maisie knew it, and at the door, as Sir 
Claude was off, these anxieties, on her 
lips, grew articulate and her stepfather 
had stopped long enough to answer them. 
** Oh, 1 11 square her ! " he said ; and with 
this he departed. 

Face to face with Mrs. Beale she gave a 
sigh of relief, looking round at what seemed 
to her the dawn of a higher order. ** Then 
every one will be squared ! * she peacefully 
said. On which her stepmother affection- 
ately bent over her again. 



172 



XV 



It was Susan Ash who came to her with 
the news. " He *s downstairs, miss, and he 
do look beautiful." 

In the schoolroom at her father's, which 
had pretty blue curtains, she had been mak- 
ing out at the piano a lovely little thing, 
as Mrs. Beale called it, a " Moonlight Ber- 
ceuse" sent her through the post by Sir 
Claude, who considered that her musical 
education had been deplorably neglected 
and who, the last months at her mother's, 
had been on the point of making arrange- 
ments for regular lessons. She knew from 
him familiarly that the real thing, as he 
said, was shockingly dear and that anything 
else was a waste of money, and she therefore 
rejoiced the more at the sacrifice represented 
by this composition, of which the price, five 
shillings, was marked on the cover and which 
was evidently the real thing. She was now 
on her feet in an instant. " Mrs. Beale has 
sent up for me?" 

** Oh, no — it 's not that," said Susan Ash. 
" Mrs. Beale has been out this hour." 

"Then papa? " 



 173 

" Dear no — not papa. You '11 do, miss, 
all but them loose 'airs," Susan went on. 
" Your papa never came *ome at all," she 
added. 

"From where?" Wondering a little ab- 
sently and very excitedly, Maisie gave a wild 
manual brush of her locks. 

" Oh, that, miss, I should be very sorry 
to tell you ! I 'd rather tuck away that white 
thing behind — though I 'm blessed if it's my 
work." 

" Do then, please. I know where papa 
was," Maisie continued impatiently. 

*' Well, in your place I would n't tell." 

" He was at the club — the Chrysanthe- 
mum. So ! " 

"All night long? Why, the flowers shut 
up at night, you know ! " cried Susan Ash. 

" Well, I don't care " — the child was at 
the door. " Sir Claude asked for me all 
alone ? " 

" The same as if you was a duchess." 

Maisie was aware on her way downstairs 
that she was now quite as happy as one, 
and also, a moment later, as she hung round 
his neck, that even such a personage would 
scarce commit herself more grandly. There 
was moreover a hint of the duchess in the 



174 

infinite point with which, as she felt, she 
exclaimed : ** And this is what you call com- 
ing often? " 

Sir Claude met her, delightfully, in the 
same fine spirit. " My dear old man, don't 
make me a scene — I assure you it's what 
every woman does that I look at. Let us 
have some fun — it *s a lovely day : clap on 
something smart and come out with me — 
then we *11 talk it over quietly." They were 
on their way five minutes later to Hyde 
Park, and nothing that even in the good 
days at her mother's they had ever talked 
over had more of the perfection of security 
than his present prompt explanations. He 
was at his best in such an office and with 
the exception of Mrs. Wix the only person 
she had met in her life who ever explained. 
With him, however, the act had an authority 
transcending the wisdom of woman. It all 
came back, all the plans that always failed, 
all the rewards and bribes that she was 
perpetually paying for in advance and per- 
petually out of pocket by afterwards — the 
whole complication to be dealt with intro- 
duced her on each occasion afresh to the 
question of money. Even she herself al- 
most knew how it would have expressed the 



 175 

strength of his empire to say that to shuffle 
away her sense of being duped he had only 
from under his lovely moustache to breathe 
upon it. It was somehow in the nature of 
plans to be expensive and in the nature of 
the expensive to be impossible. To be 
** involved " Was of the essence of every- 
body's affairs, and also at every particular 
moment to be more involved than usual. 
This had been the case with Sir Claude's, 
with papa's, with mamma's, with Mrs. Beale's, 
and with Maisie's own at the particular mo- 
ment, a moment of several weeks, that had 
elapsed since our young lady had been re- 
established at her father's. There was n't 
** two-and-tuppence " for anything or for any 
one, and that was why there had been no 
sequel to the classes in French literature 
with all the smart little girls. It was devilish 
awkward, did n't she see ? to try without 
even the modest sum mentioned to mix her 
up with a remote array that glittered be- 
fore her after this as the children of the 
Rich. She was to feel henceforth as if she 
were fliattening her nose upon the hard win- 
dow-pane of the sweet-shop of knowledge. 
If the classes, however, that were select and 
accordingly the only ones were impossibly 



176 

dear, the lectures at the institutions — at 
least at some of them — were directly ad- 
dressed to the intelligent poor, and it there- 
fore had to be easier still to produce on the 
spot the reason why she had been taken to 
none. This reason. Sir Claude said, was 
that she happened to be just going to be, 
though indeed they had nothing to do with 
that in now directing their steps to the banks 
of the Serpentine. Maisie's own park, in the 
north, had been nearer at hand; but they 
rolled westward in a hansom because at the 
end of the sweet June days that was the 
direction taken by every one any one looked 
at. They cultivated for an hour, on the Row 
and by the Drive, this opportunity for each 
observer to amuse and for one of them in- 
deed not a little hilariously to mystify the 
other, and before the hour was over Maisie 
had elicited in reply to her sharpest challenge 
a further account of her friend's long absence. 

" Why I Ve broken my word to you so 
dreadfully — promising so solemnly and then 
never coming? Well, my dear, that's a ques- 
tion that, not seeing me day after day, you 
must very often have put to Mrs. Beale." 

" Oh, yes," the child replied ; " again and 
again." 



 177 

"And what has she told you? " 

" That you 're as bad as you 're beautiful." 

" Is that what she says? " 

" Those very words." 

" Ah, the dear old soul ! " Sir Claude was 
much diverted, and his loud, clear laugh was 
all his explanation. Those were just the 
words Maisie had last heard him use about 
Mrs. Wix. She clung to his hand, which was 
encased in a pearl-gray glove ornamented 
with the thick black lines that, at her 
mother's, always used to strike her as con- 
nected with the way the bestitched fists of the 
long ladies carried, with the elbows well out, 
their umbrellas upside down. The mere 
sense of it in her own covered the ground 
of loss just as much as the ground of gain. 
His presence was like an object brought so 
close to her face that she could n't see round 
its edges. He himself, however, remained 
showman of the spectacle even after they 
had passed out of the park and begun, under 
the charm of the spot and the season, to stroll 
in Kensington Gardens. What they had left 
behind them was, as he said, only a pretty 
bad circus, and, through engaging gates and 
over a bridge, they had come in a quarter 

of an hour, as he also remarked, a hundred 

12 



178 

miles from London. A great green glade 
was before them, and high old trees, and 
under the shade of these, in the fresh turf, 
the crooked course of a rural footpath. " It's 
the Forest of Arden," Sir Claude had just 
delightfully observed, " and I *m the banished 
duke, and you *re — what was the young 
woman called? — the artless country wench. 
And there," he went on, " is the other girl — 
what 's her name, Rosalind? — and (don't you 
know?) the fellow who was making up to her. 
Upon my word he is making up to her ! " 

His allusion was to a couple who, side by 
side, at the end of the glade, were moving in 
the same direction as themselves. These 
distant figures, in the slow stroll which kept 
them so close together that their heads, 
drooping a little forward, almost touched, 
presented the back of a lady who looked tall, 
who was evidently a very fine woman, and 
that of a gentleman whose left hand appeared 
to be passed well into her arm while his 
right, behind him, made jerky motions with 
the stick that it grasped. Maisie's fancy 
responded for an instant to her friend's idea 
that the sight was idyllic; then, stopping 
short, she brought out with all her clearness : 
" Why, mercy — if it is n't mamma !" 



 179 

Sir Claude paused with a stare. " Mamma? 
Why, mamma 's at Brussels ! " 

Maisie, with her eyes on the lady, wondered. 
"At Brussels?" 

" She 's gone to play a match." 

" At billiards ? You did n't tell me." 

" Of course I did n't ! " Sir Claude ejacu- 
lated. " There *s plenty I don't tell you. 
She went on Wednesday." 

The couple had added to their distance, 
but Maisie's eyes more than kept pace with 
them. " Then she has come back." 

Sir Claude watched the lady. " It 's much 
more likely she never went ! " 

" It *s mamma ! " the child said with 
decision. 

They had stood still, but Sir Claude had 
made the most of his opportunity and it hap- 
pened that just at this moment, at the end 
of the vista, the others halted and, still show- 
ing only their backs, seemed to stay talking. 
" Right you are, my duck ! " he exclaimed at 
last. " It 's my own sweet wife ! " 

He had spoken with a laugh, but he had 
changed color, and Maisie quickly looked 
away from him. " Then who is it with her?" 

" Blest if I know ! " said Sir Claude. 

"IsitMr. Perriam?" 



i8o 

" Oh, dear no — Perriam 's smashed." 

"Smashed?" 

" Exposed — in the City. But there are 
quantities of others ! " Sir Claude threw in. 

Maisie grouped them ; she studied the gen- 
tleman's back. " Then is this Lord Eric?" 

For a moment her companion made no 
answer, and when she turned her eyes again 
to him he was looking at her, she thought, 
rather queerly. " What do you know about 
Lord Eric?" 

She tried, innocently, to be odd in return. 
" Oh, I know more than you think ! Is it 
Lord Eric?" she repeated. 

" It may be. Blest if I care ! " 

Their friends had slightly separated, and 
now, as Sir Claude spoke, they suddenly 
faced round, showing all the splendor of her 
ladyship and all the mystery of her comrade. 
Maisie held her breath. " They're coming ! " 

** Let them come." And Sir Claude, pull- 
ing out his cigarettes, began to strike a 
light 

" We shall meet them?" the child asked. 

"No; they '11 meet «5." 

Maisie stood her ground. "They see us. 
Just look." 

Sir Claude threw away his match. " Come 



\ 



i 



/ 



 i8i 

straight on." The others, in the return, 
evidently startled, had half paused again, 
keeping now well apart. ** She 's horribly 
surprised and she wants to slope," he con- 
tinued. " But it's too late." 

Maisie advanced beside him, making out 
even across the interval that her ladyship 
was ill at ease. " Then what will she do ? " 

Sir Claude puffed his cigarette. " She 's 
quickly thinking." He appeared to enjoy it 

Ida had faltered but an instant ; her com- 
panion clearly gave her moral support. 
Maisie thought he somehow looked brave, 
and he had indeed no likeness whatever to 
Mr. Perriam. His face, thin and rather 
sharp, was smooth, and it was not till they 
came nearer that she saw he had a remark- 
ably fair little moustache. She could already 
see that his eyes were of the lightest blue. 
He was far nicer than Mr. Perriam. Mamma 
looked terrible from afar, but even under her 
guns the child's curiosity flickered and she 
appealed again to Sir Claude. " Is it — is it 
Lord Eric?" 

Sir Claude smoked composedly enough. 
" I think it 's the Baron." 

This was a happy solution — it fitted her 
idea of a Baron. But what idea, as she now 



i82 

came grandly on, did mamma fit? — unless 
that of an actress, in some tremendous situa- 
tion, sweeping down to the footlights as if 
she would jump them. Maisie felt really 
frightened and before she knew it had passed 
her hand into Sir Claude's arm. Her pressure 
caused him to stop, and at the sight of this 
the other couple came equally to a stand and, 
beyond the diminished space, remained a 
moment more in talk. This, however, was 
the matter of an instant; leaving the Baron 
apparently to come round more circuitously 
— an outflanking movement if Maisie had 
but known — her ladyship resumed the direct 
approach. " What will she do ? " her daugh- 
ter articulated. 

Sir Claude was now in a position to say. 
"Try to pretend it's me." 

"You?" 

" Why, that / *m up to something." 

In another minute poor Ida had justified 
this prediction, erect there before them like 
a figure of justice in full dress. There were 
parts of her face that grew whiter while 
Maisie looked, and other parts in which this 
change seemed to make other colors reign 
with more intensity. " What are you doing 
with my daughter?" she demanded of her 



\ 



 183 

husband; in spite of the indignant tone of 
which Maisie had a greater sense than ever 
in her life before of not being personally 
noticed. It seemed to her that Sir Claude 
also grew pale as an effect of the loud defi- 
ance with which Ida twice repeated this 
question. He put her, instead of answering 
it, an inquiry of his own : *' Who the devil 
have you got hold of now f* and at this her 
ladyship turned tremendously to the child, 
glaring at her as if she were an equal figure 
of guilt. Maisie received in petrifaction the 
full force of her mother's huge painted eyes 
— they were like Japanese lanterns swung 
under festive arches. But life came back to 
her from a tone suddenly and strangely soft- 
ened. " Go straight to that gentleman, my 
dear ; I Ve requested him to take you a few 
minutes. He *s charming — go, I Ve some- 
thing to say to tAis creature." 

Maisie felt Sir Claude immediately clutch 
her. " No, no — thank you ; that won't do. 
She's mine." 

"Yours?" It was confounding to Maisie 
to hear her speak quite as if she had never 
heard of Sir Claude before. 

" Mine; you 've given her up. You Ve not 
another word to say about her. I have her 



i84 

from her father," said Sir Claude — a state- 
ment that astonished his companion, who 
could also measure its lively action on her 
mother. 

There was visibly, however, an influence 
that made Ida consider ; she glanced at the 
gentleman she had left, who, having strolled 
with his hands in his pockets to some dis- 
tance, stood there with unembarrassed vague- 
ness. With her great hard eyes on him for 
a moment she smiled ; then she looked again 
at Sir Claude. ** I Ve given her up to her 
father to keep — not to get rid of by sending 
her about the town either with you or with any 
one else. If she 's not to mind me, let him 
come and tell me so. I decline to take it 
from another person, and you *re a fool to 
pretend that, with your hypocritical med- 
dling, you Ve a leg to stand on. I know 
your game, and I Ve something now to say to 
you about it." 

Sir Claude gave a squeeze of the child's 
arm. " Did n't I tell you she would have, 
Miss Farange?" 

"You're uncommonly afraid to hear it," 
Ida went on ; " but if you think she '11 pro- 
tect you from it you 're mightily mistaken." 
She meant what she said. " I '11 give her the 



 185 

benefit as soon as look at you. Should you 
like her to know, my dear?" Maisie had a 
sense of her launching this inquiry at him 
with effect; yet our young lady was also 
conscious of hoping that Sir Claude would 
reply in the affirmative. We have already 
learned that she had come to like people's 
liking her to " know." Before he could re- 
ply at all, however, her mother opened a pair 
of arms of extraordinary elegance, and then 
she felt the loosening of his grasp. " My 
own child," Ida murmured in a voice — a 
voice of sudden confused tenderness — that 
it seemed to her she heard for the first time. 
She wavered but an instant, thrilled with the 
first direct appeal, as distinguished from the 
mere maternal pull, she had ever had from 
lips that even in the old vociferous years 
had always been sharp. The next moment 
she was on her mother's breast, where, amid 
a wilderness of trinkets, she felt as if she had 
suddenly been thrust into a jeweller's shop- 
front, but only to be as suddenly ejected with 
a push and the brisk injunction : " Now go 
to the Captain ! " 

Maisie glanced at the gentleman submis- 
sively, but felt the want of more introduction. 
"The Captain?" 



i86 * 

Sir Claude broke into a laugh. " I told 
her he was the Baron." 

Ida stared ; she rose so superior that she 
was colossal. " You 're too utterly loath- 
some," she then ejaculated. "Be off! " she 
repeated to her daughter. 

Maisie started, moved backward and, look- 
ing at Sir Claude, *' Only for a moment," she 
said to him in her bewilderment. 

But he was too angry to heed her — too 
angry with his wife ; as she turned away she 
heard his anger break out. " You damned 

old b ! " She could n't quite hear all. 

But it was enough, it was too much : she fled 
before it, rushing even to a stranger in her 
terror of such a change of tone. 



xyi 

As she met the Captain's light blue eyes 
the greatest wonder occurred : she felt a sud- 
den relief at finding them reply with anxiety 
to the horror in her face. "What in the 
world has he done ? " He put it all on Sir 
Claude. 

" He has called her a damned old brute ! " 
She could n't help bringing that out. 



 187 

The Captain, at the same elevation as her 
ladyship, gaped wide; then of course, like 
every one else, he was convulsed. But he 
instantly caught himself up, echoing her 
bad words. "A damned old brute — your 
mother?" 

Maisie had already her second movement. 
" I think she tried to make him angry." 

The Captain's stupefaction was fine. " An- 
gry ? — she ? Why, she 's an angel ! " 

On the spot, as he said this, his face won 
her over ; it was so bright and kind and his 
blue eyes had such a reflection of some mys- 
terious grace that, for him at least, her mother 
had put forth. Her fund of observation en- 
abled her, as she gazed up at him, to place 
him : he was a candid, simple soldier, very 
brave — she came back to that — but at the 
same time very soft. At any rate he struck a 
note that was new to her and that after a moment 
made her say : " Do you like her very much ? " 

He smiled down at her, hesitating but look- 
ing pleasanter and pleasanter. " Let me tell 
you about your mother ! " 

He put out a big military hand which she 
immediately took, and they turned off to- 
gether to where a couple of chairs had been 
placed under one of the trees. " She told 



i88 

me to come to you," Maisie explained as 
they went; and presently she was close to 
him in one of the chairs, with the prettiest 
of pictures, the sheen of the lake through 
other trees before them and the sound of 
birds, the splash of boats, the play of children 
in the air. The Captain, inclining his mili- 
tary person, sat sideways, to be closer and 
kinder, and as her hand was on the arm of 
her seat he put his own down on it again 
to emphasize something he had to say that 
would be good for her to hear. He had 
already told her how her mother, from the 
moment of seeing her so unexpectedly with 
a person who was — well, not at all the right 
person, had promptly asked him to take 
charge of her while she herself tackled, as 
she said, the real culprit. He gave the child 
the sense of doing for the moment what he 
liked with her; ten minutes before she had 
never seen him, but she now could sit there 
touching him, impressed by him and think- 
ing it nice when a gentleman was thin and 
brown — brown with a kind of clear depth 
that made his straw-colored moustache almost 
white and his eyes resemble little pale flowers. 
The most extraordinary thing was the way 
she didn't seem for the time to mind Sir 



 189 

Claude's being " tackled." The Captain 
was n't a bit like him ; for it was an odd part 
of the pleasantness of mamma's friend that 
it resided in a manner in this friend's being 
ugly. An odder part still was that it pres- 
ently made our young lady, to classify him 
further, say to herself that of all people in 
the world he reminded her most insidiously 
of Mrs. Wix. He had neither straighteners 
nor a diadem nor, at least in the same place 
as the other, a button ; he was sunburnt and 
deep-voiced and smelt of cigars ; yet he mar- 
vellously had more in common with her old 
governess than with her young stepfather. 
What he had to say to her that was good for 
her to hear was that her poor mother, did n't 
she know? was the best friend he had ever 
had in all his life. And he added : " She 
has told me ever so much about you. I 'm 
awfully glad to know you." 

She had never, she thought, been so ad- 
dressed as a young lady; not even by Sir 
Claude the day so long ago that she found 
him with Mrs. Beale. It struck her as the 
way that, at balls, by delightful partners, 
young ladies must be spoken to in the in- 
tervals of dances ; and she tried to think of 
something that would meet it at the same 



190 

high point But this effort flurried her and 
all she could produce was : " At first, you 
know, I thought you were Lord Eric." 

The Captain looked vague. ** Lord Eric? " 

"And then Sir Claude thought you were 
the Baron." 

At this he resounded. " Why, the Baron's 
four foot high and as red as a lobster." 
Maisie laughed in return — the young lady 
at the bair certainly would — and was on the 
point, as conscientiously, of pursuing the sub- 
ject with an agreeable question. But before 
she could speak her companion asked her 
one. " Who in the world *s Lord Eric?" 

" Don't you know him? " — she judged her 
young lady would say that with light surprise. 

" Do you mean a fat man with his mouth 
always open? " She had to confess that their 
acquaintance was so limited that she could 
only describe the bearer of the name as a 
friend of mamma's; but a light suddenly 
came to the Captain, who quickly asserted 
that he knew her man. " What-do-you-call- 
him's brother — the fellow that owned ' Bobo- 
link * ? " Then, with all his niceness, he con- 
tradicted her flat. " Oh, dear no — your 
mother never knew him!* 

" But Mrs. Wix said so," the child risked. 



 191 

**Mrs.Wix?" 

" My old governess." 

This again seemed amusing to the Captain. 
"She mixed him up, your old governess. 
He's an awful beast. Your mother never 
looked at such a hog." 

He was as positive as he was friendly, but 
he dropped for a minute after this into a 
silence that gave Maisie, confused but in- 
genious, a chance to redeem the mistake of 
pretending to know too much by the humility 
of inviting further correction. " And does n't 
she know the Baron?" 

" Oh, I dare say. But he 's another ass." 
After which, abruptly, with a different look, 
* he put down again on the back of her 
own the hand he had momentarily removed. 
Maisie even thought he colored a little. " I 
want tremendously to speak to you. You 
must never believe any harm of your mother." 

"Oh, I assure you I dotit/*' she cried, 
blushing, herself, up to her eyes in a sudden 
surge of deprecation of such a thought. 

The Captain, bending his head, raised her 
hand to his lips with a benevolence that made 
her wish her glove had been nicer. " Of 
course you don't when you know how fond 
she is oiyouy 



192 

" She 's fond of me?" Maisie panted. 

" Tremendously. But she thinks you don't 
like hen You must like her. She has had 
too much to bear." 

" Oh, yes — I know ! " She rejoiced that 
she had never denied it. 

" Of course I Ve no right to speak of her 
except as a particular friend," the Captain 
went on. "But she's a splendid woman. 
She has never had any sort of justice." 

"Hasn't she?" — the child, to hear the 
words, felt a thrill altogether new. 

" Perhaps I ought n't to say it to you — 
but she has had everything to suffer." 

" Oh, yes — you can say it to me ! " Maisie 
hastened to profess. 

The Captain weighed this. "Well, you 
needn't tell. It's all {ox you — see?" 

Serious and smiling, she only wanted to take 
it from him. "It's between you and me? 
Oh, there are lots of things I 've never told." 

" Well, keep this with the rest. I assure you 
she has had the most infernal time, no matter 
what any one says to the contrary. She 's the 
cleverest woman I ever saw in all my life. 
She 's too charming." She had been touched 
already by his tone, and now she leaned back 
in her chair and felt something tremble within 



 193 

her. " She 's tremendous fun — she can do 
all sorts of things better than I Ve ever seen 
any one. She has the pluck of fifty — and 
I know : I assure you I do. She has the nerve 
for a tiger-shoot — by Jove, I 'd take her ! 
And she 's awfully open and generous, don't 
you know? — there are women that are such 
horrid sneaks. She 'd go through anything 
for any one she likes." He appeared to watch 
for a moment the effect on his companion of 
this emphasis ; then he gave a small sigh that 
mourned the limits of the speakable. But it 
was almost with the note of a challenge that 
he wound up : " Look here — she 's true ! " 

Maisie had so little desire to assert the con- 
trary that she found herself, in the intensity of 
her response, throbbing with a joy still less 
utterable than the essence of the Captain s 
appreciation. She was fairly hushed with the 
sense that he spoke of her mother as she had 
never heard any one speak. It came over her 
as she sat silent that, after all, this admiration 
and this respect were quite new words, which 
took a distinction from the fact that nothing in 
the least resembling them in quality had on 
any occasion dropped from the lips of her 
father, of Mrs. Beale, of Sir Claude or even 
of Mrs. Wix. What it appeared to her to 

13 






^ 



194 

come to was that, on the subject of her lady- 
ship, it was the first real kindness she had 
heard, so that at the touch of it something 
strange and deep and pitying surged up within 
her — a revelation that, practically and so far 
as she knew, her mother, apart from this, had 
only been disliked. Mrs. Wix's original 
account of Sir Claude's affection seemed as 
empty now as the chorus in a children's game, 
and the husband and wife, but a little way off 
at that moment, were face to face in hatred and 
with the dreadful name he had called her still 
in the air. What was it the Captain on the 
other hand had called her? — Maisie wanted 
to hear that again. The tears filled her eyes 
and rolled down her cheeks, which burned 
under them with the rush of a consciousness 
that for her too, five minutes before, the vivid, 
towering beauty whose onset she awaited had 
been for the moment an object of pure dread. 
She became indifferent on the spot to her 
usual fear of showing what in children was 
notoriously most offensive — she presented to 
her companion, soundlessly but hideously, her 
wet, distorted face. She cried, with a pang, 
straight at him, cried as she felt that she had 
never cried at any one in all her life. " Oh, 
do you love her? " she brought out with a gulp 



/ 



A 



 195 

that was the effect of her trying not to make 
a noise. 

It was doubtless another consequence of the 
thick mist through which she saw him that, in 
reply to her question, the Captain gave her 
such a queer blurred look. He hesitated ; yet 
in his voice there was also the ring of a great 
awkward insistence. '* Of course I *m tre- 
mendously fond of her — I like her better than 
any woman I ever saw. I don*t mind in the 
least telling you that," he went on ; " and I 
should think myself a great beast if I did." 
Then, to show that his position was superla- 
tively clear, he made her, with a kindness that 
even Sir Claude had never surpassed, tremble 
again as she had trembled at his first outbreak. 
He called her by her name, and her name 
drove it home. "My dear Maisie, your 
mother 's an angel ! " 

It was an almost incredible balm — it 
soothed so her impression of danger and 
pain. She sank back in her chair; she 
covered her face with her hands. "Oh, 
mother, mother, mother ! " she sobbed. She 
had a vague sense that the Captain, beside 
her, though more and more friendly, was by 
no means unembarrassed ; in a minute, how- 
ever, when her eyes were clearer, he was erect 



196 

in front of her, very red and nervously looking 

about him and whacking his leg with his stick. 

" Say you /oveiier, Mr. Captain — say it, say 

it ! " she implored. 

Mr. Captain's blue eyes fixed themselves 

very hard. " Of course I love her, damn it, 

you know." 

At this she also jumped up ; she had fished 

out somehow her pocket-handkerchief. " So 

do /, then — I do, I do, I do ! " she passion- 
ately cried. 

" Then will you come back to her? " 
Maisie, staring, stopped the tight little plug 

of her handkerchief on the way to her eyes. 

" She won't have me ! " 

** Yes, she will. She wants you." 

" Back at the house — with Sir Claude ? " 

Again he stopped. "No, not with him. 

In another place." 

They stood looking at each other with an 1 

intensity unusual as between a Captain and a J 

little girl. " She won't have me in any place." , 

" Oh yes, she will — if / ask her." 
Maisie's intensity continued. " Shall you 

be there?" 

The Captain's, on the whole, did the same. 

" Oh yes — some day." A 

" Then you don't mean now? " 



1 

i 



 197 

He broke into a quick smile. " Will you 
come now? — go with us for an hour?" 

Maisie considered. " She would n't have 
me even now." 

She could see that he had his idea, but that 
her tone impressed him. That disappointed 
her a little, though in an instant he rang out 
again. " She will if / ask her," he repeated. 
" I '11 ask her this minute." 

Maisie, turning at this, looked away to 
where her mother and her stepfather had 
stopped. At first, among the trees, nobody 
was visible; but the next moment she ex- 
claimed with expression: "It's over — here 
he comes ! " 

The Captain watched the approach of her 
ladyship's husband, who walked slow and 
composed across the grass, making, with his 
closed fingers, to Maisie, a little movement 
in the air. " I 've no desire to avoid him." 

'* Well, you mustn't see him," said Maisie. 

"Oh, he's in no hurry hinaself ! " Sir 
Claude had stopped to light another cigarette. 

She was vague as to the way it was proper 
he should feel ; but she had a sense that the 
Captain's remark was rather a free reflection. 
" Oh, he does n't care," she replied. 

" Does n't care for what? " 



198 

" Does n't care who you are. He told me 
so. Go and ask mamma/' she added. 

"If you can come with us? Very good. 
You really want me not to wait for him? " 

" Please don't." But Sir Claude was not 
yet near, and the Captain had with his left 
hand taken hold of her right, which he 
familiarly, sociably swung a little. " Only 
first," she continued, "tell me this. Are you 
going to live with mamma? " 

The immemorial note broke out at her 
seriousness. " One of these days." 

She wondered, wholly unperturbed by his 
laughter. " Then where will Sir Claude be ? " 

" He '11 have left her of course." 

" Does he really intend to do that?" 

" You have every opportunity to ask him." 

Maisie shook her head with decision. " He 
won't do it. Not first." 

Her " first " made the Captain resound 
again. " Oh, he '11 be sure to be nasty ! But 
I 've said too much to you." 

"Well, you know, I'll never tell," said 
Maisie. 

" No, it's all for yourself. Good-bye." 

" Good-bye." Maisie kept his hand long 
enough to add : " I like you^ too." And 
then supremely: " You do love her? " 



 199 

" My dear child — ! " The Captain wanted 
words. 

" Then don't do it only for just a little." 

"A little?" 

" Like all the others." 

" Like all the others? " — he stood staring. 

She pulled away her hand. " Do it al- 
ways ! " Then she bounded to meet Sir 
Claude and as she left the Captain she heard 
him sound out with apparent gayety : " Oh, 
I *11 keep it up ! " As she joined Sir Claude 
she perceived her mother, in the distance, 
move slowly off; and, glancing again at 
the Captain, saw him, swinging his stick, 
retreat in the same direction. 

She had never seen Sir Claude look as he 
looked just then ; flushed, yet not excited — 
settled rather in an immovable disgust and 
at once very sick and very hard. His con- 
versation with her mother had clearly drawn 
blood, and the child's old horror came back 
to her, producing the instant moral contrac- 
tion of the days when her parents had looked 
to her to feed their love of battle. Her great- 
est fear for the moment, however, was that 
her friend would see she had been crying. 
The next she became aware that he glanced 
at her and it presently occurred to her that 



200 

he didn't wish even to be looked at. At 
this she quickly removed her gaze, and 
he said rather curtly: "Well, who in the 
world is the fellow?" 

She felt 'herself flooded with prudence. 
'* Oh, / have n't found out ! " This sounded 
as if she meant he ought to have done so 
himself; but she could only face doggedly 
the ugliness of seeming disagreeable as she 
used to face it in the hours when her father, 
for her blankness, called her a dirty little 
donkey and her mother, for her falsity, pushed 
her out of the room. 

** Then what have you been doing all this 
time ? " 

** Oh, I don't know." It was of the essence 
of her method not to be silly by halves. 

" Then did n't the scoundrel say anything? " 
They had got down by the lake and were 
walking fast. 

" Well, not very much." 

" He did n't speak of your mother? " 

" Oh, yes, a little." 

"Then what I ask you, please, is hawJ^ 
She was silent a minute — so long that he 
presently went on : "I say, you know — 
don't you hear me?" 

At this she produced : " Well, I 'm afraid 
I did n't attend to him very much." 



 201 

Sir Claude, smoking rather hard, made no 
immediate rejoinder; but finally he ex- 
claimed: "Then, my dear, you were the 
perfection of an idiot ! " He was so irritated 

— or she took him to be — that for the rest 
of the time they were in the Gardens he spoke 
no other word; and she meanwhile subtly 
abstained from any attempt to pacify him. 
That would only lead to more questions. 
At the gate of the Gardens he hailed a four- 
wheeled cab and without meeting her con- 
scious eyes put her into it, only saying 
" Give him that I *' as he tossed half a crown 
upon the seat. Even when from outside he 
had closed the door and told the man w^here 
to go he never took her departing look. 
Nothing of this kind had ever yet happened 
to them, but it had no power to make her 
love him less, and she could not only bear it 

— she felt as she drove away that she could re- 
joice in it. It brought again the sweet sense 
of success that, ages before, she had had on 
an occasion when, on the stairs, returning 
from her father's, she had met a fierce ques- 
tion of her mother's with an imbecility as 
studied and had in consequence been dashed 
by Mrs. Farange almost to the bottom. 



202 



XVII 

If for reasons wholly her own she could 
bear the sense of Sir Claude's displeasure 
her young endurance might have been put 
to a serious test. The days went by without 
his knocking at her father's door, and the 
time would have turned to dreariness if some- 
thing had not conspicuously happened to give 
it a new difference. What took place was a 
marked change in the attitude of Mrs. Beale 
— a change that somehow even in his absence 
seemed to bring Sir Claude again into the 
house. It began practically with a con- 
versation that occurred between them the 
day Maisie came home alone in the cab. 
Mrs. Beale had by that time returned, and 
she was more successful than their friend in 
extracting from our young lady an account 
of the extraordinary passage with the Cap- 
tain. She came back to it repeatedly, and 
on the very next day it grew distinct to 
Maisie that she was already in full possession 
of what at the same moment had been en- 
acted between her ladyship and Sir Claude. 
This was the real origin of her final perception 
that though he did n't come to the house 



 203 

her stepmother had some subtle secret for 
not being bereft of him. That produced 
eventually a strange, a deeper communion 
with Mrs. Beale, the first sign of which had 
been — not on Maisie's part — a wonderful 
outbreak of tears. Mrs. Beale was not, as 
she herself said, a crying creature; she had 
not cried, to M aisle's knowledge, since the 
lowly governess days, the gray dawn of their 
connection. But she wept now with passion, 
professing loudly that it did her good and 
saying remarkable things to the child, for 
whom the occasion was an equal benefit, an 
addition to all the fine reasons stored up for 
not making anything worse. It had n t some- 
how made anything worse, Maisie felt, for 
her to have told Mrs. Beale what she had 
not told Sir Claude, inasmuch as the greatest 
strain, to her sense, was between Sir Claude 
and Sir Claude's wife, and his wife was just 
what Mrs. Beale was unfortunately not. He 
sent his stepdaughter three days after the 
incident in Kensington Gardens a message 
as frank as it was tender, and that was how 
Mrs. Beale had had to bring out in a manner 
that seemed half an appeal, half a defiance : 
" Well, yes^ hang it — I do see him ! " 

How and when and where, however, were 



204 

just what Maisie was not to know — an ex- 
clusion moreover that she never questioned 
in the light of a participation large enough 
to make him, in hours of solitude with Mrs. 
Beale, present like a picture on the wall. As 
far as her father was concerned such hours 
had no interruption; and then it was clear 
between them that they were each thinking 
of the absent and each thinking that the 
other thought; so that he was an object of 
conscious reference in everything they said 
or did. The wretched truth, Mrs. Beale had 
to confess, was that she had hoped against 
hope and that in the Regent's Park it was 
impossible Sir Claude should really be in and 
out. Had n t they at last to look the fact in 
the face? — it was too disgustingly evident 
that no one after all had been squared. 
Well, if no one had been squared it was be- 
cause every one had been vile. No one and 
every one were of course Beale and Ida, the 
extent of whose power to be nasty was a 
thing that, to a little girl, Mrs. Beale simply 
could n't communicate. Therefore it was 
that to keep going at all, as she said, that 
lady had to make, as she also said, another 
arrangement — the arrangement in which 
Maisie was included only to the point of 



 205 

knowing that it existed and wondering wist- 
fully what it was. Conspicuously at any 
rate it had a side that was responsible for 
Mrs. Beale's sudden emotion and sudden con- 
fidence — a demonstration, however, of which 
the tearfulness was far from deterrent to our 
heroine's thought of how happy she should 
be if she could only make an arrangement 
for herself. Mrs. Beale's own operated, it 
appeared, with regularity and frequency ; for 
it was almost every day or two that she was 
able to bring Maisie a message and to take one 
back. It had been over the vision of what, 
as she called it, he did for her that she broke 
down ; and this vision was kept in a manner 
before Maisie by a subsequent increase not 
only of the gayety, but literally — it seemed 
not presumptuous to perceive — of the actual 
virtue of her friend. The friend was herself 
the first to proclaim it : he had pulled her up 
immensely — he had quite pulled her round. 
She had charming, tormenting words about 
him : he was her good fairy, her hidden spring 
— above all he was just her conscience. 
That was what had particularly come out with 
her startling tears : he had made her, dear 
man, think ever so much better of herself. 
It had been thus rather surprisingly revealed 



2o6 

that she had been in a way to think ill, and 
Maisie was glad to hear of the corrective at 
the same time that she heard of the ailment. 

She presently found herself supposing and 
in spite of her envy even hoping that when- 
ever Mrs. Beale was out of the house Sir 
Claude had in some manner the satisfaction 
of it. This was now of more frequent oc- 
currence than ever before — so much so that 
she would have thought of her stepmother 
as almost extravagantly absent had it not 
been that in the first place her father was a 
superior specimen of that habit: it was the 
frequent remark of his present wife, as it had 
been before the tribunals of their country a 
conspicuous plea of her predecessor, that he 
scarce came home even to sleep. In the 
second place Mrs. Beale, when she was on 
the spot, had now a beautiful air of longing 
to make up for everything. The only shadow 
in such bright intervals was that, as Maisie 
put it to herself, she could get nothing by 
questions. It was in the nature of things to 
be none of a small child's business even 
when a small child had from the first been 
deluded into a fear that she might be only 
too much initiated. Things then were in 
Maisie's experience so true to their nature 



 207 

that questions were almost always improper ; 
but she learned on the other hand soon to 
recognize that patient little silences and in- 
telligent little looks could be rewarded from 
time to time by delightful little glimpses. 
There had been years at Beale Farange's 
when the monosyllable " he " meant always, 
meant almost violently the master; but all 
that was changed at a period at which Sir 
Claude's merits were of themselves so much 
in the air that it scarce took even two letters 
to name him- *' He keeps me up splendidly 
— he does, my own precious," Mrs. Beale 
•would observe to her companion; or else 
she would say that the situation at the other 
establishment had reached a point that could 
scarcely be believed — the point, monstrous 
as it sounded, of his not having laid eyes upon 
her for twelve days. " Her " of course at 
Beale Farange's had never meant any one 
but Ida, and there was the difference in this 
case that it now meant Ida with renewed in- 
tensity. Mrs. Beale was in a position strik- 
ingly to animadvert more and more upon her 
dreadfulness, the moral of all which appeared 
to be how abominably yet blessedly little she 
had to do with her husband. This flow of 
information came home to our two friends 



2o8 

because truly Mrs. Beale had not much 
more to do with her own ; but that was one 
of the reflections that Maisie could make 
without allowing it to break the spell of her 
present sympathy. How could such a spell 
be anything but deep when Sir Claude's in- 
fluence, though operating from afar, at last 
really determined the resumption of his 
stepdaughter's studies? Mrs. Beale again 
took fire about them and was quite vivid, 
for Maisie, as to their being the great 
matter to which the absent friend kept her 
up. 

This was the second source — I have just 
alluded to the first — of the child's conscious- 
ness of something that, very hopefully, she 
described to herself as a new phase ; and it 
also presented in the brightest light the fresh 
enthusiasm with which Mrs. Beale always re- 
appeared and which really gave Maisie a 
happier sense than she had yet had of being 
very dear at least to two persons. That she 
had small remembrance at present of a third 
illustrates, I am afraid, a temporary oblivion 
of Mrs. Wix, an accident to be explained 
only by a state of unnatural excitement. For 
what was the form taken by Mrs. Beale's en- 
thusiasm and acquiring relief in the domestic 



 209 

conditions still left to her but the delightful 
form of " reading " with her little charge on 
lines directly prescribed and in works pro- 
fusely supplied by Sir Claude ? He had got 
hold of an awfully good list — "mostly es- 
says, don't you know? " Mrs. Beale had said ; 
a word always august to Maisie, but hence- 
forth to be softened by hazy, in fact by quite 
languorous edges. There was at any rate a 
week in which no less than nine volumes ar- 
rived, and the impression was to be gathered 
from Mrs. Beale that the obscure intercourse 
she enjoyed with Sir Claude not only involved 
an account and a criticism of studies, but was 
organized almost for the very purpose of re- 
port and consultation. It was for Maisie's 
education in short that, as she often re- 
peated, she closed her door — closed it to the 
gentlemen who used to flock there in such 
numbers and whom her husband's practical 
desertion of her would have made it a course 
of the highest indelicacy to receive. Maisie 
was familiar from of old with the principle 
at least of the care that a woman, as Mrs. 
Beale phrased it, attractive and exposed 
must take of her '' character," and was duly 
impressed with the rigor of her stepmother's 
scruples. There was literally no one of the 

14 



210 

other sex whom she appeared to feel at lib- 
erty to see at home, and when the child 
risked an inquiry about the ladies who one 
by one, during her own previous period, had 
been made quite loudly welcome, Mrs. Beale 
hastened to inform her that one by one they 
had, the fiends, been found out after all to 
be awful. If she wished to know more about 
them she was recommended to approach her 
father. 

Maisie had, however, at the very moment 
of this injunction much livelier curiosities, 
for the dream of lectures at an institution 
had at last become a reality, thanks to Sir 
Claude's now unbounded energy in discover- 
ing what could be done. It appeared in this 
connection that when you came to look into 
things in a spirit of earnestness an immense 
deal could be done for very little more than 
your fare in the Underground. The institu- 
tion — there was a splendid one in a part of 
the town but little known to the child — be- 
came in the glow of such a spirit a thrilling 
place, and the walk to it from the station 
through Glower Street — a pronunciation for 
which Mrs. Beale once laughed at her little 
friend — a pathway literally strewn with 
"subjects." Maisie seemed to herself to 



 211 

pluck them as she passed, though they thick- 
ened in the great gray rooms where the foun- 
tain of knowledge, in the form usually of a 
high voice that she took at first to be angry, 
plashed in the stillness of rows of faces thrust 
out like empty jugs. " It must do us good 
— it's all so hideous," Mrs. Beale had imme- 
diately declared, manifesting a purity of reso- 
lution that made these occasions quite the 
most harmonious of all the many on which 
the pair had pulled together. Maisie cer- 
tainly had never in such an association felt 
so uplifted and never above all been so car- 
ried off her feet as at the moments of Mrs. 
Beale's breathlessly re-entering the house 
and fairly shrieking upstairs to know if they 
would still be in time for a lecture. Her 
stepdaughter, all ready from the earliest 
hours, almost leaped over the banister to 
respond, and they dashed out together in 
quest of learning as hard as they often dashed 
back to release Mrs. Beale for other preoccu- 
pations. There had been in short no bustle 
like it since that last brief flurry when Mrs. 
Wix, blowing as if she were grooming her, 
" made up " for everything previously lost at 
her father's. 

These weeks as well were too few, but 



212 

they were flooded with a new emotion, a part 
of which indeed came from the possibility 
that, through the long telescope of Glower 
Street, or perhaps between the pillars of the 
institution — which were what Maisie thought 
most made it one — they should some day 
spy Sir Claude. That was what Mrs, Beale, 
under pressure, had said — doubtless a little 
impatiently : " Oh, yes, oh, yes ; some day ! " 
His joining them was clearly far less of a 
matter of course than was to have been gath- 
ered from his original profession of desire to 
improve in their company his own mind; 
and this sharpened our young lady's guess 
that since that occasion either something 
destructive had happened or something de- 
sirable had n't. Mrs. Beale had thrown but a 
partial light in telling her how it had turned 
out that nobody had been squared. Maisie 
wished at any rate that somebody would be 
squared. However, though in every ap- 
proach to the temple of knowledge she 
watched in vain for Sir Claude, there was no 
doubt about the action of his loved image as 
an incentive and a recompense. When the 
institution was most on pillars — or, as Mrs. 
Beale put it, on stilts — when the subject was 
deepest and the lecture longest and the lis- 



 213 

teners ugliest, then it was they both felt their 
absent protector would be most pleased with 
them. 

One day, unexpectedly, in the midst of his 
absence, Mrs. Beale said to her companion : 
"We'll go to-night to the thingumbob at 
Earl's Court;" an announcement putting 
forth its full lustre when she had made 
known that she referred to the great Exhibi- 
tion just opened in that quarter, a collection 
of extraordinary foreign things in tremen- 
dous gardens, with illuminations, bands, ele- 
phants, switchbacks and sideshows, as well 
as crowds of people among whom they might 
possibly see some one they knew. Maisie 
flew in the same bound at the neck of her 
friend and at the name of Sir Claude, on 
which Mrs. Beale confessed that — well, yes, 
there was just a chance that he would be able 
to meet them. He never of course in his 
terrible position knew what might happen 
from hour to hour ; but he hoped to be free 
and he had given Mrs. Beale the tip. " Bring 
her there on the quiet, and I '11 try to turn 
up" — this was clear enough on what so 
many weeks of privation had made of his 
desire to see the child : it even appeared to 
represent on his part a yearning as constant 



214 

as her own. That in turn was just puzzling 
enough to make Maisie express a bewilder- 
ment She could n't see, if they were so 
intensely of the same mind, why the theory 
on which she had come back to Mrs. Beale 
— the general reunion, the delightful trio, 
should have broken down so in fact. Mrs. 
Beale, however, only gave her more to think 
about in saying that their disappointment 
was the result of his having got into his head 
a kind of idea. 

"What kind of idea?" 

" Oh, goodness knows ! " She spoke with 
an approach to asperity. " He 's so awfully 
delicate." 

" Delicate ? " — that was ambiguous. 

"About what he does, don't you know?" 
said Mrs. Beale. She made it clearer. 
"Well, about what we do." 

Maisie wondered. " You and me? " 

" Me and hiniy silly ! " cried Mrs. Beale with, 
this time, a real giggle. 

" But you don't do any harm — you 
don't," said Maisie, wondering afresh and 
intending her emphasis as a resigned allusion 
to her parents. 

" Of course we don't, you angel — that 's 
just the ground / take ! " her companion 



\ 



 215 

exultantly responded. " He says he does n't 
want you mixed up." 

" Mixed up with what? " 

"That's exactly what / want to know: 
mixed up with what, and how you are any 
more mixed — ? " But Mrs. Beale paused 
without ending her question. She ended 
after an instant in a different way. " All you 
can say is it *s his fancy." 

The tone of this, in spite of its expressing 
a resignation, the fruit of weariness, that dis- 
missed the subject, conveyed so vividly how 
much such a fancy was not Mrs. Beale's own 
that our young lady was led by the mere fact 
of contact to arrive at a dim apprehension 
of the unuttered and the unknown. The 
relation between her step-parents had then 
a kind of mysterious residuum : this was the 
first time she really had reflected that except 
as regards herself it was not a relationship. 
To each other it was only what they might 
happen to make it, and she gathered that 
this, in the event, had been something that 
led Sir Claude to keep away from her. 
Did n't he fear she would be compromised ? 
The perception of such a scruple endeared 
him the more, and it flashed over her that 
she might simplify everything by showing 



2i6 

him how little she made of such a danger. 
Had n*t she lived with her eyes on it from 
her third year? It was the condition most 
frequently discussed at the Faranges*, where 
the word was always in the air and where at 
the age of five, amid rounds of applause, she 
could gabble it off. She knew as well in 
short that a person could be compromised as 
that a person could be slapped with a hair- 
brush or left alone in the dark, and it was 
equally familiar to her that each of these or- 
deals was in general held to have too little 
effect. But the first thing was to make 
absolutely sure of Mrs. Beale. This was 
done by saying to her thoughtfully : " Well, 
if you don't mind — and you really don't, do 
you?" 

Mrs. Beale, with a dawn of amusement, 
considered. "Mixing you up? Not a bit. 
For what does it mean? " 

"Whatever it means, I don't in the least 
mind being mixed. Therefore if you don't 
and I don't," Maisie continued, "don't you 
think that when I see him this evening I had 
better just tell him we don't and ask him 
why in the world he should?" 



 217 



XVIII 

The child, however, was not destined to en- 
joy much of Sir Claude at the "thingum- 
bob," which took for them a very different 
turn indeed. On the spot Mrs. Beale, with 
hilarity, had urged her to the course pro- 
posed ; but later, at the Exhibition, she with- 
drew this allowance, mentioning, as a result 
of second thoughts, that when a man was so 
sensitive such a communication might only 
make him worse. It would have been hard 
indeed for Sir Claude to be ** worse," Maisie 
felt, as, in the gardens and the crowd, when 
the first dazzle had dropped, she looked for 
him in vain up and down. They had all 
their time, the couple, for frugal, wistful wan- 
dering : they had partaken together, at home, 
of the light, vague meal — Maisie's name for 
it was a "jam-supper" — to which they were 
reduced when Mr. Farange sought his pleas- 
ure abroad. It was abroad now, entirely, 
that Mr. Farange cultivated this philosophy, 
and it was the actual impression of his 
daughter, derived from his wife, that he had 
three days before joined a friend's yacht at 
Cowes. 



2i8 

The place was full of sideshows, to which 
Mrs. Beale could introduce the little girl only, 
alas! by revealing to her so attractive, so 
enthralling a name: the sideshows, each 
time, were sixpence apiece, and the fond al- 
legiance enjoyed by the elder of our pair had 
been established from the earliest time in 
spite of a paucity of sixpences. Small coin 
dropped from her as half-heartedly as answers 
from bad children to lessons that had not 
been looked at. Maisie passed more slowly 
the great painted posters, pressing, with a 
linked arm, closer to her friend's pocket, 
where she hoped for the sensible stir of a 
shilling. But the upshot of this was but to 
deepen her yearning: if Sir Claude would 
only at last come the shillings would begin 
to flow. The companions paused, for want 
of one, before the Flowers of the Forest, a 
large presentment of bright brown ladies — 
they were brown all over — in a medium sug- 
gestive of tropical luxuriance, and there 
Maisie dolorously expressed her belief that 
he would never come at all. Mrs. Beale 
hereupon, though discernibly disappointed, 
reminded her that he had not been promised 
as a certainty — a remark that caused the 
child to gaze at the Flowers of the Forest 



 219 

through a blur in which they became more 
magnificent, yet oddly more confused, and 
by which moreover confusion was imparted 
to the aspect of a gentleman who at that mo- 
ment, in the company of a lady, came out of 
the brilliant booth. The lady was so brown 
that Maisie at first took her for one of the 
Flowers; but during the few seconds that 
this required — a few seconds in which she 
had also desolately given up Sir Claude — 
she heard Mrs. Beale's voice, behind her, 
gather both wonder and pain into a single 
sharp little cry. 

" Of all the wickedness — Beale ! " 

He had already, without distinguishing 
them in the mass of strollers, turned another 
way — it seemed at the brown lady's sug- 
gestion. Her course was marked, over heads 
and shoulders, by an upright scarlet plume, 
as to the ownership of which Maisie was in- 
stantly eager. " Who is she ? — who is she ? " 

But Mrs. Beale, for a moment, only looked 
after them. " The liar — the liar ! " 

Maisie considered. "Because he's not — 
where one thought I *' That was also, a month 
ago in Kensington Gardens, where her 
mother had not been. "Perhaps he has 
come back," she insinuated. 



220 

" He never went — the hound ! " 

That, according to Sir Claude, had been 
also what her mother had not done, and 
Maisie could only have a sense of something 
that in a maturer mind would be called the 
way history repeats itself. "Who is she?" 
she asked again. 

Mrs. Beale, fixed to the spot, seemed lost 
in the vision of an opportunity missed. " If 
he had only seen me ! " — it came from be- 
tween her teeth. "She's a bran-new one. 
But he must have been with her since Tues- 
day." 

Maisie took it in. " She 's almost black," 
she then observed. 

"They're always hideous," said Mrs. 
Beale. 

This was a remark on which the child had 
again to reflect. " Oh, not his wives I " she 
remonstrantly exclaimed. The words at an- 
other moment would probably have set her 
friend off, but Mrs. Beale was now too intent 
in seeing what became of the others. " Did 
you ever in your life see such a feather?" 
Maisie presently continued. 

This decoration appeared to have paused 
at some distance, and in spite of intervening 
groups they could both look at it. " Oh, 



 221 

that 's the way they dress — the vulgarest of 
the vulgar ! " 

" They 're coming back — they '11 see us ! " 
Maisie the next moment announced; and 
while her companion answered that this was 
exactly what she wanted, and the child re- 
turned "Here they are — here they are!" 
the unconscious objects of so much attention, 
with a change of mind about their direction, 
quickly retraced their steps and precipitated 
themselves upon their critics. Their uncon- 
sciousness gave Mrs. Beale time to leap, 
under her breath, to a recognition which 
Maisie caught 

" It must be Mrs. Cuddon ! " 

Maisie looked at Mrs. Cuddon hard — her 
lips even echoed the name. What followed 
was extraordinarily rapid — a minute of live- 
lier battle than had ever yet, in so short a 
span'at least, been waged round our heroine. 
The muffled shock — lest people should 
notice — was so violent that it was only for 
her later thought the steps fell into their 
order, the steps through which, in a bewilder- 
ment not so much of sound as of silence, she 
had come to find herself, too soon for com- 
prehension and too strangely for fear, at the 
door of the Exhibition with her father. He 



222 

thrust her into a hansom and got in after her, 
and then it was — as she drove along with 
him — that she recovered a little what had 
happened. Face to face with them in the 
gardens he had seen them, and there had 
been a moment of checked concussion during 
which, in a glare of black eyes and a toss of 
red plumage, Mrs. Cuddon had recognized 
them, ejaculated and vanished. There had 
been another moment at which she became 
aware of Sir Claude, also poised there in sur- 
prise, but out of her father's view, as if he 
had been warned off at the very moment of 
reaching them. It fell into its place with all 
the rest that she had heard Mrs. Beale say to 
her father, but whether low or loud was now 
lost to her, something about his having this 
time a new one; to which he had growled 
something indistinct, but apparently in the 
tone and of the sort that the child, from her 
earliest years, had associated with hearing 
somebody retort to somebody that some- 
body was " another." " Oh, I stick to the 
old ! " Mrs. Beale had exclaimed at this, and 
her accent, even as the cab got away, was 
still in the air, for Maisie's companion had 
spoken no other word from the moment of 
whisking her off — none at least save the in- 



1 



 223 

distinguishable address which, over the top 
of the hansom and poised on the step, he 
had given the driver. Reconstructing these 
things later, Maisie believed that she at this 
point would have put a question to him had 
not the silence into which he charmed her 
or scared her — she could scarce know which 
— come from his suddenly making her feel 
his arm about her, feel, as he drew her close, 
that he was agitated in a way he had never 
yet shown her. It seemed to her that he 
trembled, trembled too much to speak, and 
this had the effect of making her, with an 
emotion which, though it had begun to throb 
in an instant, was by no means all dread, con- 
form to his portentous hush. The act of 
possession that his pressure in a manner ad- 
vertised came back to her after the longest 
of the long intermissions that had ever let 
anything come back. They drove and drove, 
and he kept her close ; she stared straight 
before her, holding her breath, watching one 
dark street succeed another, and strangely 
conscious that what it all meant was some- 
how that papa was less to be left out of 
everything than she had supposed. It took 
her but a minute to surrender to this dis- 
covery, which, in the form of his present em- 



224 

brace, suggested a fresh kind of importance 
in him and with that a confused confidence. 
She neither knew exactly what he had done 
nor what he was doing; she could only be 
rather impressed and a little proud, vibrate 
with the sense that he had jumped up to do 
something and that she had as quickly be- 
come a part of it. It was a part of it too 
that here they were at a house that seemed 
not large, but in the fresh white front of 
which the street-lamp showed a smartness of 
flower-boxes. The child had been in thous- 
ands of stories — all Mrs. Wix's and her 
own, to say nothing of the richest romances 
of French Elise — but she had never been in 
such a story as this. By the time he had 
helped her out of the cab, which drove away, 
and she heard in the door of the house the 
prompt little click of his key, the Arabian 
Nights had quite closed round her. 

From this minute they were in everything, 
particularly in such an instant ** open sesame '* 
and in the departure of a cab, a rattling void 
filled with relinquished step-parents ; they 
were, with the vividness, the almost blinding 
whiteness of the light that sprang responsive 
to papa's quick touch of a little brass knob 
on the wall, in a place that, at the top of a 



 225 

short soft staircase, struck her as the most 
beautiful she had ever seen in her life. The 
next thing she perceived it to be was the 
drawing-room of a lady — oh, of a lady, she 
could see in a moment, and not of a gentle- 
man not even of one like papa himself or 
even like Sir Claude — whose things were as 
much prettier than mamma's as it had always 
had to be confessed mamma's were prettier 
than Mrs. Beale's. In the middle of the 
small bright room and the presence of more 
curtains and cushions, more pictures and 
mirrors, more palm-trees drooping over bro- 
caded and gilded nooks, more little silver 
boxes scattered over little crooked tables and 
little oval miniatures hooked upon velvet 
screens than Mrs. Beale and her ladyship to- 
gether could in an unnatural alliance have 
dreamed of mustering, the child became 
aware, with a swift possibility of compassion, 
of something that was strangely like a rele- 
gation to obscurity of each of those women 
of taste. It was a stranger operation still that 
her father should on the spot be presented to 
her as quite advantageously and even grandly 
at home in the dazzling scene and himself by 
so much the more separated from scenes in- 
ferior to it. She spent with him in it, while 

IS 



1 



\ 



\ 



226 

explanations continued to hang fire, twenty 
minutes that, in their sudden drop of danger, 
affected her, though there were neither buns 
nor ginger-beer, like an extemporized costly 
treat. 

"Is she very rich?" He had begun to 
strike her as almost embarrassed, so shy that 
he might have found himself with a young 
lady with whom he had little in common. 
She was literally moved by this apprehension 
to offer him some tactful relief. 

Beale Farange stood and smiled at his 
young lady, his back to the fanciful fireplace, 
his light overcoat — the very lightest in Lon- 
don — wide open and his wonderful lustrous 
beard completely concealing the expanse of 
his shirt-front. It pleased her more than 
ever to think that papa was handsome and, 
though as high aloft as mamma and almost, 
in his specially florid evening dress, as splen- 
did, of a beauty somewhat less belligerent, 
less terrible. " The Countess? Why do you 
ask me that?" 

Maisie's eyes opened wider. "Is she a 
Countess ? " 

There was an unaccustomed geniality in 
his enjoyment of her wonder. " Oh, yes, my 
dear — but it is n't an English title," 



 227 

Maisie's manner appreciated this. " Is it a 
French one?" 

" No, nor French either. It *s American." 

Maisie conversed agreeably. "Ah, then, 
of course she is rich." She took in such a 
combination -of nationality and rank. "I 
never saw anything so lovely." 

"Did you have a sight of her?" Beale 
asked. 

"At the Exhibition?" Maisie smiled. 
" She was gone too quick." 

Her father laughed. " She did slope ! " 
She was for a moment afraid he would 
say something about Mrs. Beale and Sir 
Claude: his unexpected gentleness was too 
mystifying. All he said was, the next 
minute: "She has a horror of vulgar 



scenes." 



This was something Maisie needn't take 
up; she could still continue bland. "But 
where do you suppose she went? " 

"Oh, I thought she'd have taken a cab 
and have been here by this time. But she '11 
turn up all right." "" 

" I 'm sure I hope she will," Maisie said. 
She spoke with an earnestness begotten of 
the impression of all the beauty around her, 
to which, in person, the Countess might 



228 

• 

make further contributions. "We came 
awfully fast," she added. 

Her father again laughed loud. "Yes, 
my dear — I made you step out ! " Beale 
hesitated ; then he added : " I want her to 
see you." Maisie, at this, rejoiced in the at- 
tention that, for their evening out, Mrs. Beale, 
even to the extent of personally " doing up " 
her old hat, had given her appearance. 
Meanwhile her father went on : " You '11 like 
her awfully." 

" Oh. I 'm sure I shall ! " — after which, 
either from the effect of having said so much 
or from that of a sudden glimpse of the im- 
possibility of saying more, she felt a com- 
plication and sought refuge in a minor 
branch of the subject. "I thought she was 
Mrs. Cuddon." 

Beale*s gaiety rather increased than dijnin- 
ished. " You mean my wife did ? My dear 
child, my wife's a damned fool." He had 
the oddest air of speaking of his wife as of a 
person whom she might scarcely have known ; 
so that the refuge of her scruple did n't prove 
particularly happy. Beale, on the other 
hand, appeared after an instant himself to 
feel a scruple. " What I mean is, to speak 
seriously, that she does n't really know any- 



 229 

thing about anything." He paused, follow- 
ing the child's charmed eyes and tentative 
step or two as they brought her nearer to the 
pretty things on one of the tables. " She 
thinks she has good things, don't you know i ** 
He quite jeered at Mrs. Beale's delusion. 

Maisie felt she must confess that it was 
one : everything she had missed at the side- 
shows was made up to her by the Countess's 
luxuries. " Yes," she considered — " she does 
think that." 

There was again a dryness in the way 
Beale replied that it didn't matter what she 
thought ; but there was an increasing sweet- 
ness for his daughter in being with him so 
long without his doing anything worse. The 
whole hour, of course, was to remain with 
her for days and weeks, ineflfaceably illu- 
mined and confirmed ; by the end of which 
she was able to read into it a hundred things 
that were at the moment mere miraculous 
pleasantness. What they then and there 
came to was simply that her companion was 
still excited, yet wished not to show it, and 
that just in proportion as he succeeded in 
this attempt he was able to encourage her to 
regard him as kind. He moved about the 
room after a little ; showed her things, spoke 



\ 



230 

to her as a person of taste, told her the name, 
which she remembered, of the famous French 
lady represented in one of the miniatures, 
and remarked, as if he had caught her wistful 
over a trinket or a trailing stuff, that he made 
no doubt the Countess, on coming in, would 
give her something jolly. He spied a pink 
satin box with a looking-glass let into the 
cover, which he raised, with a quick, facetious 
flourish, to offer her the privilege of six rows 
deep of chocolate bonbons, cutting out thereby 
Sir Claude, who had never gone beyond two 
rows. "I can do what I like with these," 
he said, "for I don't mind telling you I gave 
'em to her myself." The Countess had evi- 
dently appreciated the gift ; there were nu- 
merous gaps, a ravage now quite unchecked, in 
the array. Even while they waited together 
Maisie had her sense, which was the mark 
of what their separation had become, of her 
having grown, for him, since the last time 
he had, as it were, noticed her, and by in- 
crease of years and of inches if by nothing 
else, much more of a little person to reckon 
with. Yes, that was a part of the positive 
awkwardness that he carried off by being 
almost foolishly tender. There was a passage 
during which, on a yellow silk sofa, under 



 231 

one of the palms, he had her on his knee, 
stroking her hair, playfully holding her off 
while he showed his shining fangs and let 
her, with a vague, affectionate, helpless, 
pointless "Dear old girl, dear little daugh- 
ter!" inhale the fragrance of his cherished 
beard. She must have been sorry for him, 
she afterwards knew ; so well could she pri- 
vately follow his difficulty in being specific 
to her about anything. She had such pos- 
sibilities of vibration, of response, that it 
needed nothing more than this to make up 
to her in fact for omissions. The tears came 
into her eyes again as they had come when, 
in the Park that day, the Captain told her so 
excitingly that her mother was good. What 
was this but exciting too, this still directer 
goodness of her father and this unexampled 
shining solitude with him, out of which 
everything had dropped but that he was papa 
and that he was magnificent.^ It didn't 
spoil it that she finally felt he must have, as 
he became restless, some purpose he did n't 
quite see his way to bring out ; for in the 
freshness of their recovered fellowship she 
would have lent herself gleefully to his sug- 
gesting, or even to his pretending, that their 
relations were easy and graceful. There was 



232 

something in him that seemed — and quite 
touchingly — to ask her to help him to pre- 
tend, pretend he knew enough about her life 
and her education, her means of subsistence 
and her view of himself, to give the ques- 
tions he couldn't put her a natural domestic 
tone. She would have pretended with ecstasy 
if he could only have given her the cue. She 
waited for it while, between his big teeth, 
he breathed the sighs she did n't know to be 
stupid ; and as if he had drawn — rather red 
with the confusion of it — the pledge of her 
preparation from her tears, he flounderatl 
about, wondering what the devil he could lay 
hold of. 



XIX 

When he had lighted a cigarette and begun 
to smoke in her face it was as if he had 
struck with the match the note of some queer, 
clumsy ferment of old professions, old scan- 
dals, old duties, a dim perception of what he 
possessed in her and what, if everything had 
only, damn it, been totally different, she 
might still be able to give him. What she 
was able to give him, however, as his blink- 



 233 

ing eyes seemed to make out through the 
smoke, would be simply what he should be 
able to get from her. To give something, to 
give here on the spot, was all her own desire. 
Among the old things that came back was 
her little instinct of keeping the peace; it 
made her wonder more sharply what particu- 
lar thing she could do or not do, what partic- 
ular word she could speak or not speak, what 
particular line she could take or not take that 
might, for every one, even for the Countess, 
give a better turn to the crisis. She was 
ready, in this interest, for an immense sur- 
render, a surrender of everything but Sir 
Claude, of ever3rthing but Mrs. Beale. The 
immensity didn't include tkem; but if he 
had an idea at the back of his head she had 
also one in a recess as deep, and for a time, 
while they sat together, there was an extraor- 
dinary mute passage between Jier vision of^ 
this visi on of h^<^ ^his vision of her vision and 
he r vision of his vision of her vision . What 
there was no effective record of indeed was 
the small strange pathos on the child's part 
of an innocence so saturated with knowledge 
and so directed to diplomacy. What, fur- 
ther, Beale finally laid hold of while he 
masked again with his fine presence half the 



234 

jflounces of the fireplace was : " Do you know, 
my dear, I shall soon be oS to America? " 

It struck his daughter both as a short cut 
and as the way he would n't have said it to 
his wife. But his wife figured with a bright 
superficial assurance in her response. " Do 
you mean with Mrs. Beale ? " 

Her father looked at her hard. "Don't 
be a little ass ! " 

Her silence appeared to represent a con- 
centrated effort not to be. " Then with the 
Countess } " 

"With her or without her, my dear — that 
concerns only your poor daddy. She has big 
interests over there, and she wants me to 
take a look at them." 

Maisie threw herself into them. "Will 
that take very long } " I 

"Yes; they're in such a muddle — it may 
take months. Now what I want to hear, you 
know, is whether you would like to come 
along. " 

Planted once more before him in the 
middle of the room, she felt herself turning 
white. " I ? " she gasped, yet feeling as 
soon as she had spoken that such a note of 
dismay was not altogether pretty. She felt 
it still more while her father replied, with a 



WHAT MAIblE KNEW 235 

shake of his legs, a toss of his cigarette-ash 
and a fidgety look — he was forever taking 
one — all the length of his waistcoat and 
trousers, that she needn't be quite so dis- 
gusted. It helped her in a few seconds to 
appear more as he would like her that she 
saw, in the lovely light of the Countess's 
splendor, exactly, however she appeared, the 
right answer to make. "Dear papa, I '11 go 
with you anywhere." 

He turned his back to her and stood with 
his nose at the glass of the chimneypiece while 
he brushed specks of ash out of his beard. 
Then he abruptly said : " Do you know any- 
thing about your brute of a mother ? " 

It was just of her brute of a mother that 
the manner of the question in a remarkable 
degree reminded her : it had the free flight 
of one of Ida's fine bridgings of space. With 
the sense of this was kindled for Maisie at 
the same time an inspiration. " Oh, yes, I 
know everything I " — and she became so 
radiant that her father, seeing it in the 
mirror, turned back to her and presently, on 
the sofa, had her on his knee again and was 
again particularly stirring. Maisie' s inspi- 
ration was to the effect that the more she 
should be able to say about mamma the less 



236 

she would be called upon to speak of her step- 
parents. She kept hoping that the Countess 
would come in before her power to protect 
them was exhausted; and it was now, in 
closer quarters ovith her companion, that the 
idea at the back of her head shifted its place 
to her lips. She told him she had met her 
mother in the park with a gentleman who, 
while Sir Claude had strolled with her lady- 
ship, had been kind and had sat and talked 
to her; narrating the scene with a remem- 
brance of her pledge of secrecy to the Captain 
quite brushed away by the joy of seeing 
Beale listen without profane interposition. 

a joy, thus to be able to guess that papa was 
at last quite tired of his anger — of his anger, 
at any rate, about mamma. He was only 
bored with her now. J That made it, however, 
the more imperative that his spent dis- 
pleasure should n't be blown out again. It 
charmed the child to see how much she could 
interest him, and the charm remained even 
when, after asking her a dozen questions, he 
observed, musingly and a little obscurely, 
" Yes — damned if she won't ! " For in this 
too there was a detachment, a wise weari- 
ness that made her feel safe. She had had to 



 237 

mention Sir Claude, though she mentioned 
him as little as possible and Beale only ap- 
peared to look quite over his head. It pieced 
itself together for her that this was the mild- 
ness of general indifference; a source of 
profit so great for herself personally that if 
the Countess was the author of it she was 
prepared literally to hug the Countess. She 
betrayed that eagerness by a restless question 
about her; to which her father replied : "Oh, 
she has a head on her shoulders — I '11 back 
her to get out of anything ! " He looked at 
Maisie quite as if he would trace the connec- 
tion between her inquiry and the impatience 
of her gratitude. " Do you mean to say," he 
presently went on, "that you 'd really come 
with me ? " 

She felt as if he were now looking at her 
very hard indeed, and also as if she had 
grown ever so much older. "I'll do anything 
in the world you ask me, papa. " 

He gave again, with a laugh and with his 
legs apart, his proprietary glance at his waist- 
coat and trousers. " That 's a way, my dear, 
of saying 'No, thank you! ' You know you 
don't want to go the least little mite. You 
can't humbug me ! " Mr. Farange laid down. 
" I don't want to bully you — I never bullied 



238 

you in my life; but I make you the offer, 
and it *s to take or to leave. Your mother 
will never again have any more to do with 
you than if you were a kitchen-maid she had 
turned out for going wrong. Therefore, of 
course, I 'm your natural protector, and 
you 've a right to get everything out of me 
you can. Now 's your chance, you know — 
you '11 be a great fool if you don't. You 
can't say I don't put it before you — you 
can't say I ain't kind to you or that I don't 
play fair. Mind you never say that, you 
know — it would bring me down on you. I 
know what 's proper — I '11 take you again, 
just as I have taken you again and again and 
again. And I 'm much obliged to you for 
making up such a face. " 

She was conscious enough that her face 
indeed could n't please him if it showed any 
sign — just as she hoped it did n't — of her 
sharp impression of what he now really 
wanted to do. Was n't he trying to turn the 
tables on her, hocuspocus her somehow into 
admitting that what would really suit her 
little book would be, after doing so much for 
good manners, to leave her wholly at liberty 
to arrange for herself ? She began to be ner- 
vous again ; it rolled over her that this was 



 239 

their parting, their parting forever, and that 
he had brought her there for so many caresses 
only because it was important such an occa- 
sion should look better for him than any 
other. For her to spoil it by the note of dis- 
cord would certainly give him ground for 
complaint; and the child was momentarily 
bewildered between her alternatives of agree- 
ing with him about her wanting to get rid of 
him and displeasing him by pretending to 
stick to him. So she found for the moment 
no solution but to murmur very helplessly : 
"Oh, papa — oh, papa!" 

"I know what you're up to — don't tell 
me ! " After which he came straight over 
and, in the most inconsequent way in the 
world, clasped her in his arms a moment and 
rubbed his beard against her cheek. Then 
she understood as well as if he had spoken 
it that what he wanted, hang it, was that 
she should let him off with all the honours 
— with all the appearance of virtue and sac- 
rifice on his side. It was exactly as if he 
had broken out to her: "I say, you little 
donkey, help me to be irreproachable, to be 
noble, and yet to have none of the beastly 
bore of it. There 's only impropriety enough 
for one of us, ^o you must take it all. Repu- 



240 

diate your dear old daddy — in the face, mind 
you, of his tender supplications. He can't 
be rough with you — it is n't in his nature; 
therefore you will have successfully chucked 
him because he was too generous to be as 
firm with you, poor man, as was, after all, 
his duty." This was what he communicated 
in a series of tremendous pats on the back ; 
that portion of her person had never been so 
thumped since Moddle thumped her when 
she choked. After a moment he gave her the 
further impression of having become sure 
enough of her to be able very gracefully to 
say out: "You know your mother loathes 
you, loathes you simply. And I 've been 
thinking over your man — the fellow you told 
me about. " 

"Well," Maisie replied with competence, 
"I 'm sure of him,'* 

Her father was vague an instant. "Do 
you mean sure of his liking you ? " 

" Oh no, of his liking her / " 

Beale had a return of gaiety. "There's 
no accounting for tastes ! It 's what they all 
say, you know. " 

" I don't care — I'm sure of him ! " Maisie 
repeated. 

" Sure, you mean, that she '11 bolt? " 



 241 

Maisie knew all about bolting, but, decid- 
edly, she was older, and there was something 
in her that could wince at the way her father 
made the word boom out. It prompted her 
to amend his allusion; which she did by re- 
turning : " I don't know what she '11 do. But 
she'll be happy." 

" Let us hope so, " said Beale with bright, 
unusual mildness. " The more happy she is, 
at any rate, the less she '11 want you about. 
That 's why I press you," he agreeably pur- 
sued, "to consider this handsome offer — I 
mean seriously, you know — of your sole sur- 
viving parent." Their eyes, at this, met 
again in a long and extraordinary communion 
which terminated in his ejaculating: "Ah, 
you little scoundrel ! " She took it from him 
in the manner that it seemed to her he would 
prefer and with a success that encouraged 
him to go on : " You are a deep little devil ! " 
Her silence, ticking like a watch, acknowl- 
edged even this ; in confirmation of which he 
finally brought out : " You 've settled it with 
the other pair ! " 

" Well, what if I have ? " — she sounded to 
herself most bold. 

Her father, quite as in* the old days, guf- 
fawed. " Why, don'tyouknowthey 'reawful 1 " 

16 



242 

She grew bolder still. "I don't care — 
not a bit ! " 

" But they 're probably the worst people in 
the world and the very greatest criminals," 
Beale pleasantly urged. "I'm not the man, 
my dear, not to let you know it. " 

"Well, it doesn't prevent them from lov- 
ing me. They love me tremendously." 
Maisie turned crimson to hear herself. 

Her father hesitated: almost any one — 
let alone a daughter — would have seen how 
conscientious he wanted to be. " I dare say. 
But do you know why?" She braved his 
eyes, and he added: "You're a jolly good 
pretext. " 

" For what ? " Maisie asked. 

" Why, for their game. I need n't tell you 
what that is. " 

The child reflected. "Well, then, that's 
all the more reason. " 

" Reason for what, pray.? " 

" For their being kind to me. " 

"And for your keeping in with them?" 
Beale roared again ; it was as if his spirits 
rose and rose. "Do you realize, I should 
like to know, that in saying that you 're a 
monster ? " 

Maisie turned it over. " A. monster ? " 



 243 

" They * ve made one of you. Upon my 
honour it *s quite awful. It shows the sort 
of people they are. Don't you understand," 
Beale pursued, "that when they 've made you 
as horrid as they can — as horrid as them- 
selves — they '11 just simply chuck you? " 

Maisie, at this, had a flicker of passion. 
" They won't chuck me ! " 

"Excuse me," her father courteously in- 
sisted. " It 's my duty to put it before you. 
I should n't forgive myself if I did n't point 
out to you that they '11 cease to require you." 
He spoke as if with an appeal to her intelli- 
gence that she must be ashamed not ade- 
quately to meet, and this gave a still higher 
grace to his superior delicacy. 

It had after an instant the illuminating 
effect he intended. "Cease to require me 
because they won't care — ?" She paused 
with that sketch of her idea. 

"Of course Sir Claude won't care if his 
wife bolts. That 's his game — it will suit 
him down to the ground. " 

This was a proposition Maisie could per- 
fectly embrace, but it still left a loophole for 
triumph. She considered a little. "You 
mean if mamma does n't come back ever at 
all ? " The composure with which her face 



244 

was presented to that prospect would have 
shown a spectator the long road she had trav- 
elled. "Well, but that won't put Mrs. 
Beale — " 

"In the same comfortable position — ?" 
Beale took her up with relish ; he had sprung 
to his feet again, shaking his legs and look- 
ing at his shoes. " Right you are, darling ! 
Something more will be wanted for Mrs. 
Beale. " He hesitated ; then he added : " But 
she may not have long to wait for it. " 

Maisie also for a minute looked at his 
shoes, though they were not the pair she most 
admired, the laced yellow "uppers" and 
patent-leather complement. At last, with a 
question, she raised her eyes. " Are you not 
coming back.^" 

Once more he hung fire; after which he 
gave a small laugh that, in the oddest way in 
the world, reminded her of the unique sounds 
she had heard emitted by Mrs. Wix. "It 
may strike you as extraordinary that I should 
make you such an admission; and in point 
of fact you 're not to understand that I do. 
But we '11 put it that way to help your de- 
cision. The point is that that 's the way my 
wife will presently be sure to put it. You '11 
hear her shrieking that she 's deserted, so 



 245 

that she may pile up her wrongs and things. 
She '11 be as free as she likes then — as free, 
you see, as your mother's ass of a husband. 
They won't have anything more to consider, 
and they '11 just put you into the street. Do 
I understand," Beale inquired, "that, in the 
face of what I press upon you, you still pre- 
fer to take the risk of that.?" It was the 
most wonderful appeal any gentleman had 
ever addressed to his daughter, and it had 
placed Maisie in the middle of the room 
again, while her father moved slowly about 
her with his hands in his pockets and some- 
thing in his step that seemed, more than any- 
thing else he had done, to show the habit of 
the place. She turned her fevered little 
eyes over his friend's brightnesses, as if, on 
her own side, to press for some help in a 
quandary unexampled. As if, also, the 
pressure reached him, he after an instant 
stopped short, completing the prodigy of his 
attitude and the grace of his loyalty by a 
supreme formulation of the general induce- 
ment. "You have an eye, love! Yes — 
there 's money. No end of money." 

This affected her for a moment like some 
great flashing dazzle in one of the panto- 
mimes to which Sir Claude had taken her: 



246 

she saw nothing in it but what it directly 
conveyed. **And shall I never, never see 
you again — ?" 

" If I do go to America ? " Beale brought 
it out like a man. " Never, never, never ! " 

Hereupon, with the utmost absurdity, she 
broke down; everything gave way, every- 
thing but the horror of hearing herself defi- 
nitely utter such an ugliness as the accept- 
ance of that. So she only stiffened herself 
and said: "Then I can't give you up." 

She held him some seconds looking at her, 
showing her a strained grimace, a perfect 
parade of all his teeth, in which it seemed 
to her she could read the disgust he did n't 
quite like to express at this departure from 
the pliability she had practically promised. 
But before she could attenuate in any way 
the crudity of her collapse he gave an impa- 
tient jerk which took him to the window. 
She heard a vehicle stop ; Beale looked out ; 
then he freshly faced her. He still said 
nothing, but she knew the Countess had come 
back. There was a silence again between 
them, but with a different shade of embar- 
rassment from that of their united arrival; 
and it was still without speaking that, 
abruptly repeating one of the fine hugs of 



 247 

which he had already been so liberal, he 
whisked her back to the yellow sofa just be- 
fore the door of the room was thrown open. 
It was thus in renewed and intimate union 
with him that she was presented to a person 
whom she instantly recognized as the brown 
lady. 

The brown lady looked almost as aston- 
ished, though not quite as alarmed, as when, 
at the Exhibition, she had gasped in the face 
of Mrs. Beale. Maisie, in truth, almost 
gasped in her own ; this was with the fuller 
perception that she was brown indeed. She 
literally struck the child more as an animal 
than as a "real '* lady: she might have been 
a clever frizzled poodle in a frill or a dread- 
ful human monkey in a spangled petticoat. 
She had a nose that was far too big and eyes 
that were far too small and a moustache that 
was — well, not so happy a feature as Sir 
Claude's. Beale jumped up to her; while, 
to the child's astonishment, though as if in 
a quick intensity of thought, the Countess 
advanced as gaily as if, for many a day, noth- 
ing awkward had happened for any one. 
Maisie, in spite of a large acquaintance with 
the phenomenon, had never seen it so promptly 
established that nothing awkward was to be 



248 

mentioned. The next minute the Countess 
had kissed her and exclaimed to Beale with 
bright, tender reproach: "Why, you never 
told me half! My dear child," she cried, 
" it was awfully nice of you to come ! " 

" But she has n't come — she won't come ! " 
Beale exclaimed. " I 've put it to her how 
much you 'd like it, but she declines to have 
anything to do with us." 

The Countess stood smiling, and after an 
instant that was mainly taken up with the 
shock of her weird aspect Maisie felt herself 
reminded of another smile, which was not 
ugly, though also interested — the kind light 
thrown, that day in the Park, from the clean, 
fair face of the Captain. Papa's Captain — 
yes — was the Countess; but she wasn't 
nearly so nice as the other : it all came back, 
doubtless, to Maisie' s minor appreciation of 
ladies. "Should n't you like me," said this 
one endearingly, "to take you to Spa?" 

"To Spa.^ " The child repeated the name 
to g^in time, not to show how the Countess 
brought back to her a dim remembrance of a 
strange woman with a horrid face, who once, 
years before, in an omnibus, bending to her 
from an opposite seat, had suddenly produced 
an orange and murmured: "Little dearie, 



 249 

won't you have it ? " She had felt then, for 
some reason, a small, silly terror, though 
afterwards conscious that her interlocutress, 
imfortunately hideous, had particularly meant 
to be kind. This was also what the Coun- 
tess meant; yet the few words she had 
uttered and the smile with which she had 
uttered them immediately cleared everything 
up. Oh, no, she wanted to go nowhere with 
hcTy for her presence had already, in a few 
seconds, dissipated the happy impression of 
the room and put an end to the pride momen- 
tarily suggested by Beale's association with 
so much taste. There was no taste in his 
association with the short, fat, wheedling, 
whiskered person who had approached her 
and in whom she had to recogjnize the only 
figure wholly without attraction that had be- 
come a party to an intimate connection 
formed in her immediate circle. She was 
^bashed meanwhile, however, at having ap- 
peared to weigh the place to which she had 
been invited; and she added as quickly as 
possible: "It isn't to America, then — ?" 
The Countess, at this, looked sharply at 
Beale, and Beale, airily enough, asked what 
the deuce it mattered when she had already 
given him to understand that she wanted to 



250 

have nothing to do with them. There fol- 
lowed between her companions a passage of 
which the sense was drowned for her in the 
deepening inward hum of her mere desire to 
get off; though she was able to guess later 
on that her father must have put it to his 
friend that it was no use talking, that she 
was an obstinate little pig and that, besides, 
she was really old enough to choose for her- 
self. It glimmered back to her then as well 
that the Countess had cast derision on the 
question of America and had offered her 
alternatives to Spa in the shape of any place 
she should like to go in all the rest of the 
world. It glimmered back to her indeed that 
she must have failed quite dreadfully to seem 
responsive and polite, inasmuch as, before 
she knew it, she had visibly given the im- 
pression that if they did n't allow her to go 
home she should cry. Oh, if there had ever 
been a thing to cry about, it was being found 
in that punishable little attitude toward the 
handsomest offers one had ever received! 
The great pain of the thing was that she 
could see the Countess liked her enough to 
wish to be liked in return ; and it was from the 
idea of a return she sought to flee — it was 
the idea of a return that, after a confusion of 



 251 

loud words had arisen between the others, 
brought to her lips with the tremor preced- 
ing disaster: "Can't I, please, be sent home 
in a cab ? " Yes, the Countess wanted her 
and the Countess was wounded and chilled, 
and she could n't help it, and it was all the 
more dreadful because it only made the Coun- 
tess more seductive and more impossible. 
The only thing that sustained either of them 
perhaps till the cab came — Maisie presently 
saw it would come — was its being in the 
air somehow that Beale had done what he 
wanted. He went out to look for a convey- 
ance; the servants, he said, had gone to bed, 
but she should n*t be kept beyond her time. 
The Countess left the room with him and 
alone in possession of it Maisie hoped she 
would n*t come back. It was all the effect 
of her face — the child simply couldn't look 
at it and meet its expression half-way. All 
in a moment too that queer expression had 
leaped into the lovely things — all in a 
moment she had had to accept her father as 
liking some one whom, she was sure, neither 
her mother, nor Mrs. Beale, nor Mrs. Wix, 
nor Sir Claude, nor the Captain, nor even 
Mr. Perriam nor Lord Eric, could possibly 
have liked. Three minutes later, down- 



252 

stairs, with the cab at the door, it was per- 
haps as a final confession of not having much 
to boast of that, on taking leave of her, he 
managed to press her to his bosom without 
her seeing his face. For herself, she was so 
eager to go that their parting reminded her 
of nothing — not even of a single one of all 
the " nevers " that, above, as the penalty of 
not cleaving to him, he had attached to the 
question of their meeting again. There was 
something in the Countess that falsified 
everything, even the great interests in 
America, and yet more the first flush of that 
superiority to Mrs. Beale and to mamma 
which had been expressed in silver boxes. 
These were still there, but perhaps there 
were no great interests in America. Mamma 
had known an American who was not a bit 
like this one. She was not, however, of 
noble rank; her name was only Mrs. Tucker. 
Maisie's detachment would, all the same, 
have been more complete if she had not sud- 
denly had to exclaim : " Oh, dear — I have n't 
any money ! " 

Her father's teeth, at this, were such a pic- 
ture of appetite without action as to be a 
match for any plea of poverty. " Make your 
stepmother pay." 



 253 

" Stepmothers don^t-pzy ! " cried the Coun- 
tess. " No stepmother ever paid in her life ! " 
The next moment they were in the street 
together, and the next the child was in the 
cab, with the Countess on the pavement, but 
close to her, quickly taking money from a 
purse whisked out of a pocket. Her father 
had vanished, and there was even yet noth- 
ing in that to reawaken the pang of loss. 
" Here 's money, " said the brown lady : " go ! " 
The sound was commanding; the cab rattled 
off; Maisie sat there with her hand full of 
coin. All that for a cab } — as they passed a 
street-lamp she bent to see how much. 
What she saw was a cluster of sovereigns. 
There must, then, have been great interests 
in America. It was still, at any rate, the 
Arabian Nights. 



XX 

The money was far too much even for a 
fee in a fairy-tale, and in the absence of 
Mrs. Beale, who, though the hour was now 
late, had not yet returned to the Regent's 
Park, Susan Ash, in the hall, as loud as 
Maisie was low and as bold as she was bland, 



254 

produced, on the exhibition offered under 
the dim vigil of the lamp that made the 
place a contrast to the child's recent scene 
of light, the half-crown that an unsophisti- 
cated cabman could pronounce to be the 
least he would take. It was apparently long 
before Mrs. Beale would arrive, and in the 
interval Maisie had been induced by the 
prompt Susan not only to go to bed like a 
darling dear, but, in still richer expression 
of that character, to devote to the repay- 
ment of obligations general as well as partic- 
ular one of the sovereigns in the fanciful 
figure that, on a dressing-table upstairs, was 
naturally not less dazzling to a lone orphan 
of a housemaid than to the subject of the 
manoeuvres of a quartette. This subject went 
to sleep with her property under her pillow; 
but the explanations that on the morrow 
were inevitably more complete with Mrs. 
Beale than they had been with her humble 
friend found a climax in a surrender also 
more becomingly free. There were expla- 
nations indeed that Mrs. Beale had to give 
as well as to ask, and the most striking of 
these was to the effect that it was dreadful 
for a little girl to take money from a woman 
who was simply the vilest of their sex. The 



 255 

sovereigns were examined with some atten- 
tion, the result of which, however, was to 
make Mrs. Beale desire to know what, if one 
really went into the matter, they could be 
called but the wages of sin. Her companion 
went into it merely to the point of inquiring 
what then they were to do with them; on 
which Mrs. Beale, who had by that time put 
them into her pocket, replied with dignity 
and with her hand on the place: "We're to 
send them back on the spot ! " Susan, the 
child soon afterwards learnt, had been invited 
to contribute to this act of restitution her 
one appropriated coin; but a closer clutch 
of the treasure showed in her private assur- 
ance to Maisie that there was a limit to the 
way she could be " done. " Maisie had been 
open with Mrs. Beale about the whole of 
last night's transaction; but she now found 
herself, on the part of their indignant infe- 
rior, a recipient of remarks that she must feel 
to be scaring secrets. One of these bore 
upon the extraordinary hour — it was three 
in the morning, if she really wanted to know 
— at which Mrs. Beale had re-entered the 
house; another, in accents as to which 
Maisie' s criticism was still intensely tacit, 
characterized that lady's appeal as such a 



2s6 

"gime," such a " shime " as one had never had 
to put up with; a third treated with some 
vigor the question of the enormous sums 
due below stairs, in every department, for 
gratuitous labor and wasted zeal. Our 
young lady's consciousness was indeed mainly 
filled for several days with the apprehension 
created by the too slow subsidence of her 
attendant's sense of wrong. These days 
would be exciting indeed if an outbreak in 
the kitchen should crown them ; and, to pro- 
mote that prospect, she had more than one 
glimpse, through Susan's eyes, of forces 
making for an earthquake. To listen to 
Susan was to gather that the spark applied 
to the inflammables and already causing 
them to crackle was the circumstance of 
one's being called a horrid low thief for re- 
fusing to part with one's own. 

The redeeming point of this tension was, 
on the fifth day, that it actually appeared to 
have had to do with a breathless perception 
in our heroine's breast that, scarcely more 
as the centre of Sir Claude's than as that of 
Susan's energies, she had soon after break- 
fast been conveyed from London to Folke- 
stone and established at a lovely hotel. 
These agents, before her wondering eyes, had 



 257 

combined to carry through the adventure and 
to give it the air of having owed its success 
to the fact that Mrs. Beale had, as Susan 
said, but just stepped out. When Sir 
Claude, watch in hand, had met this fact with 
the exclamation "Then pack Miss Farange 
and come off with us ! " there had ensued on 
the stairs a series of gymnastics of a nature 
to bring Miss Farange' s heart into her 
mouth. She sat with Sir Claude in a four- 
wheeler while he still held his watch; held 
it longer than any doctor who had ever felt 
her pulse, long enough to give her a vision of 
something like the ecstasy of neglecting such 
an opportunity to show impatience. The 
ecstasy had begun in the schoolroom and over 
the Berceuse, quite in the manner of the 
same foretaste on the day, a little while 
back, when Susan had panted up and she 
herself, after the hint about the Duchess, 
had sailed down; for what harm then had 
there been in drops and disappointments if 
she could still have, even only a moment, 
the sensation of such a name " brought up " ? 
It had remained with her that her father had 
told her she would some day be in the street, 
but it clearly wouldn't be this day; and she 
felt justified of her preference as soon as her 

17 



2s8 

visitor had set Susan in motion and laid his 
hand, while she waited with him, kindly on 
her own. That was what the Captain in 
Kensington Gardens had done; her present 
situation reminded her a little of that one, 
and renewed the dim wonder of the way in 
which, from the first, such pats and pulls had 
struck her as the steps and signs of other 
people's business and even a little as the 
wriggle or the overflow of their difficulties. 
What had failed her and what had frightened 
her on the night of the Exhibition lost them- 
selves at present alike in the impression that 
what would come from Sir Claude was too 
big to come all aj: once. Any awe that 
might have sprung from his air of leaving 
out her stepmother was corrected by the 
force of a general rule, the odd truth that if 
Mrs. Beale now never came nor went with- 
out making her think of him, it was not, to 
balance that, the main character of his own 
contact to appear to be a reference to Mrs. 
Beale. To be with Sir Claude was to think 
of Sir Claude, and that law governed Maisie's 
mind until, through a sudden lurch of the 
cab, which had at last taken in Susan and 
ever so many bundles and almost reached 
Charing Cross, it popped again somehow 



 259 

into her dizzy head the long-lost image of 
Mrs. Wix. 

It was singular, but from this time she 
understood and she followed, followed with 
the sense of an ample filling-out of any void 
created by symptoms of avoidance and of 
flight. Her ecstasy was a thing that had yet 
more of a face than of a back to turn, a pair 
of eyes still directed to Mrs. Wix even after 
the slight surprise of their not finding her, 
as the journey expanded, either at the London 
station or at the Folkestone hotel. It took 
few hours to make the child feel that if she 
was in neither of these places she was at least 
everywhere else. Maisie had known all 
along a great deal, but never so much as she 
was to know from this moment on, and as 
she learned in particular during the couple 
of days that she was to hang in the air, as it 
were, over the sea which represented, in 
breezy blueness and with a summer charm, a 
crossing of more spaces than the Channel. 
It was given to her at this time to arrive at 
divinations so ample that I shall have no 
room for the goal if I attempt to trace the 
stages; as to which therefore I must be 
content to say that the fullest expression we 
may give to Sir Claude's conduct is a poor 



26o 

and pale copy of the picture it presented to 
his young friend. Abruptly, that morning, 
he had yielded to the action of the idea 
pumped into him for weeks by Mrs. Wix on 
lines of approach that she had been capable 
of the extraordinary art of preserving from 
entanglement with the fine network of his 
relations with Mrs. Beale. The breath of 
her sincerity, blowing without a break, had 
puffed him up to the flight by which, in the 
degree I have indicated, Maisie too was car- 
ried off her feet. This consisted in neither 
more nor less than the brave stroke of his 
getting off from Mrs. Beale as well as from 
his wife — of making with the child straight 
for some such foreign land as would give a 
support to Mrs. Wix's dream that she might 
still see his errors renounced and his delin- 
quencies redeemed. What other reparation 
could have the beauty of his devoting him- 
self, under eyes that would miss no faintest 
shade of the sacrifice, to the relief and rescue, 
to what even the strange frequenters of her 
ladyship's earlier period used to call the 
real good, of the little unfortunate ? Maisie' s 
head held a suspicion of all that, during the 
last long interval, had confusedly, but quite 
candidly, come and gone in his own; a 



 261 

glimpse, almost awe-stricken in its gratitude, 
of the miracle her old governess had wrought. 
That functionary could not, in this connec- 
tion, have been more impressive, even at 
second-hand, if she had been a prophetess 
with an open scroll or some ardent abbess 
speaking with the lips of the Church. She 
had clung day by day to their plastic asso- 
ciate, plying him with her deep, narrow pas- 
sion, doing her simple utmost to convert him, 
and so inspiring him that he had at last really 
embraced his fine chance. That the chance 
was not delusive was sufficiently guaranteed 
by the completeness with which he could 
finally figure it out that, in case of his taking 
action, neither Ida nor Beale, whose book on 
each side it would only too well suit, would 
make any sort of row. 

It sounds, no doubt, too penetrating, but 
it was by, no means all through Sir Claude's 
betrayals that Maisie was able to piece to- 
gether the beauty of the special influence 
through which, for such stretches of time, 
he had refined upon propriety by keeping so 
far as possible his sentimental interests dis- 
tinct. She had ever of course in her mind 
fewer names than conceptions, but it was 
only with this drawback that she now made 



262 

out her companion's absences to have had 
for their ground that he was the lover of her 
stepmother, and that the lover of her step- 
mother could scarce logically pretend to a 
superior right to look after her. Maisie had 
by this time embraced the implication of a 
kind of natural divergence between lovers and 
little girls. It was just this indeed that 
could throw light on the probable contents 
of the pencilled note deposited on the hall- 
table in the Regent's Park, and which would 
greet Mrs. Beale on her return. Maisie 
freely figured it as provisionally jocular in 
tone, even though to herself, on this occasion, 
Sir Claude turned a graver face than he had 
shown in any crisis but that of putting her 
into the cab when she had been horrid to 
him after her parting with the Captain. He 
might really be embarrassed, but he would 
be sure, to her view, to have muffled in some 
bravado of pleasantry the disturbance pro- 
duced at her father's by the removal of a 
valued servant. Not that there wasn't a 
great deal too that would n't be in the note — 
a great deal for which a more comfortable 
place was Maisie' s light little brain, where 
it hummed away hour after hour and caused 
the first outlook at Folkestone to swim in 



/ 



 263 

V a softness of color and sound. It became 

clear in this medium that her stepfather had 
really now only to take into account his en- 
tanglement with Mrs. Beale. Was n't he at 
last disentangled from every one and every- 
thing else.? The obstacle to the rupture 

•^ pressed upon him by Mrs. Wix in the inter- 

est of his virtue would be simply that he 
was in love, oi* rather, to put it more pre- 
cisely, that Mrs. Beale had left him no doubt 
of the degree in which she was. She was so 
much so as to have succeeded in making him 

' accept for a time her infatuated grasp of him 

and even to some extent the idea of what they 
yet might do together with a little diplomacy 
and a good deal of patience. I may not even 
answer for it that Maisie was not aware of 
how, in this, Mrs. Beale failed to share his 
all but insurmountable distaste for their 
allowing their little charge to breathe the air 
of their gross irregularity — his contention, 
in a word, that they should either cease to 
be irregular or cease to be parental. Their 
little charge, for herself, had long ago 
adopted the view that even Mrs. Wix had at 
one time not thought prohibitively coarse — 
the view that she was after all, cls a little 
charge, morally at home in atmospheres it 



/^ 



264 

would be appalling to analyze. If Mrs. Wix, 
however, ultimately appalled, had now set her 
heart on strong measures, Maisie, as I have 
intimated, could also work round both to the 
reasons for them and to the quite other 
reasons for that lady's not, as yet at least, 
appearing in them at first hand. 

Oh, decidedly, I shall never get you to be- 
lieve the number of things she saw and the 
number of secrets she discovered ! Why in 
the world, for instance, couldn't Sir Claude 
have kept it from her — except on the hypoth- 
esis of his not caring to — that, when you 
came to look at it and so far as it was a 
question of vested interests, lie had quite as 
much right in her as her stepmother, and a 
right that Mrs. Beale was in no position to 
dispute? He failed, at all events, of any 
such successful ambiguity as could keep 
her, when once they began to look across at 
France, from regarding even what was least 
explained as most in the spirit of their old 
happy times, their rambles and expeditions 
in the easier, better days of their first ac- 
quaintance. Never before had she had so 
the sense of giving him a lead for the sort of 
treatment of what was between them that 
would best carry it off, or of his being grate- 



 265 

ful to her for meeting him so much in the 
right place. She met him literally at the 
very point where Mrs. Beale was most to be 
reckoned with, the point of the jealousy that 
was sharp in that lady and of the need of their 
keeping it as long as possible obscure to her 
that poor Mrs. Wix had still a hand. Yes, 
she met him too in the truth of the matter 
that, as her stepmother had had no one else 
to be jealous of, she had made up for so gross 
a privation by directing the sentiment to a 
moral influence. Sir Claude appeared abso- 
lutely to convey in a wink that a moral influ- 
ence that could pull a string was after all a 
moral influence that could have its eyes 
scratched out ; and that, this being the case, 
there was somebody they could n't afford to 
expose before they should see a little better 
#hat Mrs. Beale was likely to do. Maisie, 
true enough, had not to put it into words to 
rejoin in the coffee-room at luncheon: 
" What can she do but come to you if papa 
does take a step that will amount to legal 
desertion } " Neither had he then, in answer, 
to articulate anything but the jollity of their 
having found a table at a window from 
which, as they partook of cold beef and apol- 
linaris — for he hinted they would have to 



266 

save lots of money — they could let their 
eyes hover tenderly on the far-off white cliflfs 
that so often had signalled to the embar- 
rassed English a promise of safety. Maisie 
stared at them as if she might really make 
out after a little a queer, dear figure perched 
on them — a figure as to which she had 
already the subtle sense that, wherever 
perched, it would be the very oddest yet seen 
in France. But it was at least as exciting 
to feel where Mrs. Wix was n't as it would 
have been to know where she was ; and if she 
wasn't yet at Boulogne, this only thickened 
the plot. 

If she was not to be seen that day, how- 
ever, the evening was marked by an appari- 
tion before which, none the less, the savor 
of suspense folded, on the spot, its wings. 
Adjusting her respirations and attachi^, 
under dropped lashes, all her thoughts to a 
smartness of frock and frill for which she 
could reflect that she had not appealed in 
vain to a loyalty, in Susan Ash, triumphant 
over the nice things their feverish flight had 
left behind, Maisie spent on the bench in 
the garden of the hotel the half-hour before 
dinner, that mysterious ceremony of the table 
cThSte for which she had prepared with a 



/ 



 267 

punctuality of flutter. Sir Claude, beside 
her, was occupied with a cigarette and the 
afternoon papers ; and though the hotel was 
full the garden showed the particular void 
that ensues upon the sound of the dressing- 
bell. She had almost had time to weary of 
the human scene ; her own humanity, at any 
rate, in the shape of a smutch on her scanty 
skirt, had held her so long that as soon as 
she raised her eyes they rested on a high, 
fair drapery by which smutches were put to 
shame and which had glided toward her over 
the grass without her perceiving its rustle. 
She followed up its stiff sheen — up and up 
from the ground, where it had stopped — till, 
at the end of a considerable journey, her 
impression felt the shock of the fixed face 
which, surmounting it, seemed to offer the 
Amax of the dressed condition. "Why, 
mamma ! " she cried the next instant — cried 
in a tone that, as she sprang to her feet, 
brought Sir Claude to his own beside her 
and gave her ladyship, a few yards off, the 
advantage of their momentary confusion. 
Poor Maisie's was immense; her mother's 
drop had the effect of one of the iron shut- 
ters that, in evening walks with Susan Ash, 
she 'had seen suddenly, at the touch of a 



268 

spring, rattle down over shining shop-fronts. 
The light of foreign travel was darkened at a 
stroke; she had a horrible sense that they 
were caught; and for the first time in her 
life, in Ida's presence, she so far translated 
an impulse into an invidious act as to clutch 
straight at the hand of her responsible con- 
federate. It did n't help her that he appeared 
at first equally hushed with horror; a minute 
during which, in the empty garden, with its 
long shadows on the lawn, its blue sea over 
the hedge and its startled peace in the air, 
both her elders remained as stiff as tall tum- 
blers filled to the brim and held straight for 
fear of a spill. At last, in a tone that, in its 
unexpected softness, enriched the whole sur- 
prise, her mother said to Sir Claude: "Do 
you mind at all my speaking to her.? " 

"Oh, no; do you.?" His reply was *o 
long in coming that Maisie was the first to 
find the right note. 

He laughed as he seemed to take it from 
her, and she felt a suflScient concession in 
his manner of addressing their visitor. 
" How in the world did you know we were 
here.?" 

His wife, at this, came the rest of the way 
and sat down on the bench with a hand laid 



 269 

on her daughter, whom she gracefully drew 
to her and in whom, at her touch, the fear 
just kindled gave a second jump, but now in 
quite another direction. Sir Claude, on the 
further side, resumed his seat and his news- 
papers, and the three grouped themselves like 
a family party : his connection, in the oddest 
way in the world, almost cynically, and in a 
flash, acknowledged, and the mother patting 
the child into conformities unspeakable. 

Maisie could already feel that it was not 
Sir Claude and she who were caught. She 
had the' positive sense of catching their 
relative, catching her in the act of getting 
rid of her burden with a finality that showed 
her as unprecedentedly relaxed. Oh, yes, 
the fear had dropped, and she had never been 
so irrevocably parted with as in the pressure 
of possession now supremely exerted by Ida*s 
long-gloved and much-bangled arms. " I went 
to the Regent's Park " — this was presently 
her ladyship's answer to Sir Claude. 

" Do you mean to-day ? " 

"This morning — just after your own call 
there. That's how I find you out; that's 
what has brought me." 

Sir Claude considered, and Maisie waited. 
"Whom then did you see.^ " 



270 

Ida gave a sound of indulgent mockery. 
" I like your scare. I know your game. I 
did n't see the person I risked seeing — but 
I had been ready to take my chance of her." 
She addressed herself to Maisie; she had 
encircled her more closely. "I asked for 
youy my dear, but I saw no one but a dirty 
parlor-maid. She was red in the face with 
the great things that, as she told me, had 
just happened in the absence of her mistress; 
and she luckily had the sense to have made 
out the place to which Sir Claude had come 
to take you. If he had n't given a false scent 
I should find you here : that was the supposi- 
tion on which I've proceeded." Ida had 
never been so explicit about proceeding or 
supposing, and Maisie, drinking this in, was 
aware that Sir Claude shared her fine im- 
pression of it. "I wanted to see you," his 
wife continued, "and now you can judge of 
the trouble I *ve taken. I had everything 
to do in town to-day, but I managed to get 
off." 

Maisie and her companion, for a moment, 
did justice to this achievement; but Maisie 
was the first to express it. " I 'm glad you 
wanted to see me, mamma." Then after 
a concentration more deep and with a plunge 



/i 



■ll 



 271 

more brave: "A little more and you 'd have 
been too late." It stuck in her throat, but 
she brought it out. " We 're going to 
France." 

Ida was magnificent ; Ida kissed her on the 
forehead. " That 's just what I thought likely 
— it made me decide to run down. I fan- 
cied that in spite of your scramble you 'd 
wait to cross, and it added to the reason I 
have for seeing you. " 

Maisie wondered intensely what the reason 
could be, but she knew ever so much better 
than to ask. She was slightly surprised 
indeed to perceive that Sir Claude did n't, 
and to hear him immediately inquire: 
"What in the name of goodness can you 
have to say to her.?" 

His tone was not exactly rude, but it was 
impatient enough to make his wife's re- 
sponse a fresh specimen of the new softness. 
"That, my dear man, is all my own busi- 
ness. " 

"Do you mean," Sir Claude asked, "that 
you wish me to leave you with her ? " 

"Yes — if you '11 be so good. That 's the 
extraordinary request I take the liberty of 
making." Her ladyship had dropped to a 
mildness of irony by which, for a moment, 



272 

poor Maisie was mystified and charmed, puz- 
zled with a glimpse of something that in all 
the years had at intervals peeped out. Ida 
smiled at Sir Claude with the strange air 
she had on such occasions of defying an in- 
terlocutor to keep it up as long; her huge 
eyes, her red lips, the intense marks in her 
face, formed an illumination as distinct and 
public as a lamp set in a window. The 
child seemed quite to see in it the very lamp 
that had lighted her path; she suddenly 
found herself reflecting that it was no won- 
der the gentlemen were dazzled. This must 
have been the way mamma had first looked 
at Sir Claude; it brought back the lustre of 
the time they had outlived. It must have 
been the way she looked also at Mr. Perriam 
and Lord Eric; above all it contributed in 
Maisie' s mind to a completer view of the 
Captain. Our young lady grasped this idea 
with a quick lifting of the heart ; there was 
a stillness during which her mother flooded- 
her with a wealth of support to the Captain's 
striking tribute. This stillness remained 
long enough unbroken to represent that Sir 
Claude too might literally be struggling 
again with the element that had originally 
upset him; so that Maisie quite hoped he 



 273 

would at least say something to show a recog- 
nition that she could be charming. 

What he presently said was; "Are you 
putting up for the night?" 

His wife hesitated. "Not here — I've 
come from Dover." 

Over Maisie*s head, at this, they still faced 
each other. "You spend the night there? " 

" Yes — I brought some things. I went to 
the hotel and hastily arranged; then I 
caught the train that whisked me on here. 
You see what a day I've had of it." 

The statement may surprise, but these 
were really as obliging if not as lucid words 
as, into her daughter's ears at least, Ida's 
lips had ever dropped ; and there was a quick 
desire in the daughter that, for the hour at 
any rate, they should duly be welcomed as a 
ground of intercourse. Certainly mamma 
had a charm which, when turned on, became 
a large explanation; and the only danger 
now in an impulse to applaud it would be 
that of appearing to signalize its rarity. 
Maisie, however, risked this peril in the 
geniality of an admission that Ida had indeed 
had a rush; and she invited Sir Claude to 
expose himself by agreeing with her that the 

rush had been even worse than theirs. He 

18 



■ 
1 



274 

appeared to meet this appeal by saying with 
detachment enough: "You go back there 
to-night?" 

"Oh, yes — there are plenty of trains." 
Again Sir Claude hesitated; it would have 
been hard to say if the child between them 
more connected or divided them. Then he 
brought out quietly : " It will be late for you 
to knock about. I '11 see you over." 

" You need n't trouble, thank you. I think 
you won't deny that I can help myself and 
that it is n't the first time in my dreadful life 
that I ' ve somehow managed it. " Save for 
this allusion to her dreadful life they talked 
there, Maisie noted, as if they were only 
rather superficial friends; a special effect 
that she had often wondered at before in the 
midst of what she supposed to be intimacies. 
This effect was augmented by the almost 
casual manner in which her ladyship went 
on : "I dare say I shall go abroad. " 

" From Dover, do you mean, straight ? " 

"How straight I can't say. I'm exces- 
sively ill. " This, for a minute, struck Maisie 
as but a part of the conversation ; at the end 
of which time she became aware that it ought 
to strike her — as it apparently didn't strike 
Sir Claude — as a part of something graver. 



1 



 275 

It helped her to twist nearer. " 111, mamma 
— really ill ? " 

She regretted her "really" as soon as she 
had spoken it ; but there could n't be a better 
proof of her mother's present polish than 
that Ida showed no gleam of a temper to 
take it up. She had taken up at other 
times much tinier things. She only pressed 
Maisie's head against her bosom and said: 
"Shockingly, my dear. I must go to that 
new place. " 

"What new place .^" Sir Claude inquired. 

Ida thought, but could n't recall it. " Oh, 
' Chose, ' you know — where every one goes. 
I want some proper treatment. It 's all I 've 
ever asked for on earth. But that 's not what 
I came to say." 

Sir Claude, in silence, folded one by one 
his newspapers; then he rose and stood 
whacking the palm of his hand with the 
bundle. " You '11 stop and dine with us } " 

"Dear no — I can't dine at this sort of 
hour. I ordered dinner at Dover." 

Her ladyship's tone in this one instance 
showed a certain superiority to those condi- 
tions in which her daughter had artlessly 
found Folkestone a paradise. It was yet not 
so crushing as to nip in the bud the eager- 



276 

ness with which the latter broke out : " But 
won't you at least have a cup of tea? " 

Ida kissed her again on the brow. 
"Thanks, love. I had tea before coming." 
She raised her eyes to Sir Claude. " She is 
sweet!" He made no more answer than if 
he didn't agree; but Maisie was at ease 
about that and was still taken up with the joy 
of this happier pitch of their talk, which put 
more and more of a meaning into the Cap- 
tain's version of her ladyship and literally 
kindled a conjecture that this admirer might, 
over there at the other place, be waiting for 
her to dine. Was the same conjecture in Sir 
Claude's mind ? He partly puzzled her, if 
it had risen there, by the slight perversity 
with which he returned to a question that his 
wife evidently thought she had disposed of. 

He whacked his hand again with his papers. 
" I had really much better take you." 

"And leave Maisie here alone?" 

Mamma so clearly didn't want it that 
Maisie leaped at the vision of a Captain who 
had seen her on from Dover and who, while 
he waited to take her back, would be hover- 
ing just at the same distance at which, in 
Kensington Gardens, the companion of his 
walk had herself hovered. Of course, how* 



/ 



 277 

ever, instead of breathing any such guess she 
let Sir Claude reply ; all the more that his 
reply could contribute so much to her own 
present grandeur. " She won't be alone 
when she has a maid in attendance." 

Maisie had never before had so much of a 
retinue and she waited also to enjoy the ef- 
fect of it on her ladyship. " You mean the 
woman you brought from town? " Ida con- 
sidered. " The person at the house spoke of 
her in a way that scarcely made her out com- 
pany for my child." She spoke as if her 
child had never wanted, in her hands, for pro- 
digious company. But she as distinctly con- 
tinued to decline Sir Claude's. " Don't be an 
old goose," she said charmingly. "Let us 
alone.*' 

Before them, on the grass, he looked 
graver than Maisie at all now thought the 
occasion warranted. " I don't see why you 
can't say it before me." 

His wife smoothed one of her daughter's 
curls. "Say what, dear?" 

" Why, what you came to say." 

At this Maisie at last interposed ; she ap- 
pealed to Sir Claude. " Do let her say it to 
me. 

He looked hard for a moment at his little 



278 

friend. " How do you know what she may 
say?" 

" She must risk it," Ida remarked. 

" I only want to protect you," he continued 
to the child. 

"You want to protect yourself — that's 
what you mean," his wife replied. "Don't 
be afraid. I won't touch you." 

" She won't touch you — she warit ! " 
Maisie declared. She felt by this time that 
she could really answer for it, and something 
of the emotion with which she had listened 
to the Captain came back to her. It made 
her so happy and so secure that she could 
positively patronize mamma. She did so in 
the Captain's very language. *' She 's good, 
she 's good ! " she proclaimed. 

" Oh, Lord ! " Sir Claude, at this, ejacu- 
lated. He appeared to have emitted some 
sound of derision that was smothered, to 
Maisie's ears, by her being again embraced 
by his wife. Ida released her and held her 
off a little, looking at her with a very queer 
face. Then the child became aware that 
their companion had left them and that, from 
the face in question, a confirmatory remark 
had proceeded. 

" I am good, love," said her ladyship. 



i 



 279 



XXI 



A GOOD deal of the rest of Ida's visit was 
devoted to explaining, as it were, so extra- 
ordinary a statement. This explanation was 
more copious than any she had yet indulged 
in, and as the summer twilight gathered and 
she kept her child in the garden she was con- 
ciliatory to a degree that let her need to 
arrange things a little perceptibly peep out. 
It was not merely that she explained; she 

K almost conversed: all that was wanting to 

that was that she should have positively 
chattered a little less. It was really the oc- 
casion of Maisie's life on which her mother 
was to have had most to say to her. That 
alone was an implication of generosity and 
virtue, and no great stretch was required to 
make our young lady feel that she should 
best meet her and soonest have it over by 
simply seeming struck with the propriety of 
her contention. They sat together while the 
parent's gloved hand sometimes rested 
sociably on the child's and sometimes gave a 

* corrective pull to a ribbon too meagre or a 

tress too thick ; and Maisie was conscious of 



28o 

the effort to keep out of her eyes the wonder 
with which they were occasionally moved to 
blink. Oh, there would have been things to 
blink at if one had let one's self go ; and it 
was lucky they were alone together, without 
Sir Claude or Mrs. Wix or even Mrs. Beale 
to catch an imprudent glance. Though pro- 
fuse and prolonged, her ladyship was not 
exhaustively lucid, and her account of her 
situation, so far as it could be called 
descriptive, was a muddle of inconsequent 
things, bruised fruit of an occasion she had 
rather too lightly affronted. None of them 
were really thought out, and some were even 
not wholly insincere. It was as if she had 
asked outright what better proof could have 
been wanted of her goodness and her great- 
ness than just this marvellous consent to give 
up what she had so cherished. It was as if 
she had said in so many words: "There 
have been things between us — between Sir 
Claude and me — which I needn't go into, 
you little nuisance, because you would n't 
understand them." It suited her to convey 
that Maisie had been kept, so far as she was 
concerned or could imagine, in a holy igno- 
rance and that she must take for granted a 
supreme simplicity. She turned this way 



 281 

and that in the predicament she had sought 
and from which she could neither retreat with 
grace nor emerge w^ith credit; she draped 
herself in the tatters of her impudence, pos- 
tured to her utmost before the last little tri- 
angle of cracked glass to which so many 
fractures had reduced the polished plate of 
filial superstition. If neither Sir Claude nor 
Mrs. Wix was there this was perhaps all the 
more a pity : the scene had a style of its own 
that would have qualified it for presentation, 
especially at such a moment as that of her 
letting it betray that she quite did think her 
wretched offspring better placed with Sir 
Claude than in her own soiled hands. There 
was at any rate nothing scant either in her 
admissions or her perversions, the mixture of 
her fear of what Maisie might undiscoverably 
think and of the support she at the same time 
gathered from a necessity of selfishness and 
a habit of brutality. This habit flushed 
through the merit she now made, in terms 
explicit, of not having come to Folkestone to 
kick up a vulgar row. She had not come to 
box any ears or to bang any doors or even 
to use any language ; she had come, at the 
worst, to lose the thread of her argument in 
an occasional dumb, disgusted twitch of the 



282 

toggery in which Mrs. Beale's low domestic 
had had the impudence to serve up Miss 
Farange. She checked all criticism, not 
committing herself even as much as about 
those missing comforts of the schoolroom on 
which Mrs. Wix had presumed. 

" I am good — I 'm crazily, I 'm criminally 
good. But it won't do for you any more, and 
if I Ve ceased to contend with him, and with 
you too, who have made most of the trouble 
between us, it *s for reasons that you *11 under- 
stand one of these days but too well — one of 
these days when I hope you *11 know what it 
is to have lost a mother. I 'm awfully ill, but 
you must n't ask me anything about it. If I 
don't get off somewhere my doctor won't an- 
swer for the consequences. He's stupefied 
at what I 've borne — he says it has been put 
on me because I was formed to suffer. I 'm 
thinking of South Africa, but that 's none of 
your business. You must take your choice 
— you can't ask me questions if you *re so 
ready to give me up. No, I won't tell you : 
you can find out for yourself. South Africa 
is wonderful, they say, and if I do go it 
must be to give it a fair trial. It must be 
either one thing or the other; if he takes 
you, you know, he takes you. I've struck 



 283 

my last blow for you ; I can follow you no 
longer from pillar to post. I must live for 
myself at last — while there 's still a handful 
left of me. I 'm very very ill ; I 'm very very 
tired ; I 'm very very determined. There you 
have it : make the most of it. Your frock is 
too filthy — but I came to sacrifice myself" 
Maisie looked at the peccant places; there 
were moments when it was a relief to her to 
drop her eyes even on anything so sordid. 
All her interviews, all her ordeals with her 
mother had, as she had grown older, seemed 
to have, before any other, the hard quality of 
duration ; but longer than any, strangely, were 
these minutes offered to her as so pacific and 
so agreeably winding up the connection. It 
was her anxiety that made them long, her fear 
of some hitch, some check of the current, one 
of her ladyship's famous quick jumps. She 
held her breath ; she only wanted, by play- 
ing into her visitor's hands, to see the thing 
through. But her impatience itself made at 
instants the whole situation swim ; there were 
things Ida said which she perhaps didn 't 
hear, and ther ejv^e thi ngs she he ard that 

•'•^iLPH^^E^-^^Sl^ ^^y- ** ^^^ '^^ ^^^ ^ have, 
and yet I'm capable of this. Your father 

wishes you were dead — that, my dear^ is 



284 

what your father wishes. You *11 have to get 
used to it as I Ve done — I mean to his wish- 
ing that Vm dead. At all events you see for 
yourself how wonderful I am to Sir Claude. 
He wishes me dead quite as much; and I*m 
sure that if making me scenes about you could 
have killed me — ! " It was the mark of Ida's 
eloquence that she started more hares than 
she followed, and she gave but a glance in 
the direction of this one; going on to say 
that the very proof of her treating her hus- 
band like an angel was that he had just stolen 
off not to be fairly shamed. She spoke as if 
he had retired on tiptoe as he might have 
withdrawn from a place of sanctity in which 
he was not fit to be present. " You '11 never 
know what I Ve been through about you — 
never, never, never. I spare you everything, 
as I always have ; though I dare say you know 
things that, if I did (I mean if I knew you 
knew them), would make me — well, no mat- 
ter ! You 're old enough at any rate to know 
there are a lot of things I don't say that 
I easily might; though it would do me 
good, I assure you, to have spoken my mind 
for once in my life. I don't speak of your 
father's infamous wife : that may give you a 
notion of the way I 'm letting you off. When 



 285 

I say ' you * I mean your precious friends and 
backers. If you don't do justice to my for- 
bearing, out of delicacy, to mention, just as a 
last word, about your stepfather, a little fact 
or two — of a kind that really I should only 
have to mention to shine, myself, in com- 
parison and after every calumny, like pure 
gold : if you don't do me that justice you '11 
never do me justice at all ! " 

Maisie's desire to show what justice she 
did her had by this time become so intense 
as to have brought with it an inspiration. 
The great effect of their encounter had been 
to confirm her sense of being launched with 
Sir Claude, to make it rich and full beyond 
anything she had dreamed, and everything 
now conspired to suggest that a single soft 
touch of her small hand would complete the 
good work and set her ladyship so promptly 
and majestically afloat as to leave the great 
sea-way clear for the morrow. This was the 
more the case as her hand had for some 
moments been rendered free by a marked 
manoeuvre of both of her mother's. One of 
these capricious members had fumbled with 
visible impatience in some backward depth 
of drapery, and had presentiy reappeared 
with a small object in its grasp. The act had 



286 

a significance for a little person trained, in that 
relation, from an early age, to keep an eye on 
manual motions, and its possible bearing was 
not darkened by the memory of the handful 
of gold that Susan Ash would never, never 
believe Mrs. Beale had sent back — " not she : 
she *s too false and too greedy ! " — to the 
munificent Countess. To have guessed, none 
the less, that her ladyship's purse might con- 
fess an identity with the token extracted from 
the rustling covert of her rear — this suspicion 
gave on the spot to the child's eyes a direc- 
tion carefully distant. It added moreover to 
the optimism that for the hour could ruffle 
the surface of her deep diplomacy, ruffle it 
to the point of making her forget that she 
had never been safe unless she had also been 
stupid. She in short forgot her habitual 
caution in her impulse to adopt her lady- 
ship's practical interests and show her lady- 
ship how perfectly she understood them. 
She saw without looking that her mother 
pressed a little clasp ; heard without wanting 
to the sharp click that marked the closing 
of a portemonnaie from which something had 
been taken. What this was she just did n't 
see : it was not too substantial to be locked 
with ease in the fold of her ladyship's fingers. 



 287 

Nothing was less new to Maisie than the art 
of not thinking singly ; so that at this instant 
she could both bring out what was on her 
tongue's end and weigh as to the object in 
her mother's palm, the question of its being 
a sovereign against the question of its being 
a shilling. No sooner had she begun to 
speak than she saw that within a few sec- 
onds this question would have been settled : 
she had foolishly arrested the rising word of 
the little speech of presentation to which, 
under the circumstances, even such a high 
pride as Ida's had had to give some thought. 
She had arrested it completely — that was 
the next thing she felt : the note she sounded 
brought into her companion's eyes a look 
that, quickly enough, seemed at variance with 
presentations. 

"That was what the Captain said to me 
that day, mamma: I think it would have 
given you pleasure to hear the way he spoke 
of you." 

The pleasure, Maisie could now in conster- 
nation reflect, would have been a long time 
coming if it had come no faster than the re- 
sponse evoked by her allusion to it. Her 
mother gave her one of the looks that 
slammed the door in her face: never, in a 



288 

career of unsuccessful experiments, had 
Maisie had to take such a stare. It re- 
minded her of the way that once, at one of 
the lectures in Glower Street, something in 
a big jar that, amid an array of strange 
glasses and bad smells, had been promised 
as a beautiful yellow was produced as a 
beautiful black. She had been sorry on 
that occasion for the lecturer, but she was 
at this moment sorrier for herself. Oh, 
nothing had ever made for twinges like 
mamma's manner of saying: "The Captain? 
What captain } " 

" Why, when we met you in the Gardens 
— the one who took me to sit with him. 
That was exactly what Ae said. " 

Ida met her so far as to appear for an in- 
stant to pick up a lost thread. "What on 
earth did he say } " 

Maisie faltered supremely, but supremely 
she brought it out. " V/hatjyou say, mamma. 
That you 're so good." 

"What ' I ' say.?" Ida slowly rose, keep- 
ing her eyes on her child, and the hand that 
had busied itself in her purse conformed, 
at her side and amid the folds of her dress, 
to a certain stiffening of the arm. " I say 
you *re a precious idiot, and I won't have you 



 289 

put words into my mouth ! " This was much 
more peremptory than a mere contradiction : 
Maisie could only feel on the spot that every- 
thing had broken short off and that their 
communication had abruptly ceased. That 
came out as Ida went on: "What business 
have you to speak to me of him ? " 

Her daughter turned scarlet. " I thought 
you liked him.** 

" Him — the biggest cad in London ? " 
Her ladyship towered again, and in the gath- 
ered dusk the whites of her eyes were huge. 

Maisie* s own, however, could by this time 
pretty well match them ; and she had at least 
now, with the first flare of anger that had 
ever yet lighted her face for a foe, the sense 
of looking up quite as hard as any one could 
look down. " Well, he was kind about you 
then ; he was, and it made me like him. He 
said things — they were beautiful ; they were, 
they were ! *' She was almost capable of the 
violence of forcing this home; for even in 
the midst of her surge of passion — of which, 
in fact, it was a part — there rose in her a 
fear, a pain, a vision ominous, precocious, 

of what it mior^t mftan fnr |ipr mnfhfir'g f^^fp 

t o have fo rfeited such a . loyalty as that. 
There was literally an instant__ in . jyhich 

"19 



290 

Maisie fully saw — saw madness and desola- 
tion, saw ruin and darkness and death. " I 've 
thought of him often since, and I hoped it 
was with him — with him — " Here, in her 
emotion, it failed her, the breath of her filial 
hope. 

But Ida got it out of her. " You hoped, 
you little horror — ?" 

"That it was he who's at Dover; that it 
was he who 's to take you. I mean to South 
Africa," Maisie said with another drop. 

Ida's stupefaction, on this, kept her silent 
unnaturally long; so long that her daughter 
could not only wonder what was coming, but 
perfectly measure the decline of every symp- 
tom of her liberality. She loomed there in 
her grandeur, merely dark and dumb; her 
wrath was clearly still, as it had always been, 
a thing of resource and variety. What Maisie 
least expected of it was, by this law, what 
now occurred : it melted, in the summer twi- 
light, gradually into pity, and the pity, after 
a little, found a cadence to which the renewed 
click of her purse gave an accent. She had 
put back what she had taken out. "You 're 
a dreadful, dismal, deplorable little thing!" 
she murmured ; and with this she turned her 
back and rustled away over the lawn. 



 291 

I- After she had disappeared Maisie dropped 

e upon the bench again and for some time, in 

it the empty garden and the deeper dusk, sat 

jr and stared at the image her flight had still 

il left standing. It had ceased to be her mother 

only, in the strangest way, that it might be- 

1, come her father, the father of whose wish 

that she were dead the announcement still 

it lingered in the air. It was a presence with 

;h vague edges — it continued to front her, to 

cover her; but what reality that she need 

it } reckon with did it represent if Mr. Farange 

er ; were, on his side, also going off — going off 

ut to America with the Countess, or even only 

p- ' to Spa? That question had, from the house, 

in ' a sudden gay answer in the great roar of a 

er gong, and at the same moment she saw Sir 

a, Claude look out for her from the wide, 

ie lighted doorway. At this she went to him, 

at i and he came forward and met her on the 

i- \ lawn. For a minute she was there with 

er him in silence as, just before, at the last, 

ed : she had been with her mother. 

ad** "She's gone.?" 

re "She's gone." 

!".i Nothing more, for the instant, passed be- 

ler I tween them but to move together to the 

' house, where, in the hall, hQ indulged in 

\ 

» 
t 



I 



292 

one of those sudden pleasantries with which, 
to the delight of his stepdaughter, his 
native animation abounded. "Will Miss 
Farange do me the honor to accept my 
arm ? " 

There was nothing in all her days that 
Miss Farange had accepted with such bliss 
— a bright, rich element that floated them 
together to their feast ; before they reached 
which, however, she uttered, in the spirit of 
a glad young lady taken in to her first dinner, 
a sociable word that made him stop short. 
"She goes to South Africa.*' 

"To South Africa.^" His face for a 
moment seemed to swing for a jump; the 
next it took its spring into the extreme of 
hilarity. "Is that what she said?" 

"Oh, yes, quite distinctly. For the 
climate. " 

Sir Claude was now looking at a young 
woman with black hair, a red frock and a 
tiny terrier tucked under her elbow: she 
swept past them on her way to the dining- 
room, leaving an impression of a strong 
scent which mingled, amid the clatter of the 
place, with the hot aroma of food. He had 
become a little graver; he still stopped to 
talk. "I see — I see." Other people 



 293 

brushed by; he was not too grave to notice 
them. " Did she say anything else ? " 

" Oh, yes — a lot more. " 

On this he met her eyes again with some 
intensity ; but he only repeated : " I see — I 
see. " 

Maisie had still her own vision, she brought 
out "I thought she was going to give me 
something. " 

" What kind of a thing ? " 

"Some money that she took out of her 
purse and then put back. " 

Sir Claude* s amusement reappeared. " She 
thought better of it.? Dear thrifty soul! 
How much did she make by that manoeuvre ? " 

Maisie considered. " I did n't see. It 
was very small." 

Sir Claude threw back his head. "Do 
you mean very little ? Sixpence ? " 

Maisie resented this almost as much as if, 
at dinner, she were already bandying jokes 
with an agreeable neighbor. " It may have 
been a sovereign." 

"Or even," Sir Claude suggested, "a ten- 
pound note." She flushed at this sudden 
picture of what she perhaps had lost, and he 
made it more vivid by adding : " Rolled up 
in a tight little ball, you know — her way of 



294 

treating bank-notes as if they were curl* 
papers ! " Maisie's flush deepened both with 
the immense plausibility of this and with 
a fresh wave of the consciousness that was 
always there to remind her of his cleverness 

— the consciousness of how immeasurably 
more, after all, he knew about mamma than 
she. She had lived with her so many times 
without discovering the material of her curl- 
papers or assisting at any other of her deal- 
ings with bank-notes. The tight little ball 
had at any rate rolled away from her forever 

— quite like one of the other balls that Ida's 
cue used to send flying. Sir Claude gave 
her his arm again, and by the time she was 
seated at the table she had perfectly made 
up her mind as to the amount of the sum 
she had forfeited. Everything about her, 
however — the crowded room, the bedizened 
banquet, the savor of dishes, the drama of 
figures — ministered to the joy of life. After 
dinner she smoked with her friend — for that 
was exactly what she felt she did — on a 
porch, a kind of terrace, where the red tips 
of cigars and the light dresses of ladies 
made, under the happy stars, a poetry that 
was almost intoxicating. They talked but 
little, and she was slightly surprised at his 



/ 



 295 

asking for no more news of what her mother 
had said ; but she had no need of talk^ for it 
seemed to her that without it her sense of 
everything overflowed. They smoked and 
smoked, and there was a sweetness in her 
stepfather's silence. At last he said: "Let 
us take another turn — but you must go to 
bed soon. Oh, you know, we *re going to 
have a system ! " Their turn was back into 
the garden, along the dusky paths from which 
they could see the black masts and the red 
lights of boats and hear the calls and cries 
that evidently had to do with happy foreign 
travel; and their system was once more to 
get on beautifully in this further lounge 
without a definite exchange. Yet he finally 
spoke — he broke out as he tossed away the 
match from which he had taken a fresh light. 
" I must go for a stroll ; I *m in a fidget — I 
must walk it off." She fell in with this as 
she fell in with everything; on which he 
went on : " You go up to Miss Ash " — it was 
the name they had started. " You must see 
she 's not in mischief. Can you find your 
way alone ? " 

** Oh, yes ; I 've been up and down seven 
times. " She positively enjoyed the prospect 
of an eighth. 



296 

Still they didn't separate; they stood 
smoking together under the stars. Then at 
last Sir Claude produced it. " I 'm free — 
I'm free!" 

She looked up at him ; it was the very spot 
on which a couple of hours before she had 
looked up at her mother. "You 're free — 
you're free." 

" To-morrow we go to France. " He spoke 
as if he had not heard her; but it did n't pre- 
vent her again concurring. 

" To-morrow we go to France. " 

Again he appeared not to have heard her ; 
and after a moment — it was an effect evi- 
dently of the depth of his reflections and the 
agitation of his soul — he also spoke as if he 
had not spoken before. "I'm free — I'm free.' ' 

She repeated her form of assent. " You 're 
free — you 're free. " 

This time he did hear her and fixed her 
through the darkness with a grave face. But 
he said nothing more ; he simply stooped a 
little and drew her to him — simply held 
her a little and kissed her good-night ; after 
which, having given her a silent push up- 
stairs to Miss Ash, he turned round again to 
the black masts and the red lights. Maisie 
mounted as if France were at the top. 



 297 



XXII 

The next day it seemed to her at the bot- 
tom — down too far in shuddering plunges 
even to leave her a sense, on the Channel 
boat, of the height at which Sir Claude re- 
mained and which had never, in every way, 
been so great as when, much in the wet, 
though in the angle of a screen of canvas, he 
sociably sat with his stepdaughter's head in 
his lap and that of Mrs. Beale's housemaid 
fairly pillowed on his breast. Maisie was 
surprised to learn, as they drew into port, 
that they had had a lovely passage, but this 
emotion at Boulogne was speedily quenched 
in others, above all in the great ecstasy of a 
larger impression of life. She was " abroad, " 
and she gave herself up to it, responded to it 
in the bright air, before the pink houses, 
among the bare-legged fishwives and the red- 
legged soldiers, with the instant certitude of 
a vocation. Her vocation was to see the 
world and to thrill with relish of the pic- 
ture ; she had grown older in five minutes and 
had, by the time they reached the hotel, 
recognized in the institutions and manners 
of France a multitude of affinities and mes- 



298 

sages. Literally, in the course of an hour, 
she found her initiation; a consciousness 
much quickened by the superior part that, 
as soon as they had gobbled down a French 
breakfast — which was indeed a high note in 
the concert — she observed herself to play to 
Susan Ash. Sir Claude, who had already 
bumped against people he knew and who, 
as he said, had business and letters, sent them 
out together for a walk — a walk in which 
the child was avenged, so far as poetic jus- 
tice required, not only for the loud giggles 
that, in their London trudges, used to break 
from her attendant, but for all the years of 
her tendency to produce socially that impres- 
sion of an excess of the queer something 
which had seemed to waver so widely between 
innocence and guilt. On the spot, at Bou- 
logne, though there might have been excess 
there was at least no wavering: she iden- 
tified, she understood, she adored and took 
possession ; feeling herself attuned to every- 
thing and laying her hand, right and left, on 
what had simply been waiting for her. She 
explained to Susan, she laughed at Susan, 
she towered over Susan; and it was somehow 
Susan's stupidity, of which she had never 
yet been so sure, and Susan's bewilderment 



 299 

and Ignorance and antagonism, that gave the 
liveliest rebound to her immediate percep- 
tions and adoptions. The place and the 
people were all a picture together, a picture 
that, when they went down to the wide sands, 
shimmered, in a thousand tints, with the 
pretty organization of the plage^ with the 
gayety of spectators and bathers, with that of 
the language and the weather, and above all 
with that of our young lady's unprecedented 
situation. For it appeared to her that no 
one, since the beginning of time, could have 
had such an adventure or, in an hour, so 
much experience; as a sequel to which she 
only needed, in order to feel with conscious 
wonder how the past was changed, to hear 
Susan, inscrutably aggravated, express a 
preference for the Edgware Road. The past 
was so changed and the circle it had formed 
already so overstepped that on that very 
afternoon, in the course of another walk, she 
found herself inquiring of Sir Claude — and 
without a single scruple — if he were pre- 
pared as yet to name the moment at which 
they should start for Paris. His answer, it 
must be said, gave her the least little chill. 

" Oh, Paris, my dear child — I don't quite 
know about Paris ! " 



300 

This required to be met, but it was much 
less to challenge him than for the rich joy 
of her first discussion of the details of a tour 
that, after looking at him an instant, she i:e- 
plied: "Well, isn't that the real thing, the 
thing that when one does come abroad — ? " 
He had turned grave again, and she merely 
threw that out: it was away of doing jus- 
tice to the seriousness of their life. , She 
could n't, moreover, be so much older since 
yesterday without reflecting that if by this 
time she probed a little he would recog- 
nize that she had done enough for mere 
patience. There was in fact something in 
his eyes that suddenly, to her own, made her 
desertion shabby. Before she could remedy 
this he had answered her last question, an- 
swered it in the way that, of all ways, she 
had least expected. "The thing it doesn't 
do not to do } Certainly — Paris is charm- 
ing. But, my dear fellow, Paris eats your 
head off. I mean it 's so beastly expensive. " 

That note gave her a start ; it suddenly let 
in a harder light. Were they poor, then.? 
— that is, was he poor, really poor beyond 
the pleasantry of apollinaris and cold beef ? 
They had walked to the end of the long jetty 
that enclosed the harbor, and were looking 



 301 

out at the dangers they had escaped, the gray 
horizon that was England, the tumbled sur- 
face of the sea and the brown smacks that 
bobbed upon it. Why had he chosen an em- 
barrassed time to make this foreign dash? — 
unless indeed it was just the dash economic, 
of which she had often heard and on which, 
after another look at the gray horizon and the 
bobbing boats, she was ready to turn round 
with elation. She replied to him quite in his 
own manner. " I see — I see." She smiled 
up at him. ** Our affairs are involved." 

"That's it" — he returned her smile. 
"Mine are not quite so bad as yours; for 
yours are really, my dear man, in a state I 
can't see through at all. But mine will 
do — for a mess." 

She thought this over. " But is n't France 
cheaper than England ? " England, over 
there in the thickening gloom, looked just 
then remarkably dear. 

" I dare say — some parts. " 
"Then can't we live in those parts.?" 
There was something that for a moment, 
in satisfaction of this, he had the air of being 
about to say and yet not saying. What he 
presently said was : " This very place is one 
of them. " 



302 

"Then we shall live here? " 

Hedidn't treat it quite as definitely as she 
liked. " Since we 've come to save money ! " 

This made her press him more. "How 
long shall we stay ? " 

" Oh, three or four days. " 

It took her breath away. " You can save 
money in that time.? " 

He burst out laughing, starting to walk 
again and taking her under his arm. He 
confessed to her on the way that she too had 
put a finger on the weakest of all his weak- 
nesses, the fact, of which he was perfectly 
aware, that he probably might have lived 
within his means if he had never done any- 
thing for thrift. "It *s the happy thoughts 
that do it," he said; "there's nothing so 
ruinous as putting in a cheap week. " Maisie 
heard afresh, among the pleasant sounds of 
the closing day, that steel click of Ida's 
change of mind ; she thought of the ten-pound 
note it would have been delightful at this 
juncture to produce for her companion's en- 
couragement. But the idea was dissipated 
by his saying irrelevantly, in the presence of 
the next thing they stopped to admire : " We 
shall stay till she arrives." 

She turned upon him. " Mrs. Beale > " 



 303 

"Mrs. Wix. I 've had a wire/' he went 
on. " She has seen your mother." 

" Seen mamma ? " Maisie stared. " Where 
in the world ? " 

" Apparently in London. They *ve been 
together. " 

For an instant this looked ominous — a 
fear came into her eyes. "Then she has n't 
gone?" 

" Your mother ? — to South Africa ? I give 
it up, dear boy," Sir Claude said; and she 
seemed literally to see him give it up as he 
stood there and with a kind of absent gaze 
— absent, that is, from her affairs — followed 
the fine stride and shining limbs of a young 
fishwife who had just waded out of the sea 
with her basketful of shrimps. His thought 
came back to her sooner than his eyes. 
" But I dare say it 's all right. She would n't 
come if it was n't — poor old thing : she knows 
rather well what she 's about." 

This was so reassuring that Maisie, after 
turning it over, could make it fit into her 
dream. " Well, what is she about ? " 

He stopped looking, at last, at the fishwife; 
he met his companion's inquiry. " Oh, you 
know ! " There was something in the way 
he said it that made between them more of 



304 

an equality than she had yet imagined ; but it 
had also more the effect of raising her up than 
of letting him down, and what it did with her 
was shown by the sound of her assent. 

" Yes — I know ! " What she knew, what 
she could know, is by this time no secret 
to us: it grew and grew, at any rate, the 
rest of that day, in the air of what he took 
for granted. It was better he should do 
that than attempt to test her knowledge; 
but there, at the worst, was the gist of the 
matter: it was open between them at last 
that their great change, as, speaking as if it 
had already lasted weeks, Maisie called it, 
was somehow built up round Mrs. Wix. 
Before she went to bed that night she knew, 
further, that Sir Claude, since, as he called 
it, they had been on the rush, had received 
more telegrams than one. But they sepa- 
rated again without speaking of Mrs. Beale. 

Oh, what a crossing for the straighteners 
and the old brown dress — which latter 
appurtenance the child saw thriftily revived 
for the possible disasters of travel! The 
wind got up in the night, and from her little 
room at the inn Maisie could hear the noise 
of the sea. The next day it was raining and 
everything different : this was the case even 



 305 

with Susan Ash, who positively crowed over 
the bad weather, partly, it seemed, for relish 
of the time their visitor would have in the 
boat, and partly to point the moral of the 
folly of coming to such holes. In the wet, 
with Sir Claude, Maisie went to the Folke- 
stone packet, on the arrival of which, with 
many signs of the fray, he made her wait 
under an umbrella on the quay; whence, 
almost before the vessel touched, he was to 
be descried, in quest of their friend, wrig- 
gling — that had been his word — through the 
invalids massed upon the deck. It was long 
till he reappeared — it was not indeed till 
every one had landed; when he presented 
the object of his benevolence in a light that 
Maisie scarce knew whether to hold the 
depth of prostration or the climax of success. 
The lady on his arm, still bent beneath her 
late ordeal, was muffled in such draperies as 
had never contributed so much support to 
so much misery. At the hotel, an hour 
later, this ambiguity dropped : assisting Mrs. 
Wix in private to refresh and reinvest her- 
self, Maisie heard from her in detail how 
little she could have achieved if Sir Claude 
had n*t put it in her power. It was a phrase 

that, in her room, she repeated in connec- 

20 



3o6 

tions indescribable: he had put it in her 
power to have "changes," as she said, of the 
most intimate order, adapted to climates and 
occasions so various as to foreshadow in them- 
selves the stages of a vast itinerary. Cheap 
weeks would of course be in their place after 
so much money spent on a governess ; sums 
not grudged, however, by this lady's pupil 
even on her feeling her own appearance give 
rise, through the straighteners, to an atten- 
tion perceptibly mystified. Sir Claude, in 
truth, had had less time to devote to it than 
to Mrs. Wix's; and moreover she would 
rather be in her own shoes than in her 
friend's creaking new ones in the event of an 
encounter with Mrs. Beale. Maisie was too 
lost in the idea of Mrs. Beale's judgment of 
so much newness to pass any judgment her- 
self. Besides, after much luncheon and 
many endearments, the question took quite 
another turn, to say nothing of the pleasure 
of the child's* quick view that there were 
other eyes than Susan Ash's to open to what 
she could show. She could n't show much, 
alas, till it stopped raining, which it declined 
to do that day; but this had only the effect 
of leaving more time for Mrs. Wix's own 
demonstration. It came as they sat in the 



i 



 307 

little white and gold salon which Maisie 
thought the loveliest place she had ever seen 
except perhaps the apartment of the Coun- 
tess ; it came ji^rhile the hard summer storm 
lashed the windows and blew in such a chill 
that Sir Claude, with his hands in his pockets 
and a cigarette in his teeth, fidgeting, frown- 
ing, looking out and turning back, ended by 
causing a smoky little fire to be made in the 
dressy little chimney. It came in spite of 
something that could only be named his air 
of wishing to put it off; an air that had 
served him — oh, as all his airs served him ! — 
to the extent of his having for a couple of 
hours confined the conversation to gratuitous 
jokes and generalities, kept it on the level 
of the little empty coffee-cups and petits 
verves (Mrs. Wix had had two of each !) that 
struck Maisie, through the fumes of the 
French fire and the English tobacco, as a 
token, more than ever, that they were 
launched. She felt now, in close quarters 
and as clearly as if Mrs. Wix had told her, 
that what this lady had come over for was 
not merely to be chaffed and to hear her 
pupil chaffed — not even to hear Sir Claude, 
who knew French in perfection, imitate the 
strange sounds emitted by the English folk 



3o8 

at the hotel. It was perhaps half an effect 
of her present renovation — as if her clothes 
had been somebody's else: she had at any 
rate never produced such an impression of 
high color, of a redness really so vivid as to 
be feverish. Her heart was not at all in 
the gossip about Boulogne; and if her com- 
plexion was partly the result of the dijeHner 
and the petits verres, it was also the brave 
signal of what she was there to say. Maisie 
knew, when this did come, how anxiously it 
had been awaited by the youngest member 
of the party. " Her ladyship packed me oflF 
— she almost put me into the cab ! " That 
was what Mrs. Wix at last brought out. 



xxni 

Sir Claude was stationed at the window; 
he didn't so much as turn round; and it was 
left to Maisie to take up the remark. " Do 
you mean you went to see her yesterday.^ " 

" She came to see me; she knocked at my 
shabby door; she mounted my squalid stair. 
She told me she had seen you at Folkestone. " 

Maisie wondered, "She went back that 
evening ? " 



 309 

"No; yesterday morning. She drove to 
me straight from the station. It was remark- 
able. If I had a job to get off she did noth- 
ing to make it worse — she did a great deal 
to make it better." Mrs. Wix hung fire, 
though the flame in her face burned brighter ; 
then she became capable of saying: "Her 
ladyship's kind! She did what I didn't 
expect. " 

Maisie, on this, looked straight at her 
stepfather's back; it might well have been 
for her, at that hour, a monument of her 
ladyship's kindness. It remained as such, 
at all events, monumentally still, and for a 
time that permitted the child to ask of their 
companion : " Did she really help you ? " 

"Most practically." Again Mrs. Wix 
paused; again she quite vibrated. "She 
gave me a ten-pound note. " 

At that, still looking out, Sir Claude, in 
the window, laughed loud. "So, you see, 
Maisie, we 've not quite lost it ! " 

"Oh, no/'* Maisie responded. "Isn't 
that too charming.^" She smiled at Mrs. 
Wix. " We know all about it. " Then, on 
her friend's showing such blankness as was 
compatible with such a flush, she pursued: 
" She does want me to have you ? " 



310 

Mrs. Wix showed a final timidity, which, 
however, while Sir Claude drummed on the 
window pane, she presently surmounted. 
It came to Maisie that in spite of his drum- 
ming and of his not turning round he was 
really so much interested as to leave himself, 
in a manner, in her hands ; which, somehow, 
suddenly seemed to her a greater proof than 
he could have given by interfering. " She 
wants me to hsLvej^ouf Mrs. Wix rang out. 

Maisie answered this bang at Sir Claude. 
"Then that *s nice for all of us." 

Of course it was, his continued silence 
sufficiently admitted, while Mrs. Wix rose 
from her chair and, as if to take more of a 
stand, placed herself, not without majesty, 
before the fire. The incongruity of her 
smartness, the circumference of her stifif 
frock presented her as really more ready for 
Paris than any of them. She also gazed hard 
at Sir Claude's back. "Your wife was dif- 
ferent from anything she had ever shown me. 
She recognizes certain proprieties." 

" Which ? — do you happen to remember ? " 
Sir Claude asked. 

Mrs. Wix*s reply was prompt. "The im- 
portance for Maisie of a gentlewoman — of 
some one who is not — well, so bad! She 



 311 

objects to a mere maid, and I don't in the 
least mind telling you what she wants me to 
do." One thing was clear — Mrs. Wix was 
now bold enough for anything. " She wants 
me to persuade you to get rid of the person 
from Mrs. Beale's." Maisie waited for Sir 
Claude to pronounce on this; then she could 
only understand that he, on his side, waited, 
and she felt particularly full of common sense 
as she met her responsibility. " Oh, I don't 
want Susan with you!'* she said to Mrs. 
Wix. 

Sir Claude, always from the window, 
approved. " That 's quite simple. I'll take 
her back. " 

Mrs. Wix gave a positive jump; Maisie 
caught her look of alarm. "'Take' her? 
You don't mean go over on purpose.^ " 

Sir Claude said nothing for a moment; 
after which, "Why shouldn't I leave you 
here } " he inquired. 

Maisie, at this, sprang up. " Oh, do, oh, 
do, oh, do ! " The next moment she was 
interlaced with Mrs. Wix, and the two, on 
the hearth-rug, their eyes in each other's 
eyes, considered the plan with intensity. 
Maisie then perceived the difference of what 
they saw in it. "She can surely go back 



312 

alone ; why should you put yourself out ? " 
Mrs. Wix demanded. 

" Oh, she 's an idiot — she 's incapable. If 
anything should happen to her it would be 
awkward ; it was I who brought her — with- 
out her asking. If I turn her away I ought 
with my own hand to place her exactly 
where I found her. ** 

Mrs. Wix's face appealed to Maisie on 
such folly, and her manner, as directed to 
their companion, had, to her pupil's surprise, 
an unprecedented sharpness. "Dear Sir 
Claude, I think you 're perverse. Pay her 
fare and give her a sovereign. She has had 
an experience that she never dreamed of and 
that will be an advantage to her through life. 
If she goes wrong on the way it will be sim- 
ply because she wants to, and, with her 
expenses and her remuneration — make it 
even what you like! — you will have treated 
her as handsomely as you always treat every 



one. 



This was a new tone — as new as Mrs. 
Wix's cap; and it could strike a perceptive 
person as the upshot of a relation that had 
taken on a new character. It brought out, 
for Maisie, how much more even than she 
had guessed her friends were fighting side 



7 



 313 

by side. At the same time it needed so 
definite a justification that, as Sir Claude 
now, at last, did face them, she at first sup- 
posed it in resentment of excessive familiar- 
ity. She was therefore yet more puzzled to 
see him show the whole of his serene beauty, 
as well as an equal interest in a matter quite 
distinct from any freedom but her ladyship's, 
"Did my wife come alone.?" He could ask 
even that good-humoredly. 

"When she called on me.?" Mrs. Wix 
was red now; his good humor could n't 
keep down her color, which, for a minute, 
glowed there like her ugly honesty. "No 
— there was some one in the cab." The 
only attenuation she could think of was 
after a minute to add : " But they did n't 
come up." 

Sir Claude broke into a laugh — Maisie 
herself could guess what it was at : while he 
now walked about, still laughing, and at the 
fireplace gave a gay kick to a displaced log, 
she felt more vague about almost everything 
than about the drollery of such a " they ! " 
She in fact could scarce have told you if it 
was to deepen or to cover the joke that she 
bethought herself to remark: "Perhaps it 
was her maid." 



314 

Mrs. Wix gave her a look that, at any 
rate, deprecated the wrong tone. "It was 
not her maid." 

" Do you mean there are, this time, two ? " 
Sir Claude asked as if he had not heard. 

" Two maids } " Maisie went on as if she 
might assume he had. 

The reproach of the straighteners dark- 
ened; but Sir Claude cut across it with a 
sudden " See here — what do you mean ? 
And what do you suppose ske meant ? " 

Mrs. Wix let him for a moment in silence 
understand that the answer to his question, 
if he did n*t take care, might give him more 
than he wanted. It was as if, with this 
scruple, she measured and adjusted all that 
she gave him in at last saying: "What she 
meant was to make me know that you 're 
definitely free. To have that straight from 
her was a joy I, of course, had n't hoped for : 
it made the assurance, and my delight at it, 
a thing I really proceed upon. You already 
know I would have started even if she had n't 
pressed me ; you already know what, so long, 
we have been looking for and what, as soon 
as she told me of her step taken at Folke- 
stone, I recognized with rapture that we 
Aave. It 's your freedom that makes me 



 315 

right " — she fairly bristled with her logic. 
"But I don't mind telling you that it 's her 
action that makes me happy ! '' 

" Her action ? " Sir Claude echoed. 
"Why, my dear woman, her action is just a 
heinous crime. It happens to satisfy our 
sympathies in a way that 's quite delicious; 
but that does n't in the least alter the fact 
that it 's the most abominable thing ever 
done. She has chucked our friend here 
overboard not a bit less than if she had 
shoved her, shrieking and pleading, out of 
that window and down two floors upon the 
paving-stones. " 

Maisie surveyed serenely the parties to the 
discussion. " Oh, your friend here, dear Sir 
Claude, doesn't plead and shriek! " 

He looked at her a moment. "Never. 
Never. That's one — only one, but charm- 
ing so far as it goes — of about a hundred 
things we love her for." Then he pursued 
to Mrs. Wix: "What I can't for the life of 
me make out is what Ida is really up to, what 
game she was playing in turning to you with 
that cursed cheek after the beastly way she 
has used you. Where — to explain her at all 
— does she fancy she can presently, when 
we least expect it, take it out of us ? " 



3i6 

"She doesn't fancy anything nor want 
anything out of any one. Her cursed 
cheek, as you call it, is the best thing I *ve 
ever seen in her. I don't care a fig for the 
beastly way she used me — I forgive it all a 
thousand times over ! " Mrs. Wix raised 
her voice as she had never raised it; she 
quite triumphed in her lucidity. " I under- 
stand her — I almost admire her ! " she 
proclaimed. She spoke as if this might 
practically suffice; yet in charity to fainter 
lights she threw out an explanation. "As 
I *ve said, she was different ; upon my word 
I wouldn't have known her. She had a 
glimmering — she had an instinct: they 
brought her. It was a kind of happy 
thought, and if you couldn't have supposed 
she would ever have had such a thing, why, 
of course, I quite agree with you. But she 
did have it. There ! " 

Maisie could see that, from what it with 
liveliness lacked, this demonstration gathered 
a certain something that might almost have 
exasperated. But as she had often watched 
Sir Claude in apprehension of displeasure 
that didn't come, so now, instead of his 
saying " Oh, hell ! " as her father used, she 
observed him only to take refuge in a ques- 



 317 

tion that, at the worst, was abrupt. " Who 
is it this time, do you know ? " 

Mrs. Wix tried blind dignity. "Who is 
what, Sir Claude } " 

"The man who stands the cabs. Who 
was in the one that waited at your door ? " 

At this challenge she faltered so long that 
it occurred to Maisie's conscience to give 
her a hand. " It was n*t the Captain. " 

Her good intention, however, only changed 
her old friend's scruple to a more ambiguous 
stare ; besides, of course, making Sir Claude 
go off. Mrs. Wix fairly appealed to him. 
" Must I really tell you ? " 

His amusement continued. "Did she 
make you promise not to .? *' 

Mrs. Wix looked at him still harder. " I 
mean — before Maisie." 

Sir Claude laughed again. "Why, she 
can't hurt him ! " 

Maisie felt herself, as it passed, brushed 
by the light humor of this. "Yes, I can't 
hurt him ! " 

The straighteners again roofed her over; 
after which they seemed to crack with the 
explosion of their wearer's honesty. Amid 
the flying splinters Mrs. Wix produced a 
name. "Mr. Tischbein." 



3i8 

There was for an instant a silence that, 
under Sir Claude's influence and while he 
and Maisie looked at each other, suddenly 
pretended to be that of gravity. "We don't 
know Mr. Tischbein — do we, dear ^ " 

Maisie gave the point all needful thought. 
"No — not Mr. Tischbein." 

It was a passage that worked visibly on 
their friend. "You must excuse me. Sir 
Claude," she said with an austerity of which 
the note was real, " if I thank God to your 
face that he has in his mercy — I mean his 
mercy to our charge — allowed me to achieve 
this act. " She gave out a long puflf of pain. 
"It was time!" Then as if still more to 
point the moral : " I said just now I under- 
stood your wife. I said just now I admired 
her. I stand to it: I did both of those 
things when I saw hpw even she, poor thing, 
saw. If you want the dots on the i*s you 
shall have them. What she came to me for, 
in spite of everything, was that I *m just 
— " she quavered it out — " well, just clean ! 
What she saw for her daughter was that 
there must at last be a decent person!" 

Maisie was quick enough to jump a little 
at the sound of this implication that such 
a person was what Sir Claude was not ; the 



 319 

next instant, however, she more profoundly 
guessed against whom the discrimination 
was made. She was therefore left the more 
surprised at the complete candor with which 
he embraced the worst. "If she 's bent on 
decent persons, why has she given her to me ? 
You don't call me a decent person, and I '11 
do Ida the justice that she never did. I 
think I 'm as indecent as any one, and that 
there 's nothing in my behavior that makes 
my wife's surrender a bit less ignoble!" 

"Don't speak of your behavior," Mrs. Wix 
cried; "don't say such horrible things: 
they 're false and they 're wicked and I for- 
bid you ! It 's to keep you decent that I 'm 
here and that I 've done everything I have 
done: it 's to save you — I won't say from 
yourself, because in yourself you 're beauti- 
ful and good ! It 's to save you from the 
worst person of all ; I have n't, after all, 
come over to be afraid to speak of her! 
That 's the person in whose place her ladyship 
wants such a person as even me; and if she 
thought herself, as she as good as told me, 
not fit for Maisie's company, it 's not, as you 
may well suppose, that she may make room 
for Mrs. Beale!" 

Maisie watched his face as it took this 



320 

outbreak, and the most she saw in it was 
that it turned a little white. That indeed 
made him look, as Susan Ash would have 
said, queer, and it was perhaps a part of the 
queemess that he intensely smiled. " You *re 
too hard on Mrs. Beale. She has great 
merits of her own." 

Mrs. Wix, at this, instead of immediately 
replying, did what Sir Claude had been doing 
before : she moved across to the window and 
stared a while into the storm. There was 
for a minute, to Maisie's sense, a hush that 
resounded with wind and rain. Sir Claude, 
in spite of these things, glanced about for 
his hat ; on which Maisie spied it first and, 
making a dash for it, held it out to him. 
He took it with the gleam of a " Thank you " 
in his face, but as he did so something 
moved her still to hold the other side of the 
brim ; so that united by their grasp of this 
object they stood some seconds looking 
many things at each other. By this time 
Mrs. Wix had fronted them. " Do you mean 
to tell me,*' she demanded, "that you are 
going back.?'* 

" To Mrs. Beale } " Maisie surrendered his 
hat, and there was something that touched 
her in the embarrassed, almost humiliated 



 321 

way their companion's challenge made him 
turn it round and round. She had seen 
people do that who, she was sure, did noth- 
ing else that Sir Claude did. " I can't just 
say, my dear thing. We'll see about it — 
we '11 talk of it to-morrow. Meantime I 
must get some air." 

Mrs. Wix, with her back to the window, 
threw up her head to a height that still, for 
a moment, had the effect of detaining him. 
"All the air in France, Sir Claude, won't, 
I think, give you the courage to deny that 
you 're simply afraid of her ! " 

Oh, this time he did look queer; Maisie 
had no need of Susan's vocabulary to note 
it 1 It would have come to her of itself as, 
with his hand on the door, he turned his 
eyes from his stepdaughter to her governess 
and then back again. Resting on Maisie' s, 
though for ever so short a time, there was 
something they gave up to her and tried to 
explain. His lips, however, explained noth- 
ing; they only completed his collapse. " Yes. 
I'm simply afraid of her!" He opened 
the door and passed out. 

It brought back to Maisie his confession 
of fear of her mother; it made her step- 
mother then the second lady about whom he 

21 



322 

failed of the particular virtue that was sup- 
posed most to mark a gentleman. In fact 
there were three of them if she counted in 
Mrs. Wix, before whom he had undeniably 
quailed. Well, his want of valor was but a 
deeper appeal to her tenderness. To thrill 
with response to it she had only to remember 
all the ladies she herself had, as they called 
it, funked. 



XXIV 

It continued to rain so hard that her fond 
private calculation of explaining the Con- 
tinent to their visitor had to contain a pro- 
viso for some adequate treatment of the 
weather. At the table d'kSte that evening 
she threw out a variety of lights: this was 
the second ceremony of the sort she had sat 
through, and she would have neglected her 
privilege and dishonored her vocabulary — 
which indeed consisted mainly of the names 
of dishes — if she had not been proportion- 
ately ready to dazzle with interpretations. 
Preoccupied and overawed, Mrs. Wix was 
comparatively dim : she accepted her pupil's 
version of the mysteries of the menu in a 



i 



 323 

manner that might have struck the child as 
the depression of a credulity conscious not 
so much of its needs as of its dimensions. 
Maisie was soon enough — though it scarce 
happened before bedtime — confronted again 
with the different sort of prospectus for 
which she reserved her criticism. They re- 
mounted together to their sitting-room while 
Sir Claude, who said he would join them 
later, remained below to smoke and to con- 
verse with the old acquaintances that he met 
wherever he turned. He had offered his 
companions, for coffee, the enjoyment of the 
salon de lecture ; but Mrs. Wix had replied 
promptly, and with something of an air, that 
it struck her their own apartments supplied 
them every convenience. They supplied 
the good lady herself, Maisie could immedi- 
ately observe, not only that of this rather 
grand reference — which, already emulous, 
so far as it went, of her pupil, she made as if 
she had spent her life in salons ; but that of 
a lean French sofa where she could sit and 
stare at the faint French lamp (in default of 
the French clock that had stopped) as if for 
some account of the time Sir Claude would 
so markedly interpose. Her demeanor ac- 
cused him so directly of hovering beyond 



324 

her reach that Maisie sought to divert her by 
a report of Susan's quaint attitude toward 
what they had talked of after lunch. Maisie 
had mentioned to the young woman, for 
sympathy's sake, the plan for her relief ; but 
her disapproval of alien ways appeared, 
strange to say, only to prompt her to hug 
her gloom ; so that, between Mrs. Wix's ef- 
fect of displacing her and the visible stiffen- 
ing of her back, the child had the sense of a 
double office, an enlarged play for pacific 
powers. 

These powers played to no great purpose, 
it was true, in keeping before Mrs. Wix the 
vision of Sir Claude's perversity, which hung 
there in the pauses of talk and which he 
himself, after unmistakable delays, finally 
made quite lurid by bursting in — it was near 
ten o'clock — with an object held up in his 
hand. She knew before he spoke what it 
was ; she knew at least from the underlying 
sense of all that, since the hour spent after 
the Exhibition with her father, had not 
sprung up to reinstate Mr. Farange — she 
knew it meant a triumph for Mrs. Beale. 
The mere present sight of Sir Claude's face 
caused her, on the spot, to drop straight 
through her last impression of Mr. Farange a 



 325 

plummet that reached still deeper down than 
the security of these days of flight. She 
had wrapped that impression in silence — a 
silence that had parted with half its veil to 
cover also, from the hour of Sir Claude's ad- 
vent, the image of Mr. Farange's wife. But 
as the object in Sir Claude's hand revealed 
itself as a letter which he held up very high, 
so there was something in his mere motion 
that laid Mrs. Beale again bare. " Here we 
are ! '* he cried almost from the door, shaking 
his trophy at them and looking from one to 
the other. Then he came straight to Mrs. 
Wix: he had pulled two papers out of the 
envelope and glanced at them again to see 
which was which. He thrust one out open 
to Mrs. Wix. " Read that." She looked at 
him hard, as if in fear : it was impossible not 
to see that he was excited. Then she took 
the letter, but it was not her face that Maisie 
watched while she read. Neither, for that 
matter, was it this countenance that Sir 
Claude scanned: he stood before the fire 
and, more calmly now that he had acted, 
communed in silence with his stepdaughter. 
This silence was in truth quickly broken : 
Mrs. Wix rose to her feet with the violence 
of the sound she emitted. The letter had 



326 

dropped from her and lay upon the floor; it 
had made her turn ghastly white, and she 
was speechless with the effect of it. "It's 
too abominable — it 's too unspeakable ! *' she 
then cried. 

"Isn't it a charming thing?" Sir Claude 
asked. "It has just arrived, enclosed in a 
word of her own. She sends it on to me 
with the remark that comment is superfluous. 
I really think it is — that *s all you can say." 

" She ought n't to pass such a horror 
about," said Mrs. Wix. " She ought to put 
it straight in the fire." 

" My dear woman, she 's not such a fool ! 
It 's much too precious." He had picked the 
letter up, and he gave it, again, a glance of 
complacency which produced a light in his 
face. " Such a document " — he considered, 
then concluded with a slight drop — " such a 
document is, in fine, a basis." 

"A basis for what?" 

"Well — for proceedings." 

" Hers ? " Mrs. Wix's voice had become 
outright the voice of derision, "How can 
she proceed 1 " 

Sir Claude turned it over. " How can she 
get rid of him? Well — she is rid of him." 

" Not legally." Mrs. Wix had never looked 



 327 

to her pupil so much as if she knew what she 
was talking about. 

** I dare say/' Sir Claude laughed ; " but 
she 's not a bit less deprived than I am ! " 

** Of the power to get a divorce? It's just 
your want of the power that makes the scan- 
dal of your connection with her. Therefore 
it's just her want of it that makes that of 
hers with you. That's all I contend!" 
Mrs. Wix concluded with an unparalleled 
neigh of battle. Oh, she did know what she 
was talking about ! 

Maisie had meanwhile appealed mutely to 
Sir Claude, who judged it easier to meet 
what she did n't say than to meet what Mrs. 
Wix did. " It 's a letter to Mrs. Beale from 
your father, my dear, written from Spa and 
making the rupture between them perfectly 
irrevocable. It lets her know, and not in 
pretty language, that, as we technically say, 
he deserts her. It puts an end, forever, to 
their relations." He ran his eyes over it 
again, then appeared to make up his mind. 
" In fact it concerns you, Maisie, so nearly, 
and refers to you so particularly, that I really 
think you ought to see the terms in which 
this new situation is created for you." And 
he held out the letter. 



328 

Mrs. Wix, at this, pounced upon it; she 
had grabbed it too soon even for Maisie to 
become aware of being rather afraid of it. 
Thrusting it instantly behind her, she posi- 
tively glared at Sir Claude. "'See' it, 
wretched man — the innocent child see such 
a thing? I think you must be mad, and she 
shall not have a glimpse of it while I 'm here 
to prevent." 

The breadth of her action had made Sir 
Claude turn red — he even looked a little 
foolish. " You think it 's too bad, eh ? But 
it *s precisely because it 's bad that it seemed 
to me it would have a lesson and a virtue for 
her." 

Maisie could do a quick enough justice to 
his motive to be able clearly to interpose. 
She fairly smiled at him. " I assure you I 
can quite believe how bad it is ! " She hesi- 
tated an instant; then she added: "I know 
what 's in it." 

He of course burst out laughing, and while 
Mrs. Wix groaned an " Oh heavens ! " he 
threw off: "You would n't say that, old boy, 
if you did ! The point I make is," he con- 
tinued to Mrs. Wix with a blandness now 
re-established — " the point I make is simply 
that it sets Mrs. Beale free." 



 329 

She hung fire but an instant. "Free to 
live with^^^f " 

** Free not to live, not to pretend to live, 
with her husband." 

** Ah, they 're mighty different things ! " — 
a truth as to which her earnestness could now, 
with a fine, inconsequent look, invite the par- 
ticipation of the child. 

Before Maisie could commit herself, how- 
ever, the ground was occupied by Sir Claude, 
who, as he stood before their visitor with an 
expression half rueful, half persuasive, rubbed 
his hand sharply up and down the back of 
his head. "Then why the deuce do you 
grant so — do you, I may even say, rejoice 
so — that, by the desertion of my precious 
partner, Pm free?" 

Mrs. Wix met this challenge first with si- 
lence, then with a demonstration the most 
extraordinary, the most unexpected. Maisie 
could scarcely believe her eyes as she saw 
the good lady, with whom she had never 
associated the faintest form of coquetry, 
actually, after an upward grimace, give Sir 
Claude a great giggling, insinuating, naughty 
slap. " You wretch — you know why ! '* And 
she turned away. The face that, with this 
movement, she left him to present to Maisie 



330 

was to abide with his stepdaughter as the 
very image of stupefaction; but the pair 
lacked time to communicate either amuse- 
ment or alarm before their interlocutress was 
upon them again. She had begun in fact to 
show infinite variety, and she flashed about 
with a still quicker change of tone. " Have 
you brought me that thing as a pretext for 
going over? " 

Sir Claude braced himself. "I can't, after 
such news, in common decency not. I mean 
— don't you know ? — in common courtesy and 
humanity. My dear lady, you can't chuck a 
woman that way, especially taking the mo- 
ment when she has been most insulted and 
wronged. A fellow must behave like a gen- 
tleman, damn it, dear good Mrs. Wix. We 
did n't come away, we two, to hang right on, 
you know : it was only to try our paces and 
just put in a few days that might prove to 
every one concerned that we're in earnest. 
It's exactly because we're in earnest that, 
hang it, we need n't be so awfully particular. 
I mean — don't you know? — we needn't be 
so awfully afraid." He showed a vivacity, an 
intensity of argument, and if Maisie counted 
his words she was all the more ready to swal- 
low, after a single swift gasp, those that, the 



 331 

next thing, she became conscious he paused 
for a reply to. " We did n't come, old girl, 
did we," he pleaded straight, " to stop right 
away forever and put it all in now? " 

Maisie had never doubted she could be 
heroic for him. " Oh, no! " It was as if she 
had been shocked at the bare thought. 
"We're just taking it as we find it." She 
had a sudden inspiration, which she backed 
up with a smile. "We're just seeing what 
we can afford." She had never yet, in her 
life, made any claim for herself, but she hoped 
that this time, frankly, what she was doing 
would somehow be counted to her. Indeed 
she felt Sir Claude was counting it, though 
she was afraid to look at him — afraid she 
should show him tears. She looked at Mrs. 
Wix ; she reached her maximum. ** I don't 
think I should be bad to Mrs. Beale." 

She heard on this a deep sound, some- 
thing inarticulate and sweet, from Sir Claude ; 
but tears were what Mrs. Wix did n't scruple 
to show. *' Do you think you should be bad 
to me? " The question was the more discon- 
certing that Mrs. Wix's emotion did n't de- 
prive her of the advantage of her effect. " If 
you see that woman again you 're lost ! " she 
declared to their companion. 



332 

Sir Claude looked at the moony globe of 
the lamp; he seemed to see for an instant 
what seeing Mrs. Beale would consist of. It 
was also apparently from this vision that he 
drew strength to return : " Her situation^ by 
what has happened, is completely changed; 
and it's no use your trying to prove to me 
that I need n't take any account of that." 

" If you see that woman you 're lost ! " 
Mrs. Wix, with greater force, repeated. 

" Do you think she 11 not let me come 
back to you? My dear lady, I leave you 
here, you and Maisie, as an hostage to for- 
tune, and I promise you by all that 's sacred 
that I shall be with you again, at the very 
latest, on Saturday. I provide you with 
funds ; I install you in these lovely rooms ; I 
arrange with the people here that you be 
treated with every attention and supplied 
with every luxury. The weather, after this, 
will mend; it will be sure to be exquisite. 
You *11 both be as free as air, and you can 
roam all over the place and have tremendous 
larks. You shall have a carriage to drive 
you; the whole house shall be at your call. 
You '11 have, in a word, a magnificent posi- 
tion." He paused, he looked from one of his 
companions to the other as if to see the im- 



 333 

pression he had made. Whether or no he 
judged it adequate he subjoined after a mo- 
ment : " And you '11 oblige me, above all, by 
not making a fuss." 

Maisie could only answer for the impres- 
sion on herself, though indeed from the heart 
even of Mrs. Wix's rigor there floated, to her 
sense, a faint fragrance of depraved conces- 
sion. Maisie had her dumb word for the 
show such a speech could make, for the 
exquisite charm it could take from his ex- 
quisite sincerity; and before she could do 
anything but blink at excess of light she 
heard this very word sound on Mrs. Wix's 
lips, just as if the poor lady had guessed it and 
wished, snatching it from her, to blight it like 
a crumpled flower. " You 're dreadful, you 're 
terrible, for you know but too well that it 's 
not a small thing to me that you should ad- 
dress me in a fashion that 's princely ! " 
Princely was what he stood there and looked 
and sounded ; that was what Maisie, for the 
occasion, found herself reduced to simple 
worship of him for being. Yet, strange to 
say too, as Mrs. Wix went on, an echo rang 
within her that matched the echo she had 
herself just produced. " How much you 
must want to see her, to say such things as 



334 

that and to be ready to do so much for the 
poor little likes of Maisie and me ! She has 
a hold of you, and you know it, and you 
want to feel it again, and — from God knows, 
or at least / know, what base motive and de- 
sire — to enjoy it once more and give your- 
self up to it ! It does n't matter if it 's one 
day or three ; enough 's as good as a feast, 
and the lovely time you *11 have with her is 
something you Ve willing to pay for ! I dare 
say you *d like me to believe that your pay 
is to get her to give you up; but that's a 
matter on which I adjure you not to put 
down your money in advance. Give her up 
first. Then pay her what you please ! " 

Sir Claude took this to the end; though 
there were things in it that made him color, 
called into his face more of the apprehension 
than Maisie had ever perceived there of a 
particular sort of shock. She had an odd 
sense that it was the first time she had seen 
any one but Mrs. Wix really and truly scan- 
dalized, and this fed her inference, which 
grew and grew from moment to moment, 
that Mrs. Wix was proving more of a force 
to reckon with than either of them had allowed 
so much room for. It was true that, long 
before, she had obtained a "hold" of him, 



 335 

as she called it, different in kind from that 
obtained by Mrs. Beale and, originally, by 
her ladyship. But Maisie could quite feel 
with him now that he had really not expected 
that advantage to be driven so home. Oh, 
they had n't at all got yet to where Mrs. Wix 
would stop, for the next minute she was 
driving harder than ever. It was the result 
of his saying with a certain drjmess, though 
so kindly that what most affected Maisie in 
it was his patience: "My dear friend, it *s 
simply a matter in which I must judge for 
myself. You 've judged for me, I know, a 
good deal of late, in a way that I appreciate, 
I assure you, down to the ground. But you 
can't do it always: no one can do that for 
another, don't you see.? in every case. 
There are exceptions, particular cases that 
turn up and that are awfully delicate. It 
would be too easy if I could shift it all oflE 
on you; it would be allowing you to incur an 
amount of responsibility that I should simply 
become quite ashamed of. You '11 find, I 'm 
sure, that you '11 have quite as much as 
you '11 enjoy if you '11 be so good as to 
accept the situation as circumstances happen 
to make it for you, and to stay here with our 
friend, till I rejoin you, on the footing of as 



336 

much pleasantness and as much comfort — 
and I think I have a right to add, to both of 
you, of as much faith in me — as possible. " 

Oh, he was princely indeed ! that came out 
more and more with every word he said and 
with the particular way he said it, and Maisie 
could feel his monitress stiffen almost with 
anguish against the increase of his spell and 
then hurl herself, as a desperate defence from 
it, into the almost admitted inferiority of 
violence, of iteration. "You're afraid of 
her — afraid, afraid, afraid! Oh, dear, oh, 
dear, oh, dear ! " Mrs. Wix wailed it with a 
high quaver, then broke down into a long 
shudder of helplessness and woe. The next 
minute she had flung herself again on the 
hard sofa and had burst into a passion of 
tears. 

Sir Claude stood and looked at her a 
moment; he shook his head slowly and al- 
most tenderly. " I * ve already admitted it — 
I 'm in mortal terror, and we *11 let that settle 
the question. I think you had best go to 
bed," he added; "you've had a tremendous 
day and you must both be tired to death. 
I shall not expect you to concern yourselves 
in the morning with my movements. There 's 
an early boat on; I shall have cleared out 



 337 

before you 're up; and I shall moreover have 
dealt directly and most effectively, I assure 
you, with the haughty but not quite hope- 
less Miss Ash." He turned to his step- 
daughter as if at once to take leave of her 
and give her a sign of how, through all ten- 
sion and friction, they were still united in 
such a way that she at least needn't worry. 
" Maisie, boy ! " — he opened his arms to her. 
With her culpable lightness she flew into 
them and, while he kissed her, chose the soft 
method of silence to promise him the silence 
that, after battles of talk, was the best balm 
she could offer his wounds. They held each 
other long enough to reaffirm intensely their 
vows; after which they were almost forced 
apart by Mrs. Wix*s jumping to her feet. 

Her jump, either with a quick return or 
with a final lapse of courage, was also to 
supplication almost abject. " I beseech you 
not to take a step so miserable and so fatal. 
I know her but too well, even if you jeer at 
me for saying it ; little as I *ve seen her I 
know her, I know her. I know what she *11 
do — I see it as I stand here. Since you are 
afraid of her, it's the mercy of heaven; 
don't, for God's sake, be afraid to show it, 

to profit by it and to arrive at the very safety 

22 



338 

that it gives you. / 'm not afraid of her, I 
assure you ; you must already have seen for 
yourself that there's nothing I'm afraid of 
now ! Let me go to her — I '11 settle her, and 
I '11 take that woman back without a hair of 
her touched. Let me put in the two or three 
days — let me wind up the connection ! You 
stay here with Maisie, with the carriage and 
the larks and the luxury; then I *11 return 
to you, and we '11 go oflf together and we '11 
live together without a cloud. Take me, 
take me, " she went on and on — the tide of 
her eloquence was high. "Here I am; I 
know what I am and what I ain't; but I say 
boldly to the face of you both that I * 11 do 
better for you, far, than ever she will even 
try to. I say it to yours. Sir Claude, even 
though I owe you the very dress on my back 
and the very shoes on my feet. I owe you 
everything — that 's just the reason; and to 
pay it back, in profusion — what can that be 
but what I want ? Here I am — here I am ! " 
she repeated, spreading herself with an air 
of exhibition that, combined with her inten- 
sity and her decorations, appeared to suggest 
her for strange offices and devotions, for 
ridiculous replacements and substitutions. 
She manipulated her gown as she talked, she 



 339 

insisted on the items of her debt. " I have 
nothing of my own, I know — no money, no 
clothes, no appearance, no anything; noth- 
ing but my hold of this one little truth which 
is all in the world I can bribe you with — 
that the pair of you are more to me than all 
besides, and that if you'll let me help you 
and save you, make what you both want pos- 
sible in the one way it can be, why, I '11 
work myself to the bone in your service ! *' 

Sir Claude wavered there without an an 
swer to this magnificent appeal; he plainly 
cast about for one, and in no small agita- 
tion and pain. He addressed himself in his 
quest, however, only to vague quarters, until 
he met renewedly, as he so frequently and 
actively met it, the more than filial gaze of 
his intelligent little charge. That gave 
him — poor plastic and dependent male — his 
issue. If she was still a child, she was yet 
of the sex that could help him out. He 
signified as much by a renewed invitation to 
an embrace ; she freshly sprang to him, and 
again they inaudibly conversed. "Be nice 
to her, be nice to her,** he at last distinctly 
articulated — "be nice to her as you Ve not 
even been to me I " On which, without 
another look at Mrs. Wix, he somehow got 



340 • 

out of the room; leaving Maisie under the 
slight oppression of these words as well as 
of the idea that he had, unmistakably, once 
more dodged. 



XXV 

Every single thing he had thus prophesied 
came so true that it was after all no more 
than fair to expect quite as much for what 
he had as good as promised. His pledges 
they could verify to the letter, down to his 
very guarantee that a way would be found 
with Miss Ash. Roused in the summer 
dawn and vehemently squeezed by that inter- 
esting exile, Maisie fell back upon her couch 
with a renewed appreciation of his policy; 
a memento of which, when she rose, later on, 
to dress, glittered at her from the carpet in 
the shape of a sixpence that had overflowed 
from Susan's pride of possession. Six- 
pences really, for the forty-eight hours that 
followed, seemed to abound in her life ; she 
fancifully computed the number of them 
represented by such a period of "larks." 
The number was not kept down, she pres- 
ently noticed, by any scheme of revenge for 



 341 

Sir Claude's flight which should take, on 
Mrs. Wix's part, the form of a refusal to 
avail herself of the facilities he had so bravely 
ordered. It was in fact impossible to escape 
them; it was, in the good lady's own phrase, 
ridiculous to go on foot when you had a car- 
riage prancing at the door. Everything 
about them pranced, the very waiters, even, 
as they presented the dishes to which, from 
a similar sense of the absurdity of perver- 
sity, Mrs. Wix helped herself with a freedom 
that spoke to Maisie quite as much of her de- 
pletion as of her logic. Her appetite was a 
sign to her companion of a great many 
things, and testified not less, on the whole, 
to her general than to her particular condi- 
tions. She had arrears of dinner to make up, 
and it was touching that in a dinnerless state 
her moral passion should have burned so 
clear. She partook largely, as a refuge from 
depression, and yet the opportunity to par- 
take was just a mark of the sinister symptoms 
that depressed her. The affair was in short 
a combat, in which the baser element tri- 
umphed, between her refusal to be bought off 
and her consent to be clothed and fed. It 
was not, at any rate, to be gainsaid that 
there was comfort for her in the develop- 



342 

ments of France ; comfort so great as to leave 
Maisie free to take with her all the security 
for granted and brush all the danger aside. 
That was the way to carry out in detail Sir 
Claude's injunction to be "nice;" that was 
the way as well to look with her, in a sur- 
vey of the pleasures of life abroad, straight 
over the head of any doubt. 

They shrunk at last, all doubts, as the 
weather cleared up ; it had an immense effect 
on them and became quite as lovely as Sir 
Claude had engaged. This seemed to have 
put him so into the secret of things, and the 
joy of the world so waylaid the steps of his 
friends, that little by little the spirit of hope 
filled the air and finally took possession of 
the scene. To drive on the long cliff was 
splendid, but it was perhaps better still to 
creep in the shade — for the sun was strong 
— along the many-colored and many-odored 
port and through the streets in which, to 
English eyes, everything that was the same 
was a mystery and everything that was 
different a joke. Best of all was to continue 
the creep up the long Grand' Rue to the 
gate of the haute ville and, passing beneath 
it, mount to the quaint and crooked rampart, 
with its rows of trees, its quiet corners and 



 343 

friendly benches where brown old women, 
in such white frilled caps and such long gold 
earrings, sat and knitted or snoozed ; its little 
yellow-faced houses that looked like the 
homes of misers or of priests, and its dark 
Ch&teau where small soldiers lounged on the 
bridge that stretched across an empty moat 
and military washing hung from the windows 
of towers. This was a part of the place that 
could lead Maisie to inquire if it did n't just 
meet one's idea of the Middle Ages; and 
since it was rather a satisfaction than a shock 
to perceive, and not for the first time, the 
limits, in Mrs. Wix's mind, of the historic 
imagination, that only added one more to the 
variety of kinds of insight that she felt it 
her own present mission to show. They sat 
together on the gray old bastion ; they looked 
down on the little new town which seemed 
to them quite as old, and across at the great 
dome and the high gilt Virgin of the church 
that, as they gathered, was famous and that 
pleased them by its unlikeness to any place 
in which they had worshipped. They wan- 
dered in this temple afterwards, and Mrs. 
Wix confessed that for herself she had 
probably early in life made in not being a 
Catholic a fatal mistake. Her confession 



344 

in its turn caused Maisie to wonder rather 
interestedly what degree of maturity it was 
that shut the door against an escape from 
such an error. They went back to the ram- 
part on the second morning: the spot in 
which they appeared to have come furthest 
on the journey that was to separate them 
from everything that in the past had been 
objectionable; it gave them afresh the im- 
pression that had most to do with their hav- 
ing worked round to a confidence that on 
Maisie' s part was determined and that she 
could see to be on her companion's desper- 
ate. She had had for many hours the sense 
of showing Mrs. Wix so much that she was 
comparatively slow to become conscious of 
being at the same time the subject of a simi- 
lar process. The process went the faster, 
however, from the moment she got her 
glimpse of it; it then fell into its place in 
her general, her habitual view of the particu- 
lar phenomenon that, had she felt the need 
of words for it, she might have called her 
personal relation to her knowledge. This 
relation had never been so lively as during 
the time she waited with her old governess 
for Sir Claude; and what made it so was 
exactly that Mrs. Wix struck her as having 



 345 

a new suspicion of it. Mrs. Wix had never 
yet had a suspicion — that was certain — so 
calculated to throw her pupil, in spite of the 
closer union of these adventurous hours, 
upon the deep defensive. Her pupil made 
out indeed as many marvels as she had made 
out on the rush to Folkestone; and if in Sir 
Claude's company on that occasion Mrs. 
Wix was the constant implication, so in Mrs. 
Wix's, in the actual crisis. Sir Claude was 

— and most of all through long pauses -^ the 
perpetual, the insurmountable theme. It all 
took them back to the first flush of his mar- 
riage and to the place he held in the school- 
room in those months of love and pain ; only 
he had himself blown to a much bigger bal- 
loon the large consciousness he then filled 
out. 

They went through it all again, and in- 
deed while the interval lingered with the 
very weight of its charm they went, in spite 
of defences and suspicions, through every- 
thing. Their intensified clutch of the future 
throbbed like a clock ticking seconds; but 
this was a timepiece that inevitably as well 

— at the best — rang occasionally a porten- 
tous hour. Oh, there were several of these, 
and two or three of the worst on the old 



346 

city- wall where everything else so made for 
peace. There was nothing in the world 
Maisie more wanted than to be to Mrs. 
Wix as nice as Sir Claude had desired; but 
it was exactly because this fell in with her 
inveterate instinct of keeping the peace that 
the instinct itself was quickened. From the 
moment it was quickened, however, it found 
other work, and that was how, to begin with, 
she produced the very complication she most 
sought to avert. What she had essentially 
done these days had been to read the un- 
spoken into the spoken; so that thus, with 
accumulations, it had become more definite 
to her that the unspoken was, unspeakably, 
the completeness of the sacrifice of Mrs. 
Beale. There were times when every min- 
ute that Sir Claude stayed away was like a 
nail in Mrs. Scale's coffin. That brought 
back to Maisie — it was a roundabout way — 
the beauty and antiquity of her connection 
with the flower of the Overmores, as well as 
that lady's own grace and charm, her pecu- 
liar prettiness and cleverness and even her 
peculiar tribulations. A hundred things 
hummed at the back of her head, but two of 
these were simple enough. Mrs. Beale was 
by the way, after all, just her stepmother and 



 347 

her relative. She was just, and partly for 
that very reason, Sir Claude's greatest in- 
timate (" lady-intimate " was Maisie's term) : 
so that what together they were, on Mrs. 
Wix's programme, to give up and break short 
off with was for one of them his particu- 
lar favorite and for the other her father's 
wife. Strangely, indescribably, her percep- 
tion of reasons kept pace with her sense of 
trouble ; but there was something in her that 
without a supreme effort not to be shabby 
could not take the reasons for granted. What 
it comes to perhaps for ourselves is that, 
disinherited and denuded as we have seen 
her, there still lingered in her life an echo 
of parental influence — she was still remi- 
niscent of one of the sacred lessons of home. 
It was the only one she retained, but luckily 
she retained it with force. She enjoyed, 
in a word, an ineffaceable view of the fact 
that there were things papa called mamma 
and mamma called papa a low sneak for 
doing or for not doing. Now this rich 
memory gave her a name that she dreaded 
to invite to the lips of Mrs. Beale; she 
would personally wince so just to hear it. 
The very sweetness of the foreign life she 
was steeped in added with each hour of 



348 

Sir Claude's absence to the possibility of 
such pangs. She watched beside Mrs. Wix 
the great golden Madonna, and one of the 
earringed old women who had been sitting 
at the end of their bench got up and pot- 
tered away. " Adieu, mesdames ! " said the 
old woman in a little cracked, civil voice — 
a demonstration by which our friends were 
so affected that they bobbed up and almost 
courtesied to her. They subsided again, and 
it was shortly after, in a summer hum of 
French insects and a phase of almost som- 
nolent reverie, that Maisie most had the 
vision of what it was to shut out from such 
a perspective so appealing a participant. It 
had not yet appeared so vast as at that mo- 
ment, this prospect of statues shining in the 
blue and of courtesy in romantic forms. 

" Why, after all, should we have to choose 
between you ? Why should n*t we be four } " 
she finally demanded. 

Mrs. Wix gave the jerk of a sleeper awak- 
ened, or the start even of one who hears a 
bullet whiz at a flag of truce ; her stupefac- 
tion at such a breach of the peace delayed 
for a moment her answer. " Four impropri- 
eties, do you mean ? Because two of us hap- 
pen to be decent people ! Do I gather you 



i 



 349 

to wish that I should stay on with you even 
if that woman is capable — ? " 

Maisie took her up before she could fur- 
ther phrase Mrs. Beale's capability. " Stay 
on as my companion — yes ; stay on as just 
what you were at mamma's. Mrs. Beale 
would let you ! " the child proclaimed. 

Mrs. Wix had by this time fairly sprung 
to her arms. "And who, I 'd like to know, 
would let Mrs. Beale ? Do you mean, little 
unfortunate, that you would ? " 

" Why not ? — if now she 's free. " 

" Free } Are you imitating him ? Well, 
if Sir Claude *s old enough to know better, 
upon my word I think it 's right to treat you 
as if you also were. You *11 have to, at any 
rate — to know better — if that's the line 
you 're proposing to take." Mrs. Wix had 
never been so harsh, but, on the other hand, 
Maisie could guess that she herself had 
never appeared so wanton. What was un- 
derlying, however, rather overawed than 
angered her; she felt she could still insist 
not for contradiction, but for ultimate calm. 
Her wantonness meanwhile continued to 
work upon her friend, who caught again, on 
the rebound, the sound of deepest provoca- 
tion. "Free, free, free.? If she's as free 



350 

as you are, my dear, she 's free enough to be 
sure ! " 

"As I am?" — Maisie, after reflection 
and in the face of what of portentous this 
seemed to convey, risked a critical echo. 

"Well," said Mrs. Wix, "nobody, you 
know, is free to commit a crime." 

" A crime ? " — the word had come out in 
a way that made the child echo it again. 

"You'd commit as great a one as their 
own — and so should I ! — if we were to con- 
done their immorality by our presence." 

Maisie waited a little; this seemed so 
fiercely conclusive. "Why is it immoral- 
ity } " she nevertheless presently inquired. 

Her companion now turned upon her with 
a reproach softer because it was somehow 
deeper. " You *re too unspeakable ! Do you 
know what we *re talking about ? " 

In the interest of ultimate calm Maisie 
felt that she must be, above all, clear. 
" Certainly ; about their taking advantage of 
their freedom. " 

"Well, to do what?" 

"Why, to live with us." 

Mrs. Wix's laugh, at this, was literally 
wild. " ' Us ' ? thank you ! " 

" Then to live with me, " 



\ 



 351 

The words made her friend jump. "You 
give me up? You break with me forever? 
You turn me into the street?" 

Maisie was dazzled by the enumeration, 
but she bore bravely up. " Those, it seems 
to me, are the things you do to me, " 

Mrs. Wix made little of her valor. "I 
can promise you that, whatever I do, I shall 
never let you out of my sight ! You ask me 
why it 's immorality when you *ve seen with 
your own eyes that Sir Claude has felt it to 
be so to that dire extent that, rather than 
make you face the shame of it, he has for 
months kept away from you altogether? Is 
it any more difficult to see that the first time 
he tries to do his duty he washes his hands 
of her ? — takes you straight away from 
her ? " 

Maisie turned this over, but more for ap- 
parent consideration than from any impulse 
to yield too easily. "Yes, I see what you 
mean. But at that time they weren't free." 
She felt Mrs. Wix rear up again at the 
offensive word, but she succeeded in touch- 
ing her with a remonstrant hand. " I don't 
think you know how free they 've become." 

"I know, I believe, at least as much as 
you do!" 



352 

Maisie hesitated. " About the Countess ? " 

" Your father' s — temptress ? " Mrs. Wix 
gave her a sidelong squint. "Perfectly. 
She pays him ! " 

**0h, does she?" At this the child's 
countenance fell : it seemed to give a reason 
for papa's behavior and place it in a more 
favorable light. She wished to be just. " I 
don't say she's not generous. She was so 
to me." 

" How, to you ? " 

" She gave me a lot of money. " 

Mrs. Wix stared. "And, pray, what did 
you do with the lot of money } " 

" I gave it to Mrs. Beale. " 

"And what did Mrs. Beale do with it?" 

" She sent it back. " 

" To the Countess ? Gammon ! " said Mrs. 
Wix. She disposed of that plea as eflfectu- 
ally as Susan Ash. 

"Well, I don't care!" Maisie replied. 
"What I mean is that you don't know about 
the rest. " 

"The rest? What rest?" 

Maisie wondered how she could best put 
it " Papa kept me there an hour. " 

"I rf^know — Sir Claude told me. Mrs. 
Beale had told him." 



 353 

Maisie looked incredulity. "How could 
she ? — when I did n't speak of it ! " 

Mrs. Wixwas mystified. " Speak of what } " 

" Why, of her being so frightful. " 

"The Countess.^ Of course she 's fright- 
ful," Mrs. Wix declared. After a moment 
she added : "That 's why she pays him." 

Maisie pondered. " It *s the best thing 
about her then — if she gives him as much 
as she gave me.** 

"Well, it 's not the best thing about Mm/ 
Or rather perhaps it is too!" Mrs. Wix 
subjoined. 

"But she's awful — really and truly," 
Maisie went on. 

Mrs. Wix arrested her. "You needn't 
go into details ! " It was visibly at variance 
with this injunction that she yet inquired: 
" How does that make it any better ? " 

"Their living with me.^ Why, for the 
Countess — and for her whiskers! — he has 
put me oflf on them. I understood him," 
Maisie profoundly said. 

" I hope then he understood fou. It 's 
more than I do!" Mrs. Wix admitted. 

That was a real challenge to be plainer, 
and our young lady immediately became so. 
" I mean it is n't a crime. " 

23 



354 



"Why, then, did Sir Claude steal you 
away ? " 

"He didn't steal — he only borrowed me. 
I knew it wasn't for long," Maisie auda- 
ciously professed. 

"You must allow me to reply to that," 
cried Mrs. Wix, " that you knew nothing of 
the sort, and that you rather basely failed to 
back me up last night when you pretended 
so plump that you did ! You hoped in fact 
exactly as much as I did, and as in my sense- 
less passion I even hope now, that this may 
be the beginning of better things." 

Oh yes, Mrs. Wix was indeed, for the first 
time, sharp; so that there at last stirred in 
our heroine the sense not so much of being 
proved disingenuous as of being precisely 
accused of the meanness that had brought 
everything down on her through her very 
desire to shake herself clear of it. She sud- 
denly felt herself swell with a passion of 
protest. "I never, never hoped I wasn't 
going again to see Mrs. Beale! I didn't, I 
didn't, I didn't!" she repeated. Mrs. Wix 
bounced about with a force of rejoinder of 
which she also felt that she must anticipate 
the concussion, and which, though the good 
lady was evidently charged to the brim, hung 



 355 

fire long enough to give time for an aggrava- 
tion. "She's beautiful, and I love her! I 
love her, and she 's beautiful ! " 

"And I'm hideous, and you hate mef*' 
Mrs. Wix fixed her a moment, then caught 
herself up. " I won't embitter you by abso- 
lutely accusing you of that; though, as for 
my being hideous, it's hardly the first time 
I 've been told so ! I know it so well that 
even if I haven't whiskers — have I? — I 
dare say there are other ways in which the 
Countess is a Venus to me ! My pretensions 
must therefore seem to you monstrous — 
which comes to the same thing as your not 
liking me. But do you mean to go so far as 
to tell me that you want to live with them 
in their sin ? " 

" You know what I want, you know what 
I want ! " Maisie spoke with the quaver of 
rising tears. 

" Yes, I do ; you want me to be as bad as 
yourself! Well, I won't. There! Mrs. 
Beale 's as bad as your father!" Mrs. Wix 
went on. 

"She's not — she's not!*' her pupil al- 
most shrieked in retort. 

"You mean because Sir Claude at least 
has beauty and wit and grace } But he pays, 



3s6 

just as the Countess pays ! " Mrs. Wix, who 
now rose as she spoke, fairly revealed a 
latent cynicism. 

It raised Maisie also to her feet ; her com- 
panion had walked off a few steps and paused. 
The two looked at each other as they had 
never looked, and Mrs. Wix seemed to flaunt 
there in her finery. "Then doesn't he pay 
you too? " her unhappy charge demanded. 

At this she bounded in her place. " Oh, 
you incredible little waif ! " She brought it 
out with a wail of violence ; after which, with 
another convulsion, she marched straight 
away. 

Maisie dropped back on the bench and 
burst into sobs. 



XXVI 

Nothing so dreadful, of course, could be 
final or even, for many minutes, provisional : 
they rushed together again too soon for 
either to feel that either had kept it up, and 
though they went home in silence it was 
with a vivid perception for Maisie that her 
companion's hand had closed upon her. 
That hand had shown, altogether, these 



 357 

twenty-four hours, a new capacity for clos- 
ing, and one of the truths the child could 
least resist was that a certain greatness had 
now come to Mrs. Wix. The case was in- 
deed that the quality of her motive surpassed 
the sharpness of her angles ; both the combi- 
nation and the singularity of which things, 
when in the afternoon they used the carriage, 
Maisie could borrow from the contemplative 
hush of their grandeur the freedom to feel 
to the utmost. She still bore the mark of 
the tone in which her friend had thrown out 
that threat of never losing sight of her. 
This friend had been converted, in short, 
from feebleness to force; and it was the 
light of her present power that showed from 
how far she had come. The threat in ques- 
tion, sharply exultant, might have produced 
defiance; but before anything so ugly could 
happen another process had insidiously fore- 
stalled it. The moment at which this pro- 
cess had begun to mature was that of Mrs. 
Wix's breaking out with a dignity attuned 
to their own apartments and with an advan- 
tage now measurably gained. They had 
ordered coflfee, after luncheon, in the spirit 
of Sir Claude's provision, and it was served 
to them while they awaited their equipage 



3s8 

in the white and gold salon. It was flanked 
moreover with a couple of liqueurs, and 
Maisie felt that Sir Claude could scarce 
have been taken more at his word had it 
been followed by anecdotes and cigarettes. 
The influence of these luxuries was at any 
rate in the air; it seemed to her, while she 
tiptoed at the chimney -glass, pulling on her 
gloves and, with a motion of her head, shak- 
ing a feather into place, to have had some- 
thing to do with Mrs. Wix's suddenly say- 
ing: "Haven't you really and truly any 
moral sense? " 

Maisie was aware that her answer, though 
it brought her down to her heels, was vague 
even to imbecility and that this was the first 
time she had appeared to practise with Mrs. 
Wix an intellectual inaptitude to meet her 
— the infirmity to which she had owed so 
much success with papa and mamma. The 
appearance did her injustice, for it was not 
less through her candor than through her 
playfellow's pressure that, after this, the 
idea of a moral sense mainly colored their 
intercourse. She began, the poor child, 
with scarcely knowing what it was; but it 
proved something that, with scarce an out- 
ward sign save her surrender to the swing 



 359 

of the carriage, she could, before they came 
back from their drive, strike up a sort of 
acquaintance with. The beauty of the day 
only deepened, and the splendor of the after- 
noon sea, and the haze of the far headlands, 
and the taste of the sweet air. It was the 
coachman indeed who, smiling and crack- 
ing his whip, turning in his place, pointing 
to invisible objects and uttering unintel- 
ligible sounds — all, our tourists recognized, 
strict features of a social order principally 
devoted to language; it was this charming 
character who made their excursion fall so 
much short that their return left them still a 
stretch of the long daylight and an hour 
that, at his obliging suggestion, they spent 
on foot on the shining sands. Maisie had 
seen the plage the day before with Sir 
Claude, but that was a reason the more for 
showing on the spot to Mrs. Wix, that it 
was, as she said, another of the places on 
her list, and of the things of which she 
knew the French name. The bathers, so 
late, were absent, and the tide was low ; the 
sea-pools twinkled in the sunset, and there 
were dry places, as well, where they could 
sit again and admire and expatiate: a cir- 
cumstance that, while they listened to the 



36o 

lap of the waves, gave Mrs. Wix a fresh ful- 
crum for her challenge. "Have you abso- 
lutely none at all?" 

She had no need now, as to the question 
itself at least, to be specific; that, on the 
other hand, was the eventual result of their 
quiet conjoined apprehension of the thing 
that — well, yes, since they must face it — 
Maisie absolutely and appallingly had so 
little of. This marked more particularly the 
moment of the child's perceiving that her 
friend had risen to a level which might — 
till superseded, at all events — pass almost 
for sublime. Nothing more remarkable had 
taken place in the first heat of her own depar- 
ture, no phenomenon of perception more in- 
scrutable by our rough method, than her 
vision, the rest of that Boulogne day, of the 
manner in which she figured. I so despair 
of tracing her steps that I must crudely 
give you my word for its being, from this 
time on, a picture literally present to her. 
Mrs. Wix saw her as a little person knowing 
so extraordinarily much that, for the account 
to be taken of it, what she still did n't know 
would be ridiculous if it had n't been embar- 
rassing. Mrs. Wix was in truth more than 
ever qualified to meet embarrassment ; I am 



 361 

not sure that Maisie had not even a dim dis- 
cernment of the queer law of her own life 
that made her educate to that sort of pro- 
ficiency those elders with whom she was 
concerned. She promoted, as it were, their 
development : nothing could have been more 
marked, for instance, than her success in 
promoting Mrs. Beale's. She judged that 
if her whole history, for Mrs. Wix, had 
been the successive stages of her knowledge, 
so the very climax of the concatenation 
would, in the same view, be the stage at 
which the knowledge should overflow. As 
she was condemned to know more and more, 
how could it logically stop before she should 
know Most ? It came to her, in fact, as they 
sat there on the sands, that she was dis- 
tinctly on the road to know Everything. She 
had not had governesses for nothing: what 
in the world had she ever done but learn 
and learn and learn ? She looked at the pink 
sky with a placid foreboding that she soon 
would have learnt All. They lingered in the 
flushed air till at last it turned to gray and 
she seemed fairly to receive new information 
from every brush of the breeze. By the time 
they moved homeward it was as if, for Mrs. 
Wix, this inevitability had become a long. 



362 

tense cord, twitched by a nervous hand, on 
which the counted pearls of intelligence 
were to be neatly strung. 

In the evening, upstairs, they had another 
strange session, as to which Maisie could 
not afterwards have told you whether it was 
bang in the middle or quite at the beginning 
that her companion sounded with fresh 
emphasis the note of the moral sense. What 
mattered was merely that she did exclaim, 
and again, as at first appeared, most dis- 
connectedly: "God help me, it does seem 
to peep out!" Oh, the queer confusions 
that had wooed it at last to such peeping ! — 
none so queer, however, as the words of woe, 
and it might verily be said of rage, in which 
the poor lady bewailed the tragic end of her 
own rich ignorance. There was a point at 
which she seized the child and hugged her 
as close as in the old days of partings and 
returns ; at which she was visibly at a loss 
how to make up to such a victim for such 
contaminations; appealing, as to what she 
had done and was doing, in bewilderment, 
in explanation, in supplication, for reassur- 
ance, for pardon and even, outright, for pity. 

" I don't know what I 've said to you, my 
own; I don't know what I *m saying or what 



 363 

the turn you *ve given my life has rendered 
me, heaven forgive me, capable of saying. 
Have I lost all delicacy, all decency, all 
measure of how far and how bad — ? It 
seems to me, mostly, that I have, though 
I *m the last of whom you ever would have 
thought it. I *ve just done it for you^ pre- 
cious — not to lose you, which would have 
been worst of all : so that I 've had to pay 
with my own innocence — if you do laugh ! 

— for clinging to you and keeping you. 
Don't let me pay for nothing; don't let me 
have been thrust for nothing into such hor- 
rors and such shames. I never knew any- 
thing - about them, and I never wanted to 
know ! Now I know too much, too much ! " 

— the poor woman lamented and groaned. 
"I know so much that, with hearing such 
talk, I ask myself where I am; and, with 
uttering it too, which is worse, say to myself 
that I 'm far, too far, from where I started ! 
I ask myself what I should have thought, 
with my lost one, if I had heard myself cross 
the line ! There are lines I 've crossed with 
you that I should have fancied I had come to 
a pretty pass — ! " She gasped at the mere 
supposition. " I 've gone from one thing to 
another, and all for the real love of you ; and 



364 

now what would any one say — I mean any 
one but them — if they were to hear the way 
I go on? I've had to keep up with you, 
haven't I? — and therefore what could I do 
less than look to you to keep up with met 
But it 's not them that are the worst — by 
which I mean to say it 's not him: it *s your 
dreadfully base papa and the one person in 
the world whom he could have found, I do 
believe — and she's not the Countess, duck! 
— wickeder than himself. While they were 
about it, at any rate, since they were ruining 
you, they might have done it so as to spare 
an honest woman. Then I shouldn't have 
had to do — whatever it is that 's the worst: 
throw up at you the badness you haven't 
taken in, or find my advantage in the vile- 
ness you have / What I did lose patience at 
this morning was at how it was without your 
seeming to condemn — for you didn't, you 
remember! — you yet did seem to know. 
Thank God in his mercy, at last, i/you do!" 
The night, this time, was warm, and one 
of the windows stood open to the small bal- 
cony, over the rail of which, on coming up 
from dinner, Maisie had hung a long time 
in the enjoyment of the chatter, the lights, 
the life of the quay made brilliant by the 



 365 

season and the hour. Mrs. Wix's require- 
ments had drawn her in from this posture and 
Mrs. Wix's embrace had detained her, even 
though, midway in the outpouring, her con- 
fusion and sympathy had permitted, or rather 
had positively helped, her to disengage her- 
self. But the casement was still wide, the 
spectacle, the pleasure was still there, and 
from her place in the room, which, with 
its polished floor and its panels of elegance, 
was lighted from without more than from 
within, the child could still take account of 
them. She appeared to watch and listen; 
after which she answered Mrs. Wix with a 
question. " If I do know — i" 

"If you do condemn." The correction 
was made with some austerity. 

It had the effect of causing Maisie to 
heave a vague sigh of oppression and then, 
after an instant and as if under cover of 
this ambiguity, to pass out again upon the 
balcony. She hung again over the rail ; she 
felt the summer night; she dropped down 
into the manners of France. There was a 
cafd below the hotel, before which, with 
little chairs and tables, people sat on a 
space enclosed by plants in tubs; and the 
impression was enriched by the flash of the 



366 

white aprons of waiters and the music of a 
man and a woman who, from beyond the 
precinct, sent up the strum of a guitar and 
the drawl of a song about "amour." Maisie 
knew what "amour" meant too, and won- 
dered if Mrs, Wix did : Mrs. Wix remained 
within, as still as a mouse and perhaps not 
reached by the performance. After a while, 
but not till the musicians had ceased and 
begun to circulate with a little plate, her 
pupil came back to her. " Is it a crime ? " 
Maisie then asked. 

Mrs. Wix was as prompt as if she had 
been crouching in a lair. " Branded by the 
Bible." 

"Well, he won't commit a crime." 

Mrs. Wix looked at her gloomily. " He 's 
committing one now. " 

"Now?" 

"In being with her." 

Maisie had it on her tongue's end to re- 
turn once more : "But now he's free;" she 
remembered, however, in time, that one of 
the things she had known for the last entire 
hour was that this made no difference. 
After that, and as if to turn the right way, 
she was on the point of a blind dash, a weak 
reversion to the reminder that it might make 



 367 

a difference, might diminish the crime, for 
Mrs. Beale; till such a reflection was in its 
order also quashed by the visibility in Mrs. 
Wix*s face of the collapse produced by her 
inference from her pupil's manner that, after 
all her pains, her pupil did n't even yet ade- 
quately understand. Never so much as 
when just so confronted had Maisie wanted 
to understand, and all her thought for a 
minute centred in the effort to come out 
with something which should be a disproof 
of her simplicity. "Just trust me, dear: 
that 's all ! " — she came out finally with that ; 
and it was perhaps a good sign of her action 
that, with a long, impartial moan, Mrs. Wix 
floated her to bed. 

There was no letter the next morning from 
Sir Claude — which Mrs. Wix let out that 
she deemed the worst of omens ; yet it was 
just for the quieter communion they so got 
from him that when, after the coffee and 
rolls which made them more foreign than 
ever, it came to going forth for fresh drafts 
upon his credit, they wandered again up the 
hill to the rampart instead of plunging into 
distraction with the crowd on the sands or 
into the sea with the semi-nude bathers. 
They gazed once more at their gilded Virgin ; 



368 

they sank once more upon their battered 
bench; they felt once more their distance 
from the Regent's Park. At last Mrs. Wix 
became definite about their friend's silence. 
"He is afraid of her! She has forbidden 
him to write. " The fact of his fear Maisie 
already knew; but her companion's mention 
of it had at this moment two unexpected 
results. The first was her wondering, in 
dumb remonstrance, how Mrs. Wix, with a 
devotion not, after all, inferior to her own, 
could put into such an allusion such a grim- 
ness of derision; the second was that she 
found herself suddenly drop into a deeper 
view of it. She too had Ijeen afraid, as we 
have seen, of the people of whom Sir Claude 
was afraid, and by that law she had had her 
due measure of latent apprehension of Mrs. 
Beale. What occurred at present, however, 
was that, whereas this sympathy appeared 
vain as for him, the ground of it loomed 
dimly as a reason for selfish alarm. That 
uneasiness had not carried her far before 
Mrs. Wix spoke again, and with an abrupt- 
ness so great as almost to seem irrelevant. 
" Has it never occurred to you to be jealous 
of her.?" 

It never had, in the least ; yet the words 



 369 

were scarce in the air/ before Maisie had 
jumped at them) She held them well, she 
looked at them hard; at last she brought 
out with ap assurance which there was no 
one, alas, but herself to admire: "Well, 
yes — since you ask me." She hesitated, 
then continued : " Lots of times ! " 

Mrs. Wix glared an instant askance ; such 
approval as her look expressed was not 
wholly unqualified. It expressed, at any 
rate, something that presumably had to do 
with her saying once more: "Yes, he's 
afraid of her. ** 

Maisie heard, and it had afresh its effect 
on her, even through the blur of the atten- 
tion now required by the possibility of that 
idea of jealousy — a possibility created only 
by her feeling that she had thus found the 
way to show she was not simple. It stuck 
out of Mrs. Wix that this lady still believed 
her moral sense to be interested and feigned ; 
so what could be such a gage of her sincerity 
as a peep of the most restless of the pas- 
sions.^ Such a revelation would baffle dis- 
couragement, and discouragement was in 
fact so baffled that, helped in some degree 
by the mere intensity of their need to hope, 
which also, according to its nature, sprang 

24 



370 

from the dark portent of the absent letter, 
the real pitch of their morning was reached 
by the note, not of mutual scrutiny, but of 
unprecedented frankness. There were brood- 
ings indeed and silences, and Maisie sank 
deeper into the vision that for her friend 
she was, at the most, superficial, and that 
also, positively, she was the more so the 
more she tried to appear complete. Was 
the sum of all knowledge only to know how 
little, in this presence, one would ever 
reach it? The answer to that question 
luckily lost itself in the brightness suffus- 
ing the scene as soon as Maisie had thrown 
out, in regard to Mrs. Beale, such a remark 
as she had never dreamed she should live to 
make. "If I thought she was unkind to 
him — I don't know what I should do ! " 

Mrs. Wix dropped one of her squints ; she 
even confirmed it by a wild grunt. " I know 
what / should ! " 

Maisie, at this, felt that she lagged. 
" Well, I can think of one thing. " 

Mrs. Wix more directly challenged her. 
"What is it, then?" 

Maisie met her expression as if it were a 
game with forfeits for winking. " I 'd kill 
her ! " That, at least, she hoped as she 



 371 

looked away, would guarantee her moral 
sense 1 She looked away, but her compan- 
ion said nothing for so long that she at last 
turned her head again. Then she saw the 
straighteners all blurred with tears which, 
after a little, seemed to have sprung from 
her own eyes. There were tears in fact on 
both sides of the spectacles, and they were 
even so thick that it was presently all Maisie 
could do to make out through them that 
slowly, finally, Mrs. Wix put forth a hand. 
It was the material pressure that settled that, 
and even, at the end of some minutes, more 
things besides. It settled in its own way 
one thing in particular, which, though often 
between them, heaven knows, hovered round 
and hung over, was yet to be established 
without the shadow of an attenuating smile. 
Oh, there was no gleam of levity, as little 
of humor as of deprecation, in the long 
time they now sat together, or in the way in 
which, at some unmeasured point of it, Mrs. 
Wix became distinct enough for her own dig- 
nity and yet not loud enough for the snoozing 
old women. 

" I adore him. I adore him. " 

Maisie took it well in ; so well that in a 
moment more she would have answered, pro- 



372 

foundly, "So do I!" But before that 
moment passed something took place that 
brought other words to her lips; nothing 
more, very possibly, than the closer con- 
sciousness, in her hand, of the significance 
of Mrs. Wix's. Their hands remained 
linked in unutterable sign of their union, 
and what Maisie at last said was, simply and 
serenely : " Oh, I know ! " 

Their hands were so linked and their 
union was so confirmed that it took the far, 
deep note of a bell, borne to them on the 
summer air, to call them back to a sense of 
hours and proprieties. They had touched 
bottom and melted together, but they gave a 
start at last ; the bell was the voice of the 
inn, and the inn was the image of luncheon. 
They should be late for it; they got up; and 
their quickened step, on the return, had 
something of the swing of confidence. When 
they reached the hotel the table dhdte had 
begun: this was clear from the threshold, 
clear from the absence, in the hall and on 
the stairs, of the "personnel," as Mrs. Wix 
said — she had picked that up — all collected 
in the dining-room. They mounted to their 
apartments for a brush before the glass, and 
it was Maisie who, in passing and from a 



V 



 373 

vain impulse, threw open the white and gold 
door. She was thus first to utter the sound 
that brought Mrs. Wix almost on the top of 
her, as, by the other accident, it would have 
brought her on the top of Mrs. Wix. It had 
at any rate the effect of leaving them 
bunched together in a strained stare at their 
new situation. This situation had put on, 
in a flash, the bright form of Mrs. Beale: 
she stood there in her hat and her jacket, 
amid bags and shawls, smiling and holding 
out her arms. If she had just arrived it was 
a different figure from either of the two that, 
for their benefit, wan and tottering and none 
too soon to save life, the Channel had re- 
cently disgorged. She was as lovely as the 
day that had brought her over, as fresh as 
the luck and the health that attended her; 
it came to Maisie on the spot that she was 
more beautiful than she had ever been. 
All this was too quick to count, but there 
was still time in it to give the child the sense 
of what had kindled the light. That leaped 
out of the open arms, the open eyes, the open 
mouth; it leaped out with Mrs. Beale's loud 
cry at her : "I'm free, I 'm free ! " 



374 



XXVII 

The greatest wonder of all was the way the 
announcement, so far as could be judged, 
was launched predominantly at Mrs. Wix, 
who, as if from sudden failure of strength, 
sank into a chair while Maisie surrendered 
to the visitor's embrace. As soon as the 
child was liberated she met, with profundity, 
Mrs. Wix's stupefaction and actually was 
able to see that, while in a manner sustain- 
ing the encoimter, her face yet seemed with 
intensity to say: "Now, for God's sake, 
don't crow ' I told you so ! ' " Maisie was 
somehow on the spot aware of an absence of 
disposition to crow; it had taken her but an 
extra minute to arrive at such a quick sur- 
vey of the objects surrounding Mrs. Beale as 
showed that among them was no appiute- 
nance of Sir Claude's. She knew his 
dressing-bag now — oh, with the fondest 
knowledge ! — and there was an instant dur- 
ing which its not being there was a stroke of 
the worst news. She was yet to learn what 
it could be to recognize in some perception 
of a gap the sign of extinction, and therefore 



 375 

remained unaware that this momentary pang 
was a foretaste of the experience of death. 
It passed in a flash, of course, with Mrs. 
Beale's brightness and with her own instant 
appeal " You 've come alone ? " 

" Without Sir Claude ? " Strangely, Mrs. 
Beale looked even brighter. "Yes; in the 
eagerness to get at you. You abominable 
little villain ! " — and her stepmother, laugh- 
ing clear, administered to her cheek a pat 
that was partly a pinch. "What were you 
up to and what did you take me for } But 
I 'm glad to be abroad, and, after all, it 's 
you who have shown me the way. I might n't, 
without you, have been able to come; that 
is, so soon. Well, here I am, at any rate, 
and in a moment more I should have begun 
to worry about you. This will do very 
well " — she was good-natured about the 
place and presently added that it was nice 
and Frenchy. But with a rosier glow she 
made again her great point: "I 'm free, I 'm 
free ! " Maisie made, on her side, her own : 
she carried back her gaze to Mrs. Wix, whom 
amazement continued to hold; she drew, 
afresh, her old friend's attention to the 
superior way she did n't take that up. What 
she did take up, the next minute, was the 



376 

question of Sir Claude. "Where is he? 
Won't he come?" 

Mrs. Beale's consideration of this oscil- 
latedy with a smile, between the two expec- 
tancies with which she was flanked : it was 
conspicuous, it was extraordinary, her un- 
blinking acceptance of Mrs. Wix, a miracle 
of which Maisie had even now begun to read 
a reflection in that lady's long visage. 
" He '11 come, but we must make him ! " she 
gayly brought forth. 

" Make him ? " Maisie echoed. 

"We must give him time; we must play 
our cards. " 

"But he promised us, awfully," Maisie 
replied. 

"My dear child, he has promised me 
awfully; I mean lots of things, and not, in 
every case, kept his promise to the letter." 
Mrs. Beale's good humor insisted on taking 
for granted Mrs. Wix's, to whom her atten- 
tion had suddenly grown prodigious. "I 
dare say he has done the same with you and 
not always come to time. But he makes it 
up in his own way; and it isn't as if we 
did n't know exactly what he is. There 's one 
thing he is," she went on, "which makes 
everything else only a question, for us, of 



^^ 



 377 

tact. " They scarce had time to wonder what 
this was before it was, as they might have 
said right there. " He 's as free as I am ! " 

"Yes, I know,'* said Maisie; as if, how- 
ever, independently weighing the value of 
that. She really weighed also the oddity of 
her stepmother's treating it as news to her^ 
who had been the first person, literally, to 
whom Sir Claude had mentioned it. For a 
few seconds, as if with the sound of it in her 
ears, she stood with him again, in memory 
and in the twilight, in the hotel garden at 
Folkestone. 

Anything Mrs. Beale overlooked was, she 
indeed divined, but the effect of an exalta- 
tion of high spirits, a tendency to soar that 
showed even when she dropped — still quite 
impartially — almost to the confidential. 
" Well, then — we 've only to wait. He 
can't do without us long. I 'm sure, Mrs. 
Wix, he can't do without j<72/ ! He 's devoted 
to you ; he has told me so much about you. 
The extent I count on you, you know, count 
on you to help me ! " — was an extent that 
even all her radiance could n't express. 
What it couldn't express, quite as much as 
what it could, made at any rate, every in- 
stant, her presence, and even her famous 



378 

freedom, loom larger; and it was this mighty 
mass that once more led her companions, 
bewildered and scattered, to exchange with 
each other, as through a thickening veil, 
confused and ineffectual signs. They clung 
together, at least, on the common ground of 
unpreparedness, and Maisie watched with- 
out relief the havoc of wonder in Mrs. Wix. 
It had reduced her to perfect impotence, and, 
but that gloom was black upon her, she sat 
as if fascinated by Mrs. Beale's high style. 
It had plunged her into a long deep hush ; 
for what had happened was the thing she 
had least allowed for and before which the 
particular rigor she had worked up could 
only grow limp and sick. Sir Claude was to 
have reappeared with his accomplice or with- 
out her; never, never his accomplice without 
hint. Mrs. Beale had gained, apparently, 
by this time, an advantage she could pursue : 
she looked at the droll, dumb figure with 
jesting reproach. "You really won't shake 
hands with me.^ Never mind; you '11 come 
round!" She put the matter to no test, 
going on immediately and, instead of offer- 
ing her hand, making it, with a pretty gesture 
that her head bent to, reach a long pin that a 
played a part in her back hair. " Are hats 



 379 

worn at luncheon ? If you 're as hungry as I 
am we must go right dowii." 

Mrs. Wix stuck fast, but she met the 
question in a voice her pupil scarce recog- 
nized. "I wear mine." 

Mrs. Beale, swallowing at one glance her 
bran-new bravery, which she appeared at 
once to refer to its origin and to follow in 
its flights, accepted this as conclusive. 
" Oh, but I 've not such a beauty 1 " Then 
she tiuTied rejoicingly to Maisie. " I 've 
got a beauty lor you^ my dear." 

"A beauty.?" 

" A love of a hat — in my luggage. I re- 
membered that*^ — she nodded at the object 
on her stepdaughter's head — "and I've 
brought you one with a peacock's breast. 
It's the most gorgeous blue!" 

It was too strange, this talking with her 
there already not about Sir Claude, but about 
peacocks — too strange for the child to have 
the presence of mind to thank her. But the 
felicity in which she had arrived was so 
proof against everything that Maisie felt 
more and more the depth of the purpose that 
must underlie it. She had a vague sense of 
its being abysmal, the spirit with which Mrs. 
Beale carried off the awkwardness, in the 



38o 

white and gold salon^ of such a want of 
breath and of welcome. Mrs. Wix was more 
breathless than ever; the embarrassment of 
Mrs. Beale's isolation was as nothing to the 
embarrassment of her grace. The percep- 
tion of this dilemma was the germ, on the 
child's part, of a new question altogether. 
What if, with this indulgence — ? But the 
idea lost itself in something too frightened 
for hope and too conjectured for fear; and 
while everything went by leaps and bounds 
one of the waiters stood at the door to 
remind them that the table iTkdte was half 
over. 

" Had you come up to wash hands ? " Mrs. 
Beale hereupon asked them. " Go and do it 
quickly, and I '11 be with you; they've put 
my boxes in that nice room — it was Sir 
Claude's. Trust him," she laughed, "to 
have a good one ! " The door of a neigh- 
boring room stood open, and now, from the 
threshold, addressing herself again to Mrs. 
Wix, she sent a note flying that gave the very 
key of what, as she would have said, she 
was up to. "Dear lady, please attend to 
my daughter." 

She was up to a change of deportment so 
complete that it represented — oh, for offices 



 381 

still honorably subordinate, if not too ex- 
plicitly menial — an absolute coercion, an 
interested clutch, of the old woman's re- 
spectability. There was response, for 
Maisie's mind, I may say at once, in the 
jump of that respectability to its feet; it 
was itself capable of one of the leaps, one 
of the bounds just mentioned, and it carried 
its charge, with this momentum and while 
Mrs. Beale popped into Sir Claude's cham- 
ber, straight away to where, at the end of the 
passage, pupil and governess were quartered 
The greatest stride of all, for that matter, 
was that within a few seconds the pupil had, 
in another relation, been converted into a 
daughter. Maisie's eyes were still following 
it when, after the rush, with the door almost 
slammed and no thought of soap and towels, 
the pair stood face to face. Mrs. Wix, in 
this position, was the first to gasp a sound. 
" Can it ever be that she has one } " 

Maisie felt still more bewildered, " One 
what.?" 

"Why, moral sense." 

They spoke as if you might have two, but 
Mrs. Wix looked as if it were not altogether 
a happy thought, and Maisie didn't see how 
even an affirmative from her own lips would 



382 

clear up what had become most of a mys- 
tery. It was to this she sprang pretty 
straight, "/j she my mother now? " 

It was a point as to which an horrific 
glimpse of the responsibility of an opinion 
appeared to affect Mrs. Wix like a blow in 
the stomach. She had evidently never 
thought of it; but she could think and re- 
bound. "If she is, he's equally your 
father. " 

Maisie, however, thought further. " Then 
my father and my mother — ! " 

But she had already faltered and Mrs. 
Wix had already glared back. "Ought to 
live together? Don't begin it again ! " She 
turned away with a groan, to reach the 
washing-stand, and Maisie could by this 
time recognize with a certain ease that that 
way, verily, madness did lie. Mrs. Wix 
gave a great untidy splash, but the next 
instant had faced round. " She has taken a 
new line." 

"She was nice to you," Maisie concurred. 

" What sAe thinks so — 'Go and dress 
the young lady. ' But it 's something ! " she 
panted. Then she thought out the rest. 
"If he won't have her, why she '11 hsLvej^ou. 
She '//he the one." 



{ 



 383 

" The one to keep me abroad ? " 

" The one to give you a home. " Mrs. Wix 
saw further; she mastered all the portents. 
" Oh, she 's cruelly clever ! It 's not a moral 
sense." She reached her climax. "It's a 
game ! " 

"A game?" 

" Not to lose him. She has sacrificed him 
— to her duty. " 

"Then won't he come.? " Maisie pleaded. 

Mrs. Wix made no answer; her vision 
absorbed her. "He has fought. But she 
has won." 

"Then won't he come?" the child 
repeated. 

Mrs. Wix hesitated. "Yes, hang him!" 
She had never been so profane. 

For all Maisie minded ! " Soon — to- 
morrow ? " 

" Too soon — whenever. Indecently soon. " 

"But then we shall be together ! " the child 
went on. It made Mrs. Wix look at her as 
if in exasperation ; but nothing had time to 
come before she precipitated: "Together 
withj'^?^.'" The air of criticism continued, 
but took voice only in her companion's 
bidding her wash herself and come down. 
The silence of quick ablutions fell upon 



384 

them, presently broken, however, by one of 
Maisie's sudden reversions. "Mercy, isn't 
she handsome?" 

Mrs. Wix had finished; she waited. 
"She'll attract attention." They were 
rapid, and it would have been noticed that 
the shock the beauty had given them acted, 
incongruously, as a positive spur to their 
preparations for rejoining her. She had, 
none the less, when they returned to the 
sitting-room, already descended; the open 
door of her room showed it empty, and the 
chambermaid explained. Here again they 
were delayed by another sharp thought of 
Mrs. Wix's.' "But what will she live on 
meanwhile ? " 

Maisie stopped short. "Till Sir Claude 
comes ? " 

It was nothing to the violence with which 
her friend had been arrested. "Who '11 pay 
the bills.?" 

Maisie thought. " Can't sAe f " 

" She ? She has n't a penny. " 

The child wondered. " But did n't papa ? " 

" Leave her a fortune } " Mrs. Wix would 
have appeared to speak of papa as dead had 
she not immediately added : " Why, he lives 
on other women ! " 



 385 

Oh yes, Maisie remembered. "Then 
can't he send — ?" She faltered again; 
even to herself it sounded queer. 

"Some of their money to his wife?" 
Mrs. Wix gave a laugh still stranger than 
the weird suggestion. " I dare say she 'd 
take it!" 

They hurried on again ; yet again, on the 
stairs, Maisie pulled up. "Well, if she 
had stopped in England ! " she threw out. 

Mrs. Wix considered. "And he had 
come over instead ? " 

"Yes, as we expected." Maisie launched 
her speculation. "What, then, would she 
have lived on ? " 

Mrs. Wix hung fire but an instant. 
" On other men ! " And she marched down- 
stairs. 



XXVIII 

Mrs. Beale, at table between the pair, 
plainly attracted the attention Mrs. Wix 
had foretold. No other lady present was 
nearly so handsome, nor did the beauty of 
any other accommodate itself with such art 
to the homage it produced. She talked 

25 



386 

mainly to her other neighbor, and that left 
Maisie leisure both to note the manner in 
which eyes were riveted and nudges inter- 
changed, and to lose herself in the meanings 
that, dimly, as yet, and disconnectedly, but 
with a vividness that fed apprehension, she 
could begin to read into her stepmother's 
independent move. Mrs. Wix had helped 
her by talking of a game ; it was a connec- 
tion in which the move could put on a stra- 
tegic air. Her notions of diplomacy were 
thin, but it was a kind of cold diplomatic 
shoulder and an elbow of more than usual 
point that, temporarily at least, were pre- 
sented to her by the averted inclination of 
Mrs. Beale*s head. There was a phrase 
familiar to Maisie, so often was it used by 
this lady to express the idea of one's getting 
what one wanted: one got it, Mrs. Beale 
always said — she, at all events, always got 
it or proposed to get it — by "making 
love." She was at present making love, 
singular as it appeared, to Mrs. Wix, and 
her young friend's mind had, as yet, never 
moved in such freedom as on finding itself 
face to face with the question of what she 
now wanted to get. This period of the 
omelette aux rognons and the poulet saut^^ 



\ 



 387 

while her sole surviving parent fairly chat- 
tered to her governess, left Maisie rather 
wondering if her governess would hold out. 
It was strange, but she became on the spot 
quite as interested in Mrs. Wix's moral 
sense as Mrs. Wix could possibly be in hers : 
it had risen before her so pressingly that 
there was something new for Mrs. Wix to 
resist. Resisting Mrs. Beale herself prom- 
ised at this rate to become a very different 
business from resisting Sir Claude's view of 
her. More might cOme of what had hap- 
pened — whatever it was — than Maisie felt 
she could have expected. She put it together 
with a suspicion that, had she ever in her 
life had a sovereign changed, would have 
resembled an impression, baffled by the want 
of arithmetic, that her change was wrong — 
she groped about in it that she had perhaps 
become the victim of a violent substitution. 
A victim was what she should surely be if 
the issue between her step-parents had been 
settled by Mrs. Beale's saying: "Well, if 
she can live with but one of us alone, with 
which in the world should it be but me ? " 
That answer was far from what, for days, 
she had nursed herself in, and the desolation 
of it was deepened by the absence of any- 



388 

thing from Sir Claude to* show he had not 
had to take it as triumphant. Had not Mrs. 
Beale, upstairs, as good as given out that 
she had quitted him with the snap of a ten* 
sion, left him, in London, after some strug- 
gle as a sequel to which her own advent 
represented that she had practically sacri- 
ficed him ? Maisie assisted in fancy at the 
episode in the Regent's Park, finding ele- 
ments almost of terror in the suggestion that 
Sir Claude had not had fair play. They 
drew something, as she sat there, even from 
the pride of an association with such beauty 
as Mrs. Beale's; and the child quite forgot 
that, though the sacrifice of Mrs. Beale her- 
self was a solution she had not invented, she 
would probably have seen Sir Claude embark 
upon it without a direct remonstrance. 

What her stepmother had clearly now 
promised herself to wring from Mrs. Wix 
was an assent to the great modification, the 
change, as smart as a juggler's trick, in the 
interest of which nothing so much mattered 
as the new convenience of Mrs. Beale. 
Maisie could positively seize the moral that 
her elbow seemed to point in ribs thinly 
defended — the moral of its not mattering a 
straw which of the step-parents was the 



 389 

guardian. The essence of the question was 
that a girl wasn't a boy: if Maisie had been 
a trousered thing Sir Claude would have 
been welcome. As the case stood he had 
simply dropped out, and Mrs. Wix would 
henceforth find herself in the employ of the 
right person. These arguments had really 
fallen, for our young lady,' into their place 
at the very touch of that tone in which she 
had heard her new title declared. She was 
still, as a result of so many parents, a daugh- 
ter to somebody, even after papa and mamma 
were to all intents dead. If her father's 
wife and her mother's husband, by the 
operation of a natural, or, for all she knew, 
a legal rule, were in the shoes of their de- 
funct partners, then Mrs. Beale's was exactly 
as defunct as Sir Claude's and her shoes the 
very pair to which, in " Farange v. Farange 
& Others," the divorce-court had given pri- 
ority. The subject of that celebrated settle- 
ment saw the rest of the day really filled 
out with the pomp of all that Mrs. Beale 
assumed. The assumption rounded itself 
there between her entertainers, flourished 
in a way that left them, in their bottomless 
element, scarce a free pair of eyes to ex- 
change signals. It struck Maisie even a 



390 

little that there was a rope or two Mrs. Wix 
might have thrown out if she would, or a 
rocket or two she might have sent up. 
They had, at any rate, never been so long 
together without communion or telegraphy, 
and their companion kept them apart by 
simply keeping them with her. From this 
situation they saw the grandeur of their 
intenser relation to her pass and pass like 
an endless procession. It was a day of lively 
movement and of talk, on Mrs. Beale's part, 
so brilliant and overflowing as to represent 
music and banners. She took them out 
with her, promptly, to walk and to drive, 
and even, towards night, sketched a plan for 
carrying them to the ]£tablissement, where, 
for only a franc apiece, they would listen 
to a concert of celebrities. It reminded 
Maisie, the plan, of the side-shows at Earl's 
Court, and the franc sounded brighter than 
the shillings which had at that time failed ; 
yet this too, like the other, was a frustrated 
hope: the francs failed like the shillings 
and the side-shows had set an example to the 
concert. The fitablissement, in short, 
melted away, and it was little wonder that 
a lady who from the moment of her arrival 
had been so gallantly in the breach should 



 391 

confess herself at last done up. Maisie 
could appreciate her fatigue; the day had 
not passed without such an observer's dis- 
covering that she was excited and even men- 
tally comparing her state to that of the 
breakers after a gale. It had blown hard in 
London, and she would take time to sub- 
side. It was of the condition known to the 
child by report as that of talking against 
time that her decision, her spirit, her humor, 
which had never dropped, now gave the 
impression. 

She too was delighted with foreign man- 
ners; but her daughter's opportunities of 
explaining them to her were unexpectedly 
forestalled by her tone of large acquaintance 
with them. One of the things that nipped 
in the bud all response to her volubility was 
Maisie's surprised retreat before the fact that 
Continental life was what she had been al- 
most brought up on. It was Mrs. Beale, dis- 
concertingly, who began to explain it to her 
friends; it was she who, wherever they 
turned, was the interpreter, the historian and 
the guide. She was full of reference to her 
early travels — at the age of eighteen: she 
had at that period made, with a distin- 
guished Dutch family, a stay on the Lake of 



' 



392 

Geneva. Maisie, in the old days, had been 
regaled with anecdotes of these adventures, 
but they had become phantasmal, and the 
heroine's quite showy exemption from be- 
wilderment at Boulogne, her acuteness on 
some of the very subjects on which Maisie 
had been acute to Mrs. Wix, were a high 
note of the mastery, of the advantage with 
which she had arrived. It was all a part of 
the wind in her sails and of the weight with 
which her daughter was now to feel her 
hand. The effect of it on Maisie was to add 
already the burden of time to her separation 
from Sir Claude. It might have lasted for 
days ; it was as if, with their main agitation 
transferred thus to France and with neither 
mamma, now, nor Mrs. Beale, nor Mrs. Wix, 
nor herself at his side, he must be fearfully 
alone in England. Hour after hour she felt 
as if she were waiting; yet she could n't have 
said exactly for what. There were moments 
when Mrs. Beale' s flow of talk might have 
bubbled on the very edge of it; at others 
this talk was a mere rattle to smother a 
knock. At no part of the crisis had the 
rattle so public a purpose as when, instead 
of letting Maisie go with Mrs. Wix to pre- 
pare for dinner, she pushed her — with a 



 393 

push at last incontestably maternal — straight 
into the room inherited from Sir Claude. 
She titivated her little charge with her own 
brisk hands; then she brought out: "I'm 
going to divorce your father." 

This was so different from anything Maisie 
had expected that it took some time to reach 
her mind. She was aware meanwhile that 
she must look rather wan. "To marry Sir 
Claude.?" 

Mrs. Beale rewarded her with a kiss. 
" It 's sweet to hear you put it so." 

This was a tribute, but it left Maisie bal- 
ancing for an objection. "How can you 
when he 's married } " 

" He is n't — practically. He 's free. " 

" Free to marry ? " 

"Free, first, to divorce his own fiend." 

The benefit that these last days she had 
felt she owed a certain person left Maisie 
for the moment so ill-prepared for recogniz- 
ing this label that she hesitated long enough 
to risk : " Mamma ? " 

" She is n't your mamma any longer," Mrs. 
Beale replied. "Sir Claude has paid her 
money to cease to be." Then as if remem- 
bering how little, to the child, a pecuniary 
transaction must' represent: "She lets him 



394 

off supporting her if he *11 let her off support- 
ing you. " 

Mrs. Beale appeared, however, to have done 
injustice to her daughter's financial grasp. 
"And support me himself? " Maisie asked. 

" Take the whole burden and never let her 
hear of you again. It 's a regular signed 
contract." 

" Why, that 's lovely of her I " Maisie cried. 

" It *s not so lovely, my dear, but that he '11 
get his divorce." 

Maisie was briefly silent; after which, 
" No — he won't get it," she said. Then she 
added still more boldly: "And you won't 
get yours." 

Mrs. Beale, who was at the dressing-glass, 
turned round with amusement and surprise. 
" How do you know that 1 " 

" Oh, I know ! " said Maisie. 

"From Mrs. Wix.?" 

Maisie hesitated; then, after an instant, 
was determined by Mrs. Beale' s absence of 
anger, which struck her the more as she had 
felt that she must take her courage in her 
hands. "From Mrs. Wix," she admitted. 

Mrs. Beale, at the glass again, made play 
with a powder-puff. "My own sweet, she 's 
mistaken ! " was all she said. 



/ 



 395 

There was a certain force in the very 
amenity of thi?, but our young lady reflected 
long enough to remember that it was not the 
answer Sir Claude himself had made. This 
recollection, nevertheless, failed to prevent 
her saying: "Do you mean, then, that he 
won't come till he has got it ? " 

Mrs. Beale gave a last touch; she was 
ready; she stood there in all her elegance. 
" I mean, my dear, that it 's because he has n*t 
got it that I left him. " 

This opened out a view that stretched 
further than Maisie could reach. She 
turned away from it, but she spoke before 
they went out again. "Do you like Mrs. 
Wix now?" 

"Why, my chick, I was just going to ask 
you if you think she has come at all to like 
poor me! " 

Maisie thought, at this hint; but unsuc- 
cessfully. "I haven't the least idea. But 
I '11 find out." 

" Do ! " said Mrs. Beale, rustling out with 
her and as if it would be a particular favor. 

The child tried, promptly, at bed-time, 
relieved now of the fear that their visitor 
would wish to separate her for the night 
from her attendant. " Have you held out } " 



396 

— she began as soon as the doors at the 
end of the passage were again closed on 
them. 

Mrs. Wix looked hard at the flame of the 
candle. "Held out — ?" 

" Why, she has been making love to you. 
Has she won you over.? " 

Mrs. Wix transferred the straighteners to 
her pupil's face. " Over to what ? " 

" To her keeping me instead. " 

" Instead of Sir Claude i " Mrs. Wix was 
distinctly gaining time. 

"Yes; who else.? — since it's not instead 
oiyou.** 

Mrs. Wix colored at this lucidity. " Yes 

— that is what she means. " 

" Well, do you like it } " Maisie asked. 

She actually had *to wait, for, oh, her 
friend was embarrassed! "My opposition 
to the connection — theirs — would then, 
naturally, to some extent fall. She has 
treated me to-day with peculiar considera- 
tion; not that I don't know very well where 
she got the pattern of it ! But of course, " 
Mrs. Wix hastened to add, " I should n't 
like her as the one nearly so well as him. " 

" ' Nearly so well ' ! " Maisie echoed : " I 
should hope indeed not." She spoke with 



it 



 397 

a firmness at which she was the first to be 
amazed. " I thought you * adored ' him." 
I do," Mrs. Wix sturdily allowed. 
Then have you suddenly begun to adore 
her too ? " 

Mrs. Wix, instead of directly answering, 
only blinked in support of her sturdiness. 
"My dear, in what a tone you ask that! 
You 're coming out." 

"Why shouldn't I? You've come out. 
Mrs. Beale has come out. We each have 
our turn ! " And Maisie threw off the most 
extraordinary little laugh that had ever 
passed her young lips. 

There passed Mrs. Wix's indeed the next 
moment a sound that more than matched it. 
" You 're most remarkable ! " she neighed. 

Her pupil faltered a few seconds. "I 
think you 've done a great deal to make 
me so." 

"Very true — I have." She dropped to 
humility, as if she recalled her so recent 
self-arraignment. 

"Would you accept her, then? That's 
what I ask," said Maisie. 

"As a substitute?" Mrs. Wix turned 
it over; she met again the child's eyes. 
"She has literally almost fawned upon me." 



398 

"She hasn't fawned upon him. She 
hasn't even been kind to him." 

Mrs. Wix looked as if she had now an 
advantage. "Then do you propose to 
•kiir her?" 

"You don't answer my question," Maisie 
persisted. "I want to know if you accept 
her." 

Mrs. Wix continued to dodge. "I want 
to know if you do ! " 

Everything in the child's person at this 
announced that it was easy to know. 
"Not for a moment." 

"Not the two now?" Mrs. Wix had 
caught on — she flushed with it "Only 
him alone?" 

"Him alone or nobody." 

" Not even me f " cried Mrs. Wix. 

Maisie looked at her a moment, then 
began to undress. " Oh, you 're nobody ! " 



XXIX 



She slept beyond her allowance, instantly 
recognizing lateness in the way her eyes 
opened to Mrs. Wix, erect, completely • 
dressed, more dressed than ever, and gazing 



\ 



u 



 399 

at her from the centre of the room. The 
next thing she was sitting very high, wide 
awake with the fear of the hours of " abroad " 
that she might have lost. Mrs. Wix looked 
as if the day already made itself felt, and 
the process of catching up with it began for 
Maisie with hearing her distinctly say: 
My poor dear, he has come ! " 

Sir Claude ? *' Maisie, clearing the little 
bed- rug with the width of her spring, felt 
the polished floor under her bare feet. 

"He crossed in the night; he got in 
early." Mrs. Wix's head jerked stiffly back- 
ward. "He's there." 

"And you 've seen him ? " 

" No. He 's there — he 's there ! " Mrs. 
Wix repeated. Her voice came out with a 
queer extinction that was not a voluntary 
drop, and she trembled so that it added to 
their common emotion. Visibly pale, they 
gazed at each other. 

"Isn't it too beatitiful ! '' Maisie panted 
back at her; an appeal to which, however, 
she was not ready with a response. The 
term Maisie had used was a flash of diplo- 
macy — to prevent, at any rate, Mrs. Wix's 
using another. To that degree it was suc- 
cessful; there was only an appeal, strange 



400 

and mute, in the white old face, which 
produced the effect of a want of decision 
greater than could by any stretch of opti- 
mism have been associated with her attitude 
toward what had happened. For Maisie 
herself indeed what had happened was, 
oddly, as she could feel, less of a simple 
rapture than any arrival or return of the 
same supreme friend had ever been before. 
What had become overnight, what had be- 
come while she slept, of the comfortable 
faculty of gladness? She tried to wake it 
up a little wider by talking, by rejoicing, 
by plunging into water and into clothes, 
and she made out that it was ten o'clock, 
but also that Mrs. Wix had not yet break- 
fasted. The day before, at nine, they had 
had together a cafi complet in their sitting- 
room. Mrs. Wix, on her side, had evidently 
also a refuge to seek. She sought it in 
checking the precipitation of some of her 
pupil's present steps, in recalling to her, 
with an approach to sternness, that of all 
such preparations ablutions should be the 
most thorough, and in throwing even a 
certain reprobation on the idea of hurrying 
into clothes for the sake of a mere step- 
father. She took her in fact, with a sort 



 401 

of silent insistence, in hand; she reduced 
the process to sequences more definite than 
any it had known since the days of Moddle. 
Whatever it might be that was now, with 
a difference, attached to Sir Claude's pres- 
ence, was still, after all, compatible for our 
young lady with the instinct of dressing to 
see him with almost untidy haste. Mrs. 
Wix meanwhile, luckily, was not wholly 
directed to repression. " He 's there — he 's 
there!" she had said over several times. 
It was her answer to every invitation to men- 
tion how long she had been up and her 
motive for respecting so rigidly the slumber 
of her companion. It formed for some 
minutes her only account of the where- 
abouts of the others and her reason for not 
having yet seen them, as well as of the 
possibility of their presently being found in 
the salon. 

" He 's there — he 's there ! " she declared 
once more, as she made, on the child, with 
an almost invidious tug, a strained under- 
garment "meet." 

" Do you mean he 's in the salon ? " Maisie 
asked again. 

"He's with her," Mrs. Wix desolately 

said. " He 's with her," she reiterated. 

26 



402 

" Do you mean in her own room ? *' Maisie 
continued. 

She waited an instant. " God knows ! " 

Maisie wondered a little why, or how, 
God should know; this, however, delayed 
but an instant her bringing out: "Well, 
won't she go back?" 

"Go back? Never!" 

" She '11 stay all the same? " 

"All the more." 

"Then won't Sir Claude go?" Maisie 
asked. 

" Go back — if she does n't ? " Mrs. Wix 
appeared to give this question the benefit 
of a minute's thought. "Why should he 
have come — only to go back? " 

Maisie produced an ingenious solution. 
"To make her go. To take her." 

Mrs. Wix met it without a concession. 
"If he can make her go so easily, why 
should he have let her come?" 

Maisie considered. " Oh, just to see me. 
She has a right. " 

" Yes — she has a right " 

"She's my mother!" Maisie tentatively 
tittered. 

" Yes — she *s your mother. " 

"Besides," Maisie went on, "he didn't 



 403 

let her come. He does n't like her coming; 
and if he doesn't like it — " 

Mrs. Wix took her up. " He must lump 
it — that 's what he must do ! Your mother 
was right about him — I mean your real one. 
He has no strength. No — none at all." 
She seemed more profoundly to muse. " He 
might have had some even with her — I 
mean with her ladyship. He 's just a poor, 
sunk slave, " she asserted with sudden energy. 

Maisie wondered again. " A slave ? " 

"To his passions.'* 

She continued to wonder and even to be 
impressed; after which she went on: "But 
how do you know he '11 stay? " 

" Because he likes us ! " — and Mrs. Wix, 
with her emphasis of the word, whirled her 
charge round again to deal with posterior 
hooks. She had positively never shaken'' 
her so. 

It was as if she quite shook something out 
of her. "But how will that help him if we 
— in spite of his affection ! — don't stay .^ " 

" Do you mean if we go off and leave him 
with her? " — Mrs. Wix put the question to 
the back of her pupil's head. "It won't 
help him. It will be his ruin. He '11 have 
got nothing. He'll have lost everything. 



1 

f 

I 'I 

•J 



i 



404 

It will be his utter destruction, for he 's 
certain after a while to loathe her." 

"Then when he loathes her" — it was 
astonishing how she caught the idea — " he '11 
just come right after us ! " Maisie announced. 

"Never." 

"Never.?" 

" She '11 keep him. She '11 hold him for- 
ever. " 

Maisie doubted. " When he * loathes ' 
her?" 

"That won't matter. She won't loathe 
him. People don't ! " Mrs. Wix brought up. 

"Some do. Mamma does/' Maisie con- 
tended. 

" Mamma does not ! " It was startling — 
her friend contradicted her flat. "She 
loves him — she adores him. A woman 
knows." Mrs. Wix spoke not only as if 
Maisie were not a woman, but as if she 
would never be one. " / know ! " she cried. 

" Then why on earth has she left him } " 

Mrs. Wix hesitated. "He hates her. 
Don't stoop so — lift up your hair. You 
know how I 'm affected toward him," she 
added, with dignity; "but you must also 
know that I see clear." 

Maisie, all this time, was trying hard to 



 405 

do likewise. "Then, if she has left him 
for that, why shouldn't Mrs. Beale leave 
him.?" 

" Because she *s not such a fool ! " 

"Not such a fool as mamma? " 

" Precisely — if you will have it. Does it 
look like her leaving him.?" Mrs. Wix in- 
quired. She hung fire again ^ then she went 
on with more intensity: "Do you want to 
know really and truly why.? So that she 
may be his wretchedness and his punish- 
ment. " 

" His punishment .? " — this was more than 
as yet Maisie could quite accept. "For 
what .? " 

" For everything. That *s what will hap- 
pen: he'll be tied to her forever. She 
won't mind in the least his hating her, and 
she won't hate him back. She '11 only hate 
us:' 

" Us .? " the child faintly echoed. 

"She'llhatej/£?«." 

"Me.? Why, I brought them together!" 
Maisie resentfully cried. 

"You brought them together." There 
was a completeness in Mrs. Wix's assent. 
" Yes ; it was a pretty job. Sit down. " She 
began to brush her pupil's hair and, as she 



4o6 

took up the mass of it with some force of 
hand, went on with a sharp recall: "Your 
mother adored him at first — it might have 
lasted. But he began too soon with Mrs. 
Beale. As you say," she pursued with a 
free application of the brush, "you brought 
' them together. " 

" I brought them together " — Maisie was 
ready to reaffirm it. She felt, none the 
less, for a moment, at the bottom of a hole ; 
then she seemed to see a way out. " But I 
didn't bring mamma together." She just 
faltered. 

" With all those gentlemen ? " — Mrs. Wix 
pulled her up. "No; it isn't quite so bad 
as that. " 

"I only said to the Captain" — Maisie 
had the quick memory of it — " that I hoped 
he at least (he was awfully nice !) would love 
her and keep her. " 

"And even that wasn't much harm," 
threw in Mrs. Wix. 

"It wasn't much good," Maisie was 
obliged to recognize. "She can't bear 
him — not even a mite. She told me at 
Folkestone. " 

Mrs. Wix suppressed a gasp ; then after a 
bridling instant during which she might 



 407 

have appeared to deflect with difficulty from 
her odd consideration of Ida's wrongs: "He 
was a nice sort of person for her to talk to 
you about ! " 

" Oh, I like him ! " Maisie promptly re- 
joined; and at this, with an inarticulate 
sound and an inconsequence still more 
marked, her companion bent over and dealt 
her, on the cheek, a rapid peck which had 
the apparent intention of a kiss. 

"Well, if her ladyship doesn't agree with 
you, what does it only prove?" Mrs. Wix 
demanded in conclusion. "It proves that 
she's fond of Sir Claude!" 

Maisie, in the light of some of the evi- 
dence, reflected on that till her hair was 
finished; but when she at last started up 
she gave a sign of no very close embrace 
of it. She grasped, at this moment, Mrs. 
Wix's arm. "He must have got his 
divorce ! " 

" Since day before yesterday.? Don't talk 
trash ! " 

This was spoken with an impatience 
which left the child nothing to reply; 
whereupon she sought her defence in a com- 
pletely different relation to the fact. " Well, 
I knew he would come ! " 



4o8 

" So did I ; but not in twenty-four hours. 
I gave him a few days ! " Mrs. Wix wailed. 

Maisie, whom she had now released, 
looked at her with interest. "How many 
did she give him > " 

Mrs. Wix faced her a moment; then as 
if with a bewildered sniff : " You had better 
ask her!" But she had no sooner uttered 
the words than she caught herself up. " Lord 
of mercy, how we talk ! " 

Maisie felt that, however they talked, she 
must see him, but she said nothing more for 
a time, a time during which she conscien- 
tiously finished dressing and Mrs. Wix also 
kept silent. It was as if they each had 
almost too much to think of, and even as if 
the child had the sense that her friend was 
watching her and seeing if she herself were 
watched. At last Mrs. Wix turned to the 
window and stood — sightlessly, as Maisie 
could guess — looking away. Then our 
young lady, before the glass, gave the su- 
preme shake. " Well, I 'm ready. And now 
to see him ! " 

Mrs. Wix turned round, seemingly without 
having heard her. "It's tremendously 
grave." There were slow, still tears behind 
the straighteners. 



 409 

"It is — it is." Maisie spoke as one 
now dressed quite up to the occasion; as 
one indeed who, with the last touch, had 
put on the judgment-cap. " I must see him 
immediately. " 

" How can you see him if he does n't send 
for you ? ** 

"Why can't I go and find him?" 

''Because you don't know where he is." 

"Can't I just look in the salon f" That 
still seemed simple to Maisie. 

Mrs. Wix, however, instantly cut it off. 
"I wouldn't have you look in the salon for 
all the world 1 " Then she explained a little : 
"The salon isn't ours now." 

"Ours?" 

"Yours and mine. It 's theirs." 

" Theirs ? " Maisie, with her stare, con- 
tinued to echo. "You mean they want to 
keep us out ? " 

Mrs. Wix faltered ; she sank into a chair 
and, as Maisie had often enough seen her do 
before, covered her face with her hands. 
"They ought to, at least. The situation's 
too monstrous!" 

Maisie stood there a moment — she looked 
about the room. " I '11 go to him — I '11 find 
him." 



410 

'•/won't ! I won't go near them ! " cried 
Mrs. Wix. 

"Then I'll see him alone." The child 
spied what she had been looking for — she 
possessed herself of her hat. " Perhaps I '11 
take him out!" And, with decision, she 
quitted the room. 

When she entered the salon it was empty ; 
but at the sound of the opened door some 
one stirred on the balcony and Sir Claude, 
stepping straight in, stood before her. He 
was in light, fresh clothes and wore a straw 
hat with a bright ribbon ; these things, be- 
sides striking her in themselves as the very 
promise of the grandest of grand tours, gave 
him a certain radiance and, as it were, a 
tropical ease ; but such an effect only marked 
rather more his having stopped short and, for 
a longer minute than had ever, at such a 
juncture, elapsed, not opened his arms to 
her. His pause made her pause and enabled 
her to reflect that he must have been up 
some time, for there were no traces of break- 
fast, and that, though it was so late, he had 
rather markedly not caused her to be called 
to him. Had Mrs. Wix been right about 
their forfeiture of the salon f Was it all his 
now, all his and Mrs. Beale's.^ Such an 



 411 

idea, at the rate her small thoughts throbbed, 
could only remind her of the way in which 
what had been hers hitherto was what was 
exactly most Mrs. Beale's and his. It was 
strange to be standing there and greeting 
him across a gulf, for he had by this time 
spoken, smiled, said : " My dear child — my 
dear child ! " but without coming any nearer. 
In a flash she saw that he was different — 
more so than he knew or designed. The 
next minute indeed it was as if he caught 
an impression from her face : this made him 
hold out his hand. Then they met, he 
kissed her, he laughed, she thought he even 
blushed ; something of his affection rang out 
as usual. " Here I am, you see, again — as 
I promised you." 

It was not as he had promised them — he 
had not promised them Mrs. Beale; but 
Maisie said nothing about that. What she 
said was simply: "I knew you had come. 
Mrs. Wix told me. " 

" Oh yes. And where is she ? " 

" In her room. She got me up — she 
dressed me." 

Sir Claude looked at her up and down ; a 
sweetness of mockery that she particularly 
loved came out in his face whenever he did 



412 

that, and it was not wanting now. He raised 
his eyebrows and his arms to play at admira- 
tion ; he was evidently, after all, disposed to 
be gay. " Got you up ? I should think so ! 
She has dressed you most beautifully. Is n't 
she coming.?" 

Maisie wondered if she had better tell. 
" She said not. " 

" Does n't she want to see a poor devil ? " 

She looked about, under the vibration of 
the way he described himself, and her eyes 
rested on the door of the room he had pre- 
viously occupied. " Is Mrs. Beale in there ? " 

Sir Claude looked blankly at the same 
object. " I have n*t the least idea ! " 

"You haven't seen her.? " 

" Not the tip of her nose." 

Maisie thought; there settled on her, in 
the light of his beautiful smiling eyes, the 
faintest, purest, coldest conviction that he 
was not telling the truth. "She hasn't 
welcomed you.?" 

" Not by a single sign. " 

" Then where is she ? " 

Sir Claude laughed; he seemed both 
amused and surprised at the point she made 
of it "I give it up." 

" Does n't she know you 've come ? " 



 413 

He laughed again. " Perhaps she does n't 
care ! " 

Maisie, with an inspiration, pounced on 
his arm. " Has she gone ? " 

He met her eyes, and then she could see 
that his own were really much graver than 
his manner. "Gone.?" She had flown to 
the door, but before she could raise her hand 
to knock he was beside her and had caught 
it. "Let her be. I don't care about her. 
I want to see^^w." 

Maisie fell back with him. "Then she 
has fCt gone } " 

He still looked as if it were a joke ; but 
the more she saw of him the more she could 
make out that he was troubled "It 
wouldn't be like her!" 

She stood looking up at him. " Did you 
want her to come } " 

" How can you suppose — } " He put it 
to her candidly. " We had an immense row 
over it. " 

" Do you mean you 've quarrelled } " 

Sir Claude hesitated. "What has she 
told you.?" 

"That I 'm hers as much as yours. That 
she represents papa. " 

His gaze struck away through the open 



414 

window and up to the sky; she could hear 
him rattle in his trousers' pocket his money 
or his keys. " Yes — that *s what she keeps 
saying. " It gave him for a moment an air 
that was almost helpless. 

"You say you don't care about her," 
Maisie went on. ^^ Do you mean you've 
quarrelled? " 

"We do nothing in life but quarrel." 

He rose before her, as he said this, so soft 
and fair, so rich, in spite of what might 
worry him, in restored familiarities, that it 
gave a bright blur to the meaning — to what 
would otherwise, perhaps, have been the 
tangible promise — of the words. " Oh, your 
quarrels ! " she exclaimed with discourage- 
ment. . 

" I assure you hers are quite fearful ! " he 
laughed. 

"I don't speak of hers. I speak of 
yours. " 

"Ah, don't do it till I 've had my coflfee! 
You're growing up clever," he added. 
Then he said : " I suppose you 've break- 
fasted ? " 

" Oh no — I ' ve had nothing. " 

" Nothing in your room " — he was all com- 
punction. " My dear old man ! — we '11 



 415 

breakfast then together." He had one of 
his happy thoughts. "I say — we'll go 
out." 

" That was just what I hoped. I *ve 
brought my hat." 

"You are clever! We'll go to a caf6." 
Maisie was already at the door; he glanced 
round the room. " A moment — my stick. " 
But there appeared to be no stick. "No 
matter; I left it — oh!" He remembered, 
with an odd drop, and came out. 

" You left it in London } " she asked as 
they went downstairs. 

" Yes — in London : fancy ! " 

"You were in such a hurry to come," 
Maisie explained. 

He had his arm round her. "That must 
have been the reason." Half way down 
he stopped short again, slapping his leg. 
"And poor Mrs. Wix!" 

Maisie's fice just showed a shadow. " Do 
you want her to come } " 

Dear, no — I want to see you alone. " 
That 's the way I want to see you I " she 
replied. " Like before. " 

" Like before ! " he gayly echoed. " But 
I mean has she had her coffee ? " 

"No, nothing." 






4i6 

" Then I '11 send it up to her. Madame ! " 
He had already, at the foot of the stair, 
called out to the stout patronne, a lady who 
turned to him, from the bustling, breezy 
hall, a countenance covered with fresh 
matutinal powder and a bosom as capacious 
as the velvet shelf of a chimney-piece, over 
which her round white face, framed in its 
golden frizzle, might have figured as a showy 
clock. He ordered, with particular recom- 
mendations, Mrs. Wix's repast, and it was 
a charm to hear his easy, brilliant French : 
even his companion's ignorance could meas- 
ure the perfection of it. The patronne, 
rubbing her hands and breaking in with 
high, swift notes, as into a florid duet, went 
with him to the street, and while they 
talked a moment longer Maisie remembered 
what Mrs. Wix had said about every one's 
liking him. It came out enough through the 
morning powder, it came out enough in the 
heaving bosom, how the landlady liked him. 
He had evidently ordered something lovely 
for Mrs. Wix. " Et bien soignS, tC esUce-pas f " 

" Soyez tranquille " — the patronne beamed 
upon him. " Et pour Madame ? " 

^* Madame?'' he echoed — it just pulled 
htm up a little. 



 417 

** Rien encore V^ 

" Rien encore. Come, Maisie. " She hur- 
ried along with him, but on the way to the 
caf6 he said nothing. 



XXX 

After they were seated there it was differ- 
ent : the place was not below the hotel, but 
farther along the quay; with wide, clear 
windows and a floor sprinkled with bran in 
a manner that gave it for visitors a little 
of the added charm of a circus. They had 
pretty much to themselves the painted spaces 
and the red plush benches ; these were shared 
by a few scattered gentlemen who picked 
teeth, with facial contortions, behind small 
bare tables, and by an old personage in par- 
ticular, a very old personage with a red 
ribbon in his buttonhole, whose manner of 
soaking buttered rolls in coffee and then 
disposing of them in the little that was left 
of the interval between his nose and chin 
might at a less anxious hour have cast upon 
Maisie an almost envious spell. They too 
had their cafi au lait and their buttered 
rolls, determined by Sir Claude's asking her 

27 



4i8 

if she could with that light aid wait till 
the hour of dejeuner. His allusion to this 
meal gave her, in the shaded, sprinkled 
coolness, the scene, as she vaguely felt, of 
a sort of ordered, mirrored license, the 
haunt of those — the irregular, like herself 
— who went to bed or who rose too late, 
something to think over while she watched 
the white-aproned waiter perform as nimbly 
with plates and saucers as a certain conjurer 
her friend had, in London, taken her to a 
music-hall to see. Sir Claude had presently 
begun to talk again, to tell her how London 
had looked, and how long he had felt him- 
self, on either side, to have been absent ; all 
about Susan Ash too, and the amusement 
as well as the difficulty he had had with 
her; then all about his return journey and 
the Channel in the night and the crowd of 
people coming over and the way there were 
always too many one knew. He spoke of 
other matters besides, especially of what she 
must tell him of the occupations, while he 
was away, of . Mrs. Wix and her pupil. 
Had n't they had the good time he had 
promised.^ — had he exaggerated a bit the 
arrangements made for their pleasure? 
Maisie had something — not all there was — 



 419 

to say of his success and of their gratitude; 
she had a complication of thought that grew 
every minute, grew with the consciousness 
that she had never seen him in this particular 
state in which he had been given back. 

Mrs. Wix had once said — it was once or 
fifty times; once was enough for Maisie, 
but more was not too much — that he was 
wonderfully various. Well, he was cer- 
tainly so, to the child's mind, on the present 
occasion; he was much more various than 
he was anything else. The fact that they 
were together in a shop, at a nice little 
intimate table, as they had so often been 
in London, only, besides, made greater the 
difference of what they were together about. 
This difference was in his face, in his voice, 
in every look he gave her and every move- 
ment he made. They were not the looks 
and the movements he really wanted to 
show, and she could feel as well that they 
were not those she herself wanted. She had 
seen him nervous, she had seen every one 
she had come in contact with nervous, but 
she had never seen him so nervous as this. 
Little by little it gave her a settled terror, 
a terror that partook of the coldness she had 
felt just before at the hotel, to find herself, 



420 

on his answer about Mrs. Beale, disbelieve 
him. She seemed to see at present, to 
touch across the table, as if by laying her 
hand on it, what he had meant when he con- 
fessed on those several occasions to fear. 
Why was such a man so often afraid? It 
must have begun to come to her now that 
there was one thing just such a man above 
all could be afraid of. He could be afraid 
of himself. His fear, at all events, was 
there; his fear was sweet to her, beautiful 
and tender to her, was having coffee and 
buttered rolls and talk and laughter that 
were no talk and laughter at all, with her; 
his fear was in his jesting, postponing, 
perverting voice; it was in just this make- 
believe way he had brought her out to imitate 
the old London playtimes, to imitate indeed 
a relation that had wholly changed, a rela- 
tion that she had, with her very eyes, seen 
in the act of change when, the day before, 
in the salon^ Mrs. Beale rose suddenly 
before her. She rose before her, for that 
matter, now, and even before their refresh- 
ment appeared Maisie arrived at the straight 
question for which, on their entrance, his 
first word had given opportunity. " Are we 
going to have cUjeuner with Mrs. Beale ? " 



 421 

His reply was anything but straight, 
" You and I ? " 

Maisie sat back in her chair. " Mrs. Wix 
and me." 

Sir Claude also shifted. " That 's an in- 
quiry, my dear child, that Mrs. Beale herself 
must answer." Yes, he had shifted; but 
abruptly, after a moment during which 
something seemed to hang there between 
them and, as it heavily swayed, just fan 
them with the air of its motion, she felt 
that the whole thing was upon them. " Do 
you mind," he broke out, "my asking you 
what Mrs. Wix has said to you ? " 

"Said to me?" 

"This day or two, while I was away." 

" Do you mean about you and Mrs. Beale ? " 

Sir Claude, resting on his elbows, fixed 
his eyes a moment on the white marble be- 
neath them. "No; I think we had a good 
deal of that — did n't we ? — before I left you. 
It seems to me we had it pretty well all out. 
I mean about yourself, about your — don't 
you know? — associating with us, as I might 
say, and staying on with us. While you 
were alone with our friend what did she 
say ? " 

Maisie felt the weight of the question; 



422 

it made her waver and wonder, while her 
companion's eyes remained bent. "Noth- 
ing," she rejoined at last. 

He looked up in surprise. " Nothing? " 

"Nothing," Maisie repeated; on which 
an interruption descended in the form of a 
tray bearing the preparations for their 
breakfast. 

These preparations were as amusing as 
everything else; the waiter poured their 
coffee from a vessel like a watering-pot and 
then made it froth with the curved stream of 
hot milk that dropped from the height of his 
raised arm ; but the two looked across at each 
other, through the whole play of French pleas- 
antness, with a gravity that had now ceased 
to dissemble. Sir Claude sent the waiter off 
again for something and then took up her 
answer. " Has n't she tried to affect you i " 

Face to face with him thus it seemed to 
Maisie that she had tried so little as to be 
scarce worth mentioning; again therefore, 
an instant, she shut herself up. Presently 
she found her middle course. " Mrs. Beale 
likes her now; and there 's one thing I 've 
found out — a great thing. Mrs. Wix enjoys 
her being so kind. She was tremendously 
kind all day yesterday. " 






 423 

" I see. And what did she do ? " Sir 
Claude asked. 

Maisie was now busy with her breakfast, 
and her kind host attacked his own; so 
that it was all in form at least even more 
than their old sociability. " Everything she 
could think of. She was as nice to her as 
you are," the child said. " She talked to her 
all day." 

And what did she say to her } " 
Oh, I don't know." Maisie was a little 
bewildered with his pressing her so for 
knowledge; it didn't fit into the degree of 
intimacy with Mrs. Beale that Mrs. Wix had 
so denounced and that, according to that 
lady, had now brought him back in bondage. 
Was n't he more aware than his stepdaughter 
of what would be done by the person to 
whom he was bound.? In a moment, how- 
ever, she added: "She made love to her." 

Sir Claude looked at her harder, and it 
was clearly something in her tone that made 
him quickly say: "You don't mind my ask- 
ing you, do you ? " 

" Not at all ; only I should think you 'd 
know better than I. " 

"What Mrs. Beale did yesterday?" 

She thought he colored a trifle; but 



424 

almost simultaneously with that impression 
she found herself answering : " Yes — if you 
have seen her." 

He broke into the loudest of laughs. 
"Why, my dear boy, I told you just now 
I Ve absolutely not. I say, don't you be- 
lieve me?" 

There was something she was already so 
afraid of that it covered up other fears. 
"Didn't you come back to see her.^" she 
inquired in a moment. "Didn't you come 
back because you always want to so much ? " 

He received her inquiry as he had received 
her doubt — with an eictraordinary absence 
of resentment. " I can imagine, of course, 
why you think that. But it does n't explain 
my doing what I have. It was, as I said to 
you just now at the inn, really and truly you 
I wanted to see. " 

She felt an instant as she used to feel 
when, in the back-garden at her mother's, 
she took from him the highest push of a 
swipg — high, high, high — that he had 
had put there for her pleasure and that 
had finally broken down under the weight 
and the eictravagant patronage of the cook. 
"Well, that's beautiful. But to see me, 
you mean, and go away again ? " 



 425 

" My going away again is just the point. 
I can't tell yet — it all depends." 

" On Mrs. Beale ? " Maisie asked. " She 
won't go away." He finished emptying his 
coffee-cup and then when he had put it 
aside leaned back in his chair and let her 
see that he smiled at her. This only added 
to her idea that he was in trouble, that he 
was turning somehow in his pain and trying 
different things. He continued to smile, 
and she presently went on: "Don't you 
know that.?" 

" Yes, I may as well confess to you that as 
much as that I do know. She won't go away. 
She '11 stay." 

"She'll stay. She'll stay," Maisie re- 
peated. 

"Just so. Won't you have some more 
coffee } " 

"Yes, please." 

" And another buttered roll ? " 

"Yes, please." 

He signed to the hovering waiter, who 
arrived with the shining spout of plenty in 
either hand and with the friendliest interest 
in mademoiselle. "Z^j tartines sont /^i." 
Their cups were replenished, and while 
he watched almost musingly the bubbles in 



426 

the fragrant mixture, "Just so — just so," 
Sir Claude said again and again. "It's 
awfully awkward ! *' he exclaimed when the 
waiter had gone. 

"That she won't go?" 

" Well — everything ! Well, well, well ! " 
But he pulled himself together; he began 
again to eat. "I came back to ask you 
something. That *s what I came back for." 

" I know what you want to ask me," Maisie 
said. 

" Are you very sure ? " 

"I'm almost very. " 

" Well, then, risk it. You must n't make 
me risk everything. " 

She was struck with the force of this. 
"You want to know if I should be happy 
with them.'' 

" With those two ladies only } No, no, old 
man : vous-ny^tes pas. So now — there ! " 
Sir Claude laughed. 

"Well then, what is it?" 

The next minute, instead of telling her 
what it was, he laid his hand across the 
table on her own and held her as if under 
the prompting of a thought. "Mrs. Wix 
would stay with herf 

" Without you ? Oh yes — now. " 



 427 

"On account, as you just intimated, of 
Mrs. Beale's changed manner?" 

Maisie, with her sense of responsibility, 
focussed both Mrs. Beale's changed manner 
and Mrs. Wix's human weakness. "I think 
she talked her over." 

Sir Claude thought a moment "Ah, 
poor dear ! " 

"Do you mean Mrs. Beale? " 

"Oh no — Mrs. Wix." 

"She likes being talked over — treated 
like any one else. Oh, she likes great 
politeness," Maisie expatiated. "It aflFects 
her very much. " 

Sir Claude, to her surprise, demurred a 
little to this. "Very much — up to a cer- 
tain point." 

" Oh, up to any point ! " Maisie returned 
with emphasis. 

"Well, haven't I been polite to her?" 

" Lovely — and she perfectly worships 
you. " 

"Then, my dear child, why can't she let 
me alone ? " And this time Sir Claude un- 
mistakably blushed. Before Maisie, how- 
ever, could answer his question, which would 
indeed have taken her long, he went on in 
another tone: "Mrs. Beale thinks she has 



428 

probably quite broken her down. But she 
hasn't." 

Though he spoke as if he were sure, 
Maisie was strong in the impression she 
had just uttered and that she now again pro- 
duced. " She has talked her over. " 

" Ah yes ; over to herself, but not over to 



me." 



Oh, she couldn't bear to hear him say 
that! "To you? Don't you really believe 
how she loves you ? " 

Sir Claude hesitated. "Of course, I 
know she 's wonderful." 

"She *s just every bit as fond of you as / 
am," said Maisie. "She told me so yester- 
day." 

"Ah, then," he promptly exclaimed, "she 
fms tried to aflFect you! I don't love her^ 
don't you see.^ I do her perfect justice," he 
pursued, "but I mean I don't love her as I 
do you, and I 'm sure you wouldn't seriously 
expect it. She 's not my daughter — come, 
old chapl She's not even my mother, 
though I dare say it would have been better 
for me if she had been. I '11 do for her 
what I 'd do for my mother, but I won't do 
more." His real excitement broke out in a 
need to explain and justify himself, though 



 429 

he kept trying to correct and conceal it with 
laughs and mouthfuls and other vain famil- 
iarities. Suddenly he broke off, wiping 
his moustache with sharp pulls and coming 
back to Mrs. Beale. " Did she try to talk 
you over } ** 

" No — to me she said very little. Very 
little indeed/' Maisie continued. 

Sir Claude seemed struck with this. " She 
was only sweet to Mrs. Wix? " 

*' As sweet as sugar ! " cried Maisie. 

He looked amused at her comparison, but 
he didn't contest it; he uttered, on the con- 
trary, in an assenting way, a little inarticu- 
late sound. " I know what she can be. But 
much good may it have done her! Mrs. 
Wix won't come round. That *s what makes 
it so fearfully awkward. " 

Maisie knew it was fearfully awkward ; she 
had known this now, she felt, for some time, 
and there was something else it more press- 
ingly concerned her to learn. " What is it 
that you meant you came over to ask me? " 

"Well," said Sir Claude, "I was just 
going to say. Let me tell you it will sur- 
prise you. " She had finished breakfast now 
and she sat back in her chair again; she 
waited in silence to hear. He had pushe<J 



430 

the things before him a little way and had 
his elbows on the table. This time she was 
convinced she knew what was coming, and 
once more, for the crash, as with Mrs. Wix 
lately in their room, she held her breath and 
drew together her eyes. He was going to 
say that she must give him up. He looked 
hard at her again ; then he made his e£Eort 
" Should you see your way to let her go ? " 

She was bewildered. " To let who — ? " 

" Mrs. Wix, simply. I put it at the worst. 
Should you see your way to sacrifice her? 
Of course I know what I 'm asking. '* 

Maisie's eyes opened wide again; this 
was so different from what she had expected. 
"And stay with you alone? " 

He gave another push to his coffee-cup. 
"With me and Mrs. Beale. Of course it 
would be rather rum ; but ever3rthing in our 
whole story is rather rum, you know. What 
is more unusual than for any one to be given 
up, like you, by her parents? " 

" Oh, nothing is more unusual than that ! " 
Maisie concurred, relieved at the contact of 
a proposition as to which concurrence could 
have lucidity. 

"Of course it would be quite unconven- 
tional," Sir Claude went on — "I mean the 



 431 

little household we three should make to- 
gether; but things have got beyond that, 
don't you see? They got beyond that long 
ago. We shall stay abroad at any rate — it *s 
ever so much easier, and it 's our affair and 
nobody else's: it's no one's business but 
ours on all the blessed earth. I don't say 
that for Mrs. Wix, poor dear — I do her 
absolute justice. I respect her; I see what 
she means ; she has done me a lot of good. 
But there are the facts. There they are, 
simply. And here am I, and here are you. 
And she won't come round. She 's right, 
from her point of view. I 'm talking to you 
in the most extraordinary way — I 'm always 
talking to you in the most extraordinary way, 
ain't I? One would think you were about 
sixty, and that I — I don't know what any 
one would think / am. Unless a beastly 
cad!" he suggested. "I've been awfully 
worried, and this is what it has come to. 
You 've done us the most tremendous good, 
and you '11 do it still and always, don't you 
see.^ We can't let you go — you 're every- 
thing. There are the facts, as I say. She 
is your mother now, Mrs. Beale, by what 
has happened, and I, in the same way, I 'm 
your father. No one can contradict that, and 



432 

we can't get out of it My idea would be a 
nice little place — somewhere in the south 

— where she and you would be together and 
as good as any one else. And I should be 
as good too, don't you see? for I shouldn't 
live with you, but I should be close to you 

— just round the comer, and it would be just 
the same. My idea would be that it should 
all be perfectly open and frank. Honi soil 
qui malypensey don't you know? You're 
the best thing — you and what we can do for 
you — that either of us has ever known : " he 
came back to that. "When I say to her 
* Give her up, come, ' she lets me have it 
bang in the face. * Give her up yourself ! ' 
It 's the same old vicious circle; and when 
I say vicious I don't mean a pun or a what- 
d'ye-call-'em. Mrs. Wix is the obstacle — 
I mean, you know, if she has affected you. 
She has affected me^ and yet here I am. I 
never was in such a tight place : please be- 
lieve it 's only that that makes me put it to 
you as I do. My dear child, is n't that — to 
put it so — just the way out of it ? That 
came to me yesterday, in London, after Mrs. 
Beale had gone: I had the most infernal, 
atrocious day. * Go straight over and put it 
to her : let her choose, freely, her own self. ' 



 433 

So I do, old girl — I put it to you. Can 
you choose freely? " 

This long address, slowly and brokenly 
uttered, with fidgets and falterings, with 
lapses and recoveries, with a mottled face 
and embarrassed but supplicating eyes, 
reached the child from a quarter so close 
that after the shock of the first sharpness 
she could see, intensely, its direction and 
follow it from point to point; all the more 
that it came back to the point at which it 
had started. There was a word that had 
hummed all through it. " Do you call it a 
' sacrifice } ' " 

"Of Mrs. Wix? I '11 call it whatever ^^« 
call it. I won't funk it — I have n't, have I } 
I '11 face it in all its baseness. Does it 
strike you it is base for me to get you well 
away from her, to smuggle you off here into 
a comer and bribe you with sophistries and 
buttered rolls to betray her ? " 
To betray her > " 
Well — to part with her. " 

Maisie let the question wait ; the concrete 

image it presented was the most vivid side 

of it. "If I part with her where will 

she go?" 

" Back to London. " 

28 






434 

"But I mean what will she do?" 

" Oh, as for that, I won*t pretend I know. 
I don't. We all have our difficulties." 

That, to Maisie, was at this moment more 
striking than it had ever been. " Then who 
will teach me ? " 

Sir Claude laughed out. "What Mrs. 
Wix teaches?" 

Maisie smiled dimly; she saw what he 
meant. " It is n't very, very much. " 

"It's so very, very little," he rejoined, 
"that that 's a thing we *ve positively to con- 
sider. We probably should n't give you 
another governess. To begin with, we 
shouldn't be able to get one — not of the 
only kind that would do. It wouldn't do — 
the kind that would do, " he queer ly enough 
explained. " I mean they would n't stay — 
heigh-ho ! We 'd do you ourselves. Partic- 
ularly me. You see I can now; I haven't 
got to mind — what I used to. I won't fight 
shy as I did — she can show out with me. 
Our relation, all round, is more regular." 

It seemed wonderfully regular, the way 
he put it; yet none the less, while she 
looked at it as judiciously as she could, the 
picture it made persisted somehow in being 
a combination quite distinct — an old woman 



 435 

and a little girl seated in deep silence on a 
battered old bench by the rampart of the 
haute ville. It was just at that hour yester- 
day; they were hand in hand; they had 
melted together. "I don't think you yet 
understand how she clings to you," Maisie 
said at last. 

" I do — I do. But for all that — ! " And 
he gave, turning in his conscious exposure, 
an oppressed, impatient sigh ; the sigh, even 
his companion could recognize, of the man 
naturally accustomed to that argument, the 
man who wanted thoroughly to be reasonable, 
but who, if really he had to mind so many 
things, would be always impossibly ham- 
pered. What it came to indeed was that he 
understood quite perfectly. If Mrs. Wix 
clung it was all the more reason for shaking 
Mrs. Wix off. 

This vision of what she had brought him 
to occupied our young lady while, to ask 
what he owed, he called the waiter and put 
down a gold piece that the man carried off 
for change. Sir Claude looked after him, 
then went on: "How could a woman have 
less to reproach a fellow with ? I mean as 
regards herself." 

Maisie entertained the question. "Yes. 



436 

How could she have less ? So why are you 
so sure she'll go?" 

"Surely you heard why — you heard her 
come out three nights ago ? How can she do 
anything but go — after what she then said ? 
I 've done what she warned me of — she was 
absolutely right. So here we are. Her 
liking Mrs. Beale^ as you call it, now^ is a 
motive sufficient with other things to make 
her, for your sake, stay on without me; it *s 
not a motive sufficient to make her, even for 
yours, stay on with me — swallow, in short, 
what she can't swallow. And when you 
say she 's as fond of me as you are I think I 
can, if that 's the case, challenge you a little 
on it. Would youy only with those two, stay 
on without me ? " The waiter came back 
with the change, and that gave her, under 
this appeal, a moment*s respite. But when 
he had retreated again with the " tip " gath- 
ered in with graceful thanks, on a subtle 
hint from. Sir Claude's forefinger, the latter 
while he pocketed the money followed the 
appeal up. "Would you let her make you 
live with Mrs. Beale?" 

"Without you? Never," Maisie then an- 
swered. "Never," she said again. 

It made him quite triumph, and she was 



 437 

indeed herself shaken by the mere sound of 
it. "So you see you *re not, like her," he 
exclaimed, " so ready to give me away ! " 
Then he came back to his original question. 
** Can you choose? I mean can you settle 
it, by a word, yourself? Will you stay on 
with us without her ? " 

Now in truth she felt the coldness of her 
terror, and it seemed to her that suddenly 
she knew, as she knew it about Sir Claude, 
what she was afraid of. She was afraid of 
herself. She looked at him in such a way 
that it brought, she could see, wonder into 
his face, a wonder held in check, however, 
by his frank pretension to play fair with 
her, not to use advantages, not to hurry nor 
hustle her — only to put her chance clearly 
and kindly before her. "May I think?" 
she finally asked. 

"Certainly, certainly. But how long? " 

"Oh, only a little while," she said 
meekly. 

He had for a moment the air of wishing 
to look at it as if it were the most cheerful 
prospect in the world. " But what shall we 
do while you're thinking?" He spoke as 
if thought were compatible with almost any 
distraction. 



438 

There was but one thing Maisie wished to 
dOy and after an instant she expressed it. 
" Have we got to go back to the hotel ? " 

" Do you want to ? " 

"Oh no." 

"There's not the least necessity for it." 
He bent his eyes on his watch; his face was 
now very grave. " We can do an)rthing else 
in the world. " He looked at her again al- 
most as if he were on the point of saying that 
they might for instance start off for Paris. 
But even while she wondered if that were 
not coming he had a sudden drop. "We 
can take a walk." 

She was all ready, but he sat there as if 
he had still something more to say. This 
too, however, didn't come; so she herself 
spoke. " I think I should like to see Mrs. 
Wix first." 

" Before you decide ? All right — all 
right." He had put on his hat, but he had 
still to light a cigarette. He smoked a 
minute, with his head thrown back, looking 
at the ceiling; then he said: "There *s one 
thing to remember — I 've a right to impress 
it on you : we stand absolutely in the place 
of your parents. It 's their defection, their 
extraordinary baseness, that has made our 



1 1 



 439 

responsibility. Never was a young person 
more directly committed and confided. " He 
appeared to say this over, at the ceiling, 
through his smoke, a little for his own illu- 
mination. It carried him, after a pause, 
somewhat further. "Though, I admit, it 
was to each of us separately. " 

He gave her so, at that moment and in 
that attitude, the sense of wanting, as it 
were, to be on her side — on the side of what 
would be in every way most right and wise 
and charming for her — that she felt a sudden 
desire to show herself as not less delicate 
and magnanimous, not less solicitous for his 
own interests. What were these but that of 
the "regularity" he had just before spoken 
of? " It was to each of you separately," she 
accordingly, with much earnestness, re- 
marked; "but — don't you remember.? — I 
brought you together." 

He jumped up with a delighted laugh. 
"You brought us together, you brought us 
together. Come ! " 

XXXI 

She remained out with him for a time of 
which she could take no measure save that 



440 

it was too short for what she wished to make 
of it — an interval, a barrier, indefinite, 
insurmountable. They walked about, they 
dawdled, they looked in shop-windows ; they 
did all the old things exactly as if to try to 
get back all the old safety, to get something 
out of them that they had always got before. 
This had come before, whatever it was, 
without their trying, and nothing came now 
but the intenser consciousness of their quest 
and their subterfuge. The strangest thing 
of all was what had really happened to the 
old safety. What had really happened was 
that Sir Claude was "free" and that Mrs. 
Beale was "free," and yet that the new 
medium was somehow still more oppressive 
than the old. She could feel that Sir Claude 
concurred with her in the sense that the 
oppression would be worst at the inn, where, 
till something should be settled, they would 
feel the want of something — of what could 
they call it but a footing? The question of 
the settlement loomed larger to her now; it 
depended, she had learned, so completely 
on herself. Her choice, as her friend had 
called it, was there before her like an impos- 
sible sum on a slate, a sum that, in spite of 
her plea for consideration, she simply got 



M 



 441 

off from doing while she walked about with 
him. She must see Mrs. Wix before she 
could do her sum; therefore the longer 
before she saw her the more distant would 
be the ordeal. She met at present no de- 
mand whatever of her obligation; she 
simply plunged, to avoid it, deeper into the 
company of Sir Claude. She saw nothing 
that she had seen hitherto — no touch in the 
foreign picture that had at first been always 
before her. The only touch was that of Sir 
Claude's hand, and to feel her own in it was 
her mute resistance to time. She went 
about as sightlessly as if he had been leading 
her blindfold. If they were afraid of them- 
selves it was themselves they would find at 
the inn. She was certain now that what 
awaited them there would be to lunch with 
Mrs. Beale. All her instinct was to avoid 
that, to draw out their walk, to find pretexts, 
to take him down upon the sands, to take 
him to the end of the pier. He said not 
another word to her about what they had 
talked of at breakfast, and she had a dim 
vision of how his way of not letting her see 
that he was waiting for anything from her 
would make any one who should know of it, 
would make Mrs. Wix for instance, think 



442 

him more than ever a gentleman. It was 
true that once or twice, on the jetty, on the 
sands, he looked at her for an instant with 
eyes that seemed to propose to her to come 
straight off with him to Paris. That, how- 
ever, was not to give her a nudge about her 
responsibility. He evidently wanted to pro- 
crastinate quite as much as she — he was 
not a bit more in a hurry to get back to the 
others. Maisie herself, at this moment, 
could be secretly merciless to Mrs. Wix — 
to the extent at any rate of not caring if 
her continued disappearance did make that 
lady begin to worry about what had become 
of her, even begin to wonder perhaps if 
the truants had n*t found their remedy. Her 
want of mercy to Mrs. Beale, indeed, was at 
least as great; for Mrs. Beale' s worry and 
wonder would be as much greater as the 
object to which they were directed. When 
at last Sir Claude, at the far end of the plage, 
which they had already, in the many -colored 
crowd, once traversed, suddenly, with a 
look at his watch, remarked that it was time, 
not to get back to the table cPhSte, but to get 
over to the station and meet the Paris papers 
— when he did this she found herself think- 
ing, quite with intensity, what Mrs. Beale 



Ml 



 443 

and Mrs. Wix would say. On the way over 
to the station she had even a mental picture 
of the stepfather and the pupil established 
in a little place in the south while the 
governess and the stepmother, in a little 
place in the north, remained linked by a 
community of blankness and by the endless 
theme of intercourse it would afford. The 
Paris papers had come in, and her compan- 
ion, with a strange extravagance, bought no 
less of them than nine: it took up time 
while they hovered at the bookstall on the 
restless platform, where the little volumes 
in a row were all yellow and pink and one 
of her favorite old women, in one of her 
favorite old caps, absolutely wheedled him 
into the purchase of three. They had thus 
so much to carry home that it would have 
seemed simpler, with such a provision for 
a nice straight journey through France, just 
to "nip," as she phrased it to herself, into 
the coup^ of the train that, a little further 
along, stood waiting to start. She asked 
Sir Claude where it was going. 

" To Paris. Fancy ! " 

She could fancy well enough. They stood 
there and smiled, he with all the newspapers 
under his arm and she with the three books. 



444 

one yellow and two pink. He had told her 
the pink were for herself and the yellow one 
for Mrs. Beale, implying, in an interesting 
way, that these were the vivid divisions, in 
France, of literature for the young and for 
the old. She knew that they looked exactly 
as if they were going to get into the train, 
and she presently brought out to her com- 
panion: "I wish we could go. Won't you 
take me } '* 

He continued to smile. "Would you 
really come?" 

" Oh yes, oh yes ! Try ! " 

" Do you want me to take our tickets ? " 

" Yes, take them. " 

" Without any luggage J " 

She showed their two armfuls, smiling at 
him as he smiled at her, but so conscious of 
being more frightened than she had ever 
been in her life, that she seemed to catch 
all her whiteness as in a glass. Then she 
knew that what she saw was Sir Claude's 
whiteness ; he was as frightened as herself. 
" Have n't we got plenty ? " she asked. 
" Take the tickets — have n't you time ? 
When does the train go?" 

Sir Claude turned to a porter. "When 
does the train go ? " 



^-UJ 



 445 

The man looked up at the station clock. 
" In two minutes. Monsieur est placi f " 

" Pas encore. " 

" Vous n'avez que le temps, '^ Then, after 
a look at Maisie, " Monsieur veut-il que je 
les prenneV the man inquired. 

Sir Claude turned back to her. " Veux-tu 
Hen qu'il en prenne f " 

It was the m*ost extraordinary thing in the 
world : in the intensity of her excitement 
she not only, by illumination, understood 
all their French, but fell into it with an 
active perfection. She addressed herself 
straight to the porter. " Prenny, prenny, 
Oh^ prenny!*' 

" AA, si mademoiselle le veut — /" He 
waited there for the money. 

But Sir Claude only stared — stared at her 
with his pale face. "You have chosen, 
then } You '11 let her goi *' 

Maisie carried her eyes wistfully to the 
train, where, amid cries of ^^ En voiturey 
en voituret'* heads were at windows and 
doors were banging loud. The porter 
was pressing. ** Oh^ vous n'avez plus le 
temps ! " 

" It *s going — it 's going ! " cried Maisie. 

They watched it move, they watched it 



446 

start; then the man went his way with a 
shrug. " It 's gone ! " Sir Claude said. 

Maisie crept some distance up the plat- 
form ; she stood there with her back to her 
companion, following it with her eyes, keep- 
ing down tears, nursing her pink and yellow 
books. She had had a real fright, but had 
fallen back to earth. The odd thing was 
that in her fall her fear too had been dashed 
down and broken. It was gone. She looked 
round at last, from where she had paused, 
at Sir Claude's, and then she saw that his 
was not. It sat there with him on the bench 
to which, against the wall of the station, he 
had retreated and where, leaning back and, 
as she thought, very queer, he still waited. 
She came down to him, and he continued to 
oflfer his ineffectual intention of pleasantry. 
" Yes, I 've chosen," she said to him. " I '11 
let her go if you — if you — " 

She faltered; he quickly took her up. 
"If I, if I — .?" 

"If you '11 give up Mrs. Beale." 

"Oh!" he exclaimed; on which she saw 
how much, how hopelessly he was afraid. 
She had supposed at the caf6 that it was of 
his rebellion, of his gathering motive; but 
how could that be when his temptations — 



 447 

that temptation for instance of the train they 
had just lost — were, after all, so small ? 
Mrs. Wix was right. He was afraid of his 
weakness — of his weakness. 

She could not have told you afterwards 
how they got back to the inn: she could 
only have told you that even from this point 
they had not gone straight, but once more 
had wandered and loitered and, in the course 
of it, had found themselves on the edge of 
the quay, where — still, apparently, with 
half an hour to spare — the boat prepared 
for Folkestone was drawn up. Here they 
hovered as they had done at the station ; here 
they exchanged silences again, but only 
exchanged silences. There were punctual 
people on the deck, choosing places, taking 
the best; some of them already contented, 
all established and shawled, facing to Eng- 
land and attended by the steward, who, con- 
fined on such a day to the lighter offices, 
tucked up the ladies' feet or opened bottles 
with a pop. They looked down at these 
things without a word ; they even picked out 
a good place for two that was left in the lee 
of a lifeboat; and if they lingered rather 
stupidly, neither deciding to go aboard nor 
deciding to come away, it was, quite as 



448 

much as she. Sir Claude who would n't move. 
It was Sir Claude who cultivated the su- 
preme stillness by which she knew best what 
he meant. He simply meant that he knew 
all she herself meant. But there was no 
pretence of pleasantry now ; their faces were 
grave and tired. When at last they lounged 
ofif it was as if his fear, his fear of his weak- 
ness, leaned upon her hard while they fol- 
lowed the harbor. In the hall of the hotel, 
as they passed in, she saw a battered old box 
that she recognized, an ancient receptacle 
with dangling labels that she knew and a 
big painted W, lately done over and in- 
tensely personal, that seemed to stare at 
her with a recognition and even with some 
suspicion of its own. Sir Claude caught it 
too, and there was agitation for both of them 
in the sight of this object on the move. 
Was Mrs. Wix going, and was the responsi- 
bility of giving her up lifted, at a touch, 
from her pupil.? Her pupil and her pupil's 
companion, transfixed a moment, held, in 
the presence of the omen, communication 
more intense than in the presence either of 
the Paris train or of the Channel steamer; 
then, and still without a word, they went 
straight upstairs. There, however, on the 



 449 

landing, out of sight of the people below, 
they collapsed so that they had to sink down 
together for support: they simply seated 
themselves on the uppermost step while Sir 
Claude grasped the hand of his stepdaughter 
with a pressure that at another moment 
would probably have made her squeal. 
Their books and papers were all scattered. 
" She thinks you 've given her up ! " 

" Then I must see her — I must see her ! " 
Maisie said. 

"To bid her good-bye .>*' 
^'."I must see her — I must see her!" the 
cliiM only repeated. 

They sat a minute longer. Sir Claude with 
his tight grip of her hand and looking away 
from her, looking straight down the staircase 
to where, round the turn, electric bells 
rattled and the pleasant sea-draught blew. 
At last, loosening his grasp, he slowly rose, 
on which she did the same. They went 
together along the lobby; but before they 
reached the salon he stopped again. "If I 
give up Mrs. Beale — ?" 

"I '11 go straight out with you again and 
not come back till she has gone. *' 

He seemed to wonder. "Till Mrs. 

Beale—.?" 

29 



4SO 

He had made it sound like a bad joke. 
" I mean till Mrs. Wix leaves — in that boat. " 

Sir Claude looked almost foolish. ''Is 
she going in that boat?" 

"I suppose so. I won't even bid her 
good-bye," Maisie continued; "I '11 stay- 
out till the boat has gone. I '11 go up to 
the old rampart. " 

" The old rampart ? " 

" I '11 sit on that old bench where you see 
the gold Virgin. " 

"The gold Virgin?" he vaguely echoed. 
But it brought his eyes back to her as -c, 
after an instant, he could see the place and 
the thing she named — could see her sitting 
there alone. "While I break with Mrs. 
Beale ? " 

" While you break with Mrs. Beale. " 

He gave a long, deep, smothered sigh. 
"I must see her first." 

"You won't do as I do? Go out and 
wait ? " 

"Wait?" — once more he appeared at a 
loss. 

"Till they both have gone," Maisie said. 

" Giving us up ? " 

" Giving us up. " 

Oh, with what a face, for an instant, he 



 451 

wondered if that could be ! But his wonder 
the next moment only made him go to the 
door and, with his hand on the knob, stand 
as if listening for voices. Maisie listened, 
but she heard none. All she heard, pres- 
ently, was Sir Claude's saying, with specula- 
tion quite averted, but so as not to be heard 
in the salon: "Mrs. Beale will never go." 
On this he pushed open the door, and she 
went in with him. The salon was empty, 
but, as an effect of their entrance, the lady 
he had just mentioned appeared at the door 
of the bedroom. "Is she going?" he then 
demanded. 

Mrs. Beale came forward, closing her 
door behind her. " I 've had the most 
extraordinary scene with her. She told me 
yesterday she 'd stay." 

" And my arrival has altered it } " 
" Oh, we took that into account ! " Mrs. 
Beale was flushed, which was never quite 
becoming to her, and her face visibly testi- 
fied to the encounter to which she alluded. 
Evidently, however, she had not been 
worsted, and she held up her head and 
smiled and rubbed her hands as if in sud^ 
den emulation of the patronne. " She prom- 
ised she 'd stay even if you should come." 



452 

" Then why has she changed ? " 

"Because she 's an idiot. The reason she 
herself gives is that you 've been out too 
long." 

Sir Claude stared. " What has that to do 
with it ? " 

" You 'vebeen out an age," Mrs. Beale con- 
tinued; "I myself couldn't imagine what 
had become of you. The whole morning," 
she exclaimed, "and luncheon long since 
over ! " 

Sir Claude appeared indifferent to that. 
" Did Mrs. Wix go down with you ? " he 
only asked. 

" Not she ; she never budged ! " — and Mrs. 
Beale' s flush, to Maisie's vision, deepened. 
" She moped there — she did n't so much as 
come out to me; and when I sent to invite 
her she simply declined to appear. She 
said she wanted nothing, and I went down 
alone. But when I came up, fortunately a 
little primed," — and Mrs. Beale smiled 
a fine smile of battle — " she was in the 
field ! " 

" ^nd you had a big row ? " 

"We had a big row." She assented with 
a nod of the same size. " And while you left 
me to that sort of thing I should like to 



 453 

know where you were ! " She paused for a 
reply, but Sir Claude merely looked at 
Maisie; a movement that promptly quick- 
ened her challenge. "Where the mischief 
have you been ? " 

"You seem to take it as hard as Mrs. 
Wix," Sir Claude returned. 

" I take it as I choose to take it, and yoy 
don't answer my question." 

He looked again at Maisie, and as if for 
an aid to this effort; whereupon she smiled 
at her stepmother and offered : " We 've 
been everywhere. ** 

Mrs. Beale, however, made her no re- 
sponse, thereby adding to a surprise of which 
our young lady had already felt the light 
brush. She had received neither a greeting 
nor a glance; but perhaps this was not 
more remarkable than the omission, in re- 
spect to Sir Claude, parted with in London 
two days before, of any sign of a sense of 
their reunion. Most remarkable of all was 
Mrs. Beale' s announcement of the pledge 
given by Mrs. Wix and not hitherto revealed 
to her pupil. Instead of heeding this wit- 
ness she went on with acerbity : "It might 
surely have occurred to you that something 
would come up." 



454 

Sir Claude looked at his watch. " I had 
no idea it was so late, nor that we had been 
out so long. We were n't hungry. It 
passed like a flash. What has come up? " 

"Oh, that she's disgusted," said Mrs. 
Beale. 

" Disgusted ? With whom .? " 
. "With Maisie." Even now she never 
looked at the child, who stood there equally 
associated and disconnected. "For having 
no moral sense." 

"How should she have.?" Sir Claude 
tried again to shine a little at the companion 
of his walk. " How, at any rate, is it proved 
by her going out with me } " 

"Don't ask me; ask that woman. She 
drivels when she doesn't rage," Mrs. Beale, 
declared 

"And she leaves the child.? " 

"She leaves the child," said Mrs. Beale 
with great emphasis, looking more than ever 
over Maisie's head. 

In this position suddenly a change came 
into her face, caused, as the others could, 
the next thing, see, by the reappeararfce of 
Mrs. Wix in the doorway which, on coming 
in at Sir Claude's heels, Maisie had left 
gaping. "I dont leave the child — I don't. 



 455 

I don't I " she thundered from the threshold, 
advancing upon the opposed three, but 
addressing herself directly to Maisie. She 
was girded, positively harnessed, for de- 
parture — arrayed as she had been arrayed 
on her advent and armed with a small, fat, 
rusty reticule which, almost in the manner 
of a battle-axe, she brandished in support of 
her words. She had clearly come straight 
from her room, where Maisie in an instant 
guessed she had directed the removal of her 
minor effects. "I don't leave you till I 've 
given you another chance. Will you come 
with me?" 

Maisie turned to Sir Claude, who struck 
her as having been removed to a distance 
of about a mile. To Mrs. Beale she turned 
no more than Mrs. Beale had turned: she 
felt as if already their difference had been 
disclosed. What had come out about that 
in the scene between the two women.? 
Enough came out now, at all events, as she 
put it practically to her stepfather. " Will 
you come.? Won't you.?" she inquired as 
if she had not already seen that she should 
have to give him up. It was the last flare 
of her dream; by this time she was afraid 
of nothing. 



4S6 

" I should think you 'd be too proud to 
ask ! " Mrs. Wix interposed. Mrs. Wix was 
herself conspicuously too proud. 

But at the child's words Mrs. Beale had 
fairly bounded. "Come away from me, 
Maisie ? " It was a wail of dismay and re- 
proach in which her stepdaughter was aston- 
ished to read that she had had no hostile 
consciousness and that if she had been so 
actively grand it was not from suspicion, 
but from strange entanglements of modesty. 

Sir Claude presented to Mrs. Beale an 
expression positively sick. "Don't put it 
to her that way!" There had indeed been 
something in Mrs. Beale' s tone, and for a 
moment our young lady was reminded of the 
old days in which so many of her friends had 
been "compromised." 

This friend blushed — it was before Mrs. 
Wix ; and though she bridled she took the 
hint. " No — it is n't the way. " Then she 
showed she knew the way. "Don't be a 
still bigger fool, dear, but go straight to 
your room and wait there till I can come to 
you. " 

Maisie made no motion to obey, but Mrs. 
Wix raised a hand that forestalled every 
evasion. " Don't move till you 've heard 



 457 

me. / 'm going, but I must first understand. 
Have you lost it again ? ** 

Maisie surveyed, for the idea of a partic- 
ular loss, the immensity of space. Then 
she replied lamely enough: "I feel as if I 
had lost everything." 

Mrs. Wix looked dark. "Do you mean 
to say you have lost what we found together, 
with so much difficulty, two days ago? " As 
her pupil failed of response, she continued : 
" Do you mean to say you *ve already for- 
gotten what we fqund together?" 

Maisie dimly remembered. "My moral 
sense ? " 

" Your moral sense. Haven't I, after all, 
brought it out ? " She spoke as she had never 
spoken even in the schoolroom and with the 
book in her hand. 

It brought back to the child a recollection 
of how sometimes she couldn't repeat on 
Friday the sentence that had been glib on . 
Wednesday, and she thought with conscipus 
stupidity of the mystery on which she was 
now pulled up. Sir Claude and Mrs. Beale 
stood there like visitors at an "exam." 
She had indeed an instant a whiff of the 
faint flower that Mrs. Wix pretended to have 
plucked and now, with such a peremptory 



458 

hand, passed under her nose. Then it left 
her, and, as if she were sinking vrith a slip 
from a foothold, her arms made a short jerk. 
What this jerk represented was the spasm 
within her of something still deeper than a 
moral sense. She looked at her examiner; 
she looked at the visitors ; she felt the ris- 
ing of the tears she had kept down at the 
station. The only thing was the old flat, 
shameful schoolroom plea. ^'I don't know 
— I don't know." 

" Then you 've lost it. " , Mrs. Wix seemed 
to close the book as she fixed the straight- 
eners on Sir Claude. "You 've nipped it in 
the bud. You've killed it when it had 
begun to live." 

She was a newer Mrs. Wix than ever, a 
Mrs. Wix high and great; but Sir Claude 
was not after all to be treated as a little boy 
with a missed lesson. " I 've not killed any- 
thing," he said; "on the contrary, I think 
I 've produced life. I don't know what to 
call it — I have n't even known how decently 
to deal with it to approach it ; but whatever 
it is it 's the most beautiful thing I 've ever 
met — it 's exquisite, it 's sacred." He had 
his hands in his pockets, and though a trace 
of the sickness he had just shown still per- 



 459 

haps lingered there his face bent itself with 
extraordinary gentleness on both the friends 
he was about to lose. " Do you know what 
I came back for ? " he asked of the elder. 

" I think I do ! " cried Mrs. Wix, surpris- 
ingly unmollified and with a crimson on her 
brow that was like a wave of color reflected 
from the luridness lately enacted with Mrs. 
Beale. That lady, as if a little besprinkled 
by such turns of the tide, uttered a loud, in- 
articulate protest and, averting herself, stood 
a moment at the window. 

"I came back with a proposal," said Sir 
Claude. 

" To me ? " Mrs. Wix asked. 

"To Maisie. That she should give you 
up." 

"And does she?" 

Sir Claude wavered. " Tell her ! " he then 
exclaimed to the child, also turning away 
as if to give her the chance. But Mrs. Wix 
and her pupil stood confronted in silence, 
Maisie whiter than ever — more awkward, 
more rigid and yet more dumb. They 
looked at each other hard, and as nothing 
came from them Sir Claude faced about 
again. " You won't tell her } — you can't ? " 
Still she said nothing; whereupon, address- 



46o 

ing Mrs. Wix, he broke into a kind of 
ecstasy. " She refused — she refused ! " 

Maisie, at this, found her voice. "I 
did n't refuse. I did n*t/* she said again. 

It brought Mrs. Beale straight back to 
her. " You accepted, angel — you ac- 
cepted ! " She threw herself upon the child 
and before Maisie could resist had sunk 
with her upon the sofa, possessed of her, 
encircling her. " You 've given her up 
already, you've given her up forever, and 
you 're ours and ours only now, and the 
sooner she 's off the better ! " 

Maisie had shut her eyes, but at a word 
of Sir Claude's they opened. " Let her go ! " 
he said to Mrs. Beale. 

" Never, never, never I " cried Mrs. Beale. 
Maisie felt herself more embraced. 

" Let her go ! " Sir Claude more intensely 
repeated. He was looking at Mrs. Beale, 
and there was something in his voice. 
Maisie knew, from a loosening of arms, that 
she had become conscious of what it was; 
she slowly rose from the sofa, and the child 
stood there again, dropped and divided. 
"You're free — you're free," Sir Claude 
went on; at which Maisie's back became 
aware of a push that vented resentment and 



 461 

that placed her again in the centre of the 
room, the cynosure of every eye and not 
knowing which way to turn. 

She turned with an effort to Mrs. Wix. 
" I did n't refuse to give you up. I said I 
would il he*d give up. '* 

"Give up Mrs. Beale?" burst from Mrs. 
Wix. 

" Give up Mrs. Beale. What do you call 
that but exquisite ? " Sir Claude demanded 
of all of them, the lady mentioned included ; 
speaking with a relish as intense now as if 
some lovely work of art or of nature had 
suddenly been set down among them. He 
was rapidly recovering himself on this basis 
of fine appreciation. " She made her condi- 
tion — with such a sense of what it should 
be ! She made the only right one." 

"The only right one.?" — Mrs. Beale re- 
turned to the charge. She had taken, a 
moment before, a check from him, but she 
was not to be checked on this. " How can 
you talk such rubbish, and how can you back 
her up in such impertinence 1 What in the 
world have you done to her to make her think 
of such stuff.?" She stood there in right- 
eous wrath ; she flashed her eyes round the 
circle. Maisie took them full in her own. 



462 

knowing that here at last was the moment she 
had had most to reckon with. But as regards 
her stepdaughter Mrs. Beale subdued herself 
to an inquiry deeply mild. " Have you made, 
my own love, any such condition as that ? " 

Somehow, now that it was there, the great 
moment was not so bad. What helped the 
child was that she knew what she wanted. 
All her learning and learning had made her 
at last learn that ; so that if she waited an 
instant to reply it was only from the desire 
to be nice. Bewilderment had simply gone, 
or at any rate was going fast. Finally she an- 
swered : " Will you give him up ? Will you ? " 

"Ah, leave her alone — leave her, leave 
her!" Sir Claude, in sudden supplication, 
murmured to Mrs. Beale. 

Mrs. Wix at the same instant found an- 
other apostrophe. " Is n't it enough for you, 
madam, to have brought her to discussing 
your relations.?" 

Mrs. Beale left Sir Claude unheeded, but 
Mrs. Wix could make her flame. " My rela- 
tions ? What do you know, you hideous crea- 
ture, about my relations, and what business on 
earth have you to speak of them ? Leave the 
room this instant, you horrible old woman ! " 

"I think you had better go — you must 



 463 

really catch your boat," Sir Claude said dis- 
tressfully to Mrs. Wix. He was out of it now, 
or wanted to be ; he knew the worst and had 
accepted it; what now concerned him was 
to prevent, to dissipate vulgarities. "Won't 
you go — won't you just get off quickly.^ ** 

"With the child as quickly as you like. 
Not without her." Mrs. Wix was adamant. 

"Then why did you lie to me, you fiend? " 
Mrs. Beale almost yelled. "Why did you 
tell me an hour ago that you had given her up ? " 

" Because I despaired of her — because I 
thought she had left me." Mrs. Wix turned 
to Maisie. " You were wM them — in their 
connection. But now your eyes are open, 
and I take you ! " 

"No you don't!" — Mrs. Beale made, 
with a great fierce jump, a wild snatch at 
her stepdaughter. She caught her by the 
arm and, completing an instinctive move- 
ment, whirled her round in a further leap to 
the door, which had been closed by Sir 
Claude the instant their voices had risen. 
She fell back against it and, even while 
denouncing and waving off Mrs. Wix, kept 
it closed in an incoherence of passion. " You 
don't take her, but you bundle yourself; she 
stays with her own people and she 's rid of 



464 

you ! I never heard anything so monstrous ! ** 
Sir Claude had rescued Maisie and kept hold 
of her; he held her in front of him, resting 
his hands very lightly on her shoulders and 
facing the loud adversaries. Mrs. Beale's 
flush had dropped ; she had turned pale with 
a splendid wrath. She kept protesting and 
dismissing Mrs. Wix ; she pressed her back to 
the door to prevent Maisie' s flight ; she drove 
out Mrs. Wix by the window or the chimney. 
" You 're a nice one — * discussing relations ' 
— with your talk of our ' connection ' and 
your insults ! What in the world is our con- 
nection but the love of the child who is our 
duty and our life and who holds us together 
as closely as she originally brought us } ** 

" I know, I know ! " Maisie said with a 
burst of eagerness. " I did bring you." 

The strangest of laughs escaped from Sir 
Claude. " You did bring us — you did ! " 
His hands went up and down gently on her 
shoulders. 

Mrs. Wix so dominated the situation that 
she had something sharp for every one. 
"There you have it, you see!" she preg- 
nantly remarked to her pupil. 

" JVi/l you give him up ? " Maisie persisted 
to Mrs. Beale. 



 465 

** To youy you abominable little horror?" 
that lady indignantly inquired, "and to this 
ignorant old idiot who has filled your dread- 
ful little mind with her wickedness ? Have 
you been a hideous little h)rpocrite all these 
years that I 've slaved to make you love me 
and deludedly believed that you did? " 

"I love Sir Claude — I love hiniy'* Maisie 
replied with a sense, slightly rueful and 
embarrassed, that she appeared to offer it 
as something that would do as well. Sir 
Claude had continued to pat her, and it was 
really an answer to his pats. 

"She hates you — she hates you," he ob- 
served with the oddest quietness to Mrs. 
Beale. 

His quietness made her blaze. " And you 
back her up in it and give me up to outrage ? " 

"No; I only insist that she 's free — she *s 
free." 

Mrs. Beale stared — Mrs. Beale glared. 
" Free to starve with this pauper lunatic? " 

" I 'II do more for her than you ever did ! " 
Mrs. Wix cried. "I '11 work my fingers to 
the bone." 

Maisie, with Sir Claude's hands still on 
her shoulders, felt, just as she felt the fine 
surrender in them, that over her head he looked 

30 



466 

in a certain way at Mrs. Wix. " You need n't 
do that, " she heard him say ; " she has means. *' 

" Means ? — Maisie ? ** Mrs. Beale shrieked. 
" Means that her vile father has stolen ! " 

" ril get them back — I '11 get them back. 
I'll look into it." He smiled and nodded 
at Mrs. Wix. 

This had a fearful effect on his other 
friend. " Haven't / looked into it, I should 
like to know, and haven't I found — an 
abyss .^ It *s too inconceivable, your cruelty 
to me!" she wildly broke out. She had 
hot tears in her eyes. 

He spoke to her very kindly, almost 
coaxingly. "We'll look into it again; 
we '11 look into it together. It is an abyss, 
but he can be made — or Ida can ! Think 
of the money they're getting now!" he 
laughed. "It's all right, it's all right," 
he continued. " It would n't do — it 
would n't do. We can't work her in. It 's 
perfectly true — she 's unique. We 're not 
good enough — oh no ! " And, quite exuber- 
antly, he laughed again. 

"Not good enough, and that beast isf 
Mrs. Beale shouted. 

At this, for a moment, there was a hush 
in the room, and in the midst of it Sir 



 467 

Claude replied to the question by moving 
with Maisie to Mrs. Wix. The next thing 
the child knew she was at that lady's side 
with an arm firmly grasped. Mrs. Beale 
still guarded the door. "Let them pass," 
said Sir Claude at last. 

She remained there, however; Maisie saw 
the pair look at each other. Then she saw 
Mrs. Beale turn to her. " I 'm your mother 
now, Maisie. And he 's your father." 

"That's just where it is!" Mrs. Wix 
sighed with an effect of irony positively 
detached and philosophic. 

Mrs. Beale continued to address her young 
friend, and her effort to be reasonable and 
tender was in its way remarkable. "We 're 
representative, you know, of Mr. Farange 
and his former wife. This person repre- 
sents mere illiterate presumption. We take 
our stand on the law. " 

"Oh the law, the law!" Mrs. Wix 
superbly jeered. "You had better indeed 
let the law have a look at you ! " 

"Let them pass — let them pass!" Sir 
Claude pressed his friend — he pleaded. 

But she fastened herself still to Maisie. 
" Do you hate me, dearest } " 

Maisie looked at her with new eyes, but 



468 

answered as she had answered before. 
" Will you give him up ? " 

Mrs. Beale's rejoinder hung fire, but when 
it came it was noble. "You shouldn't talk 
to me of such things ! " She was shocked to 
tears. 

For Mrs. Wix, however, it was her resent- 
ment that was shocking. " You ought to be 
ashamed of yourself I " she roundly declared. 

Sir Claude made a supreme appeal. " Will 
you be so good as to allow these horrors to 
terminate ? " 

Mrs. Beale fixed her eyes on him, and 
again Maisie watched them. " You should 
do him justice/' Mrs. Wix went on to Mrs. 
Beale. "We've always been devoted to 
him, Maisie and I — and he has shown how 
much he likes us. He would like to please 
her ; he would like even, I think, to please 
me. But he has n't given you up. " 

They stood confronted, the step-parents, 
still under Maisie's observation. That 
observation had never sunk so deep as at 
this particular moment. "Yes, my dear, I 
haven't given you up," Sir Claude said at 
last to Mrs. Beale, "and if you 'd like me to 
treat our friends here as solemn witnesses I 
don't mind giving you my word for it that I 



 469 

never, never will. There ! " he dauntlessly 
exclaimed. 

"He can't!" Mrs. Wix as distinctly 
commented. 

Mrs. Beale, erect and alive in her defeat, 
jerked her handsome face about. "He 
can't!" she literally mocked. 

"He can't, he can't, he can't!" Sir 
Claude's gay emphasis wonderfully carried 
it off. 

Mrs. Beale took it all in, yet she held her 
ground; on which Maisie addressed Mrs, 
Wix. " Sha'n't we lose the boat ? " 

"Yes, we shall lose the boat," Mrs. Wix 
mentioned to Sir Claude. 

Mrs. Beale meanwhile faced full at Maisie. 
"I don't know what to make of you!" she 
launched. 

Good-by," said Maisie to Sir Claude. 
Good-by, Maisie," Sir Claude answered. 

Mrs. Beale came away from the door. 
"Good-by!" she hurled at Maisie; then 
passed straight across the room and disap- 
peared in the adjoining one. 

Sir Claude had reached the door and 
opened it. Mrs. Wix was already out. On 
the threshold Maisie paused ; she put out her 
hand to her stepfather. He took it and held 






470 

it a moment, and their eyes met as the eyes 
of those who have done for each other what 
they can. "Good-by," he repeated. 

"Good-by." And Maisie followed Mrs. 
Wix. 

They caught the steamer, which was just 
putting off, and, hustled across the gulf, 
found themselves on the deck so breathless 
and so scared that they gave up half the 
voyage to letting their emotion sink. It 
sank slowly and imperfectly; but at last, 
in mid-channel, surrounded by the quiet 
sea, Mrs. Wix had courage to revert. "I 
didn't look back, did you.?" 

"Yes. He wasn't there," said Maisie. 

" Not on the balcony > " 

Maisie waited a moment; then, "He 
wasn't there," she simply said again. 

Mrs. Wix also was silent awhile. "He 
went to Aer^** she finally observed. 

" Oh, I know ! " the child replied. 

Mrs. Wix gave a sidelong look. She still 
had room for wonder at what Maisie knew. 


